Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2400.
hereby enacts as follows:PART IGENERAL PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the General Appropriation Act of 2026.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"COVID" or "COVID-19." The coronavirus disease 2019, an infectious disease caused by severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 that was first identified during December 2019 in Wuhan, China."Current fiscal year." The fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027."Employees." Includes all directors, superintendents, bureau or division chiefs, assistant directors, assistant 20260HB2400PN3765 - 17 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 superintendents, assistant chiefs, experts, scientists, engineers, surveyors, draftsmen, accountants, secretaries, auditors, inspectors, examiners, analysts, statisticians, marshals, clerks, stenographers, bookkeepers, messengers and other assistants in a department, board or commission."Expenses" and "maintenance." Includes all printing, binding and stationery, food and forage, materials and supplies, traveling expenses, training, motor vehicle supplies and repairs, freight, express and cartage, postage, telecommunication devices and telecommunication rentals and toll charges, newspaper advertising and notices, public advertising by or through any medium, fuel, light, heat, power and water, minor construction and renovation, repairs or reconstruction of equipment, buildings and facilities, rent of real estate and equipment, premiums on workers' compensation, insurance premiums on policies of liability insurance, insurance premiums on medical payment insurance and surety bonds for volunteer workers, premiums on employee group life insurance and employee and retired employee group hospital and medical insurance, payment of Commonwealth share of Social Security taxes and unemployment compensation costs for State employees, the purchase of replacement or additional equipment and machinery and all other incidental costs and expenses, including payment to the Department of General Services of mileage and other charges for the use of motor vehicles and rental payments for permanently assigned motor vehicles and of expenses or costs of services incurred through the Purchasing Fund. The term "expenses" also shall include the medical costs for the treatment of inmates of State institutions when the inmate must be transferred to an outside hospital, provided that in no case 20260HB2400PN3765 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall the State institution pay more for patient care than that provided under the State medical assistance program."Prior fiscal year." The fiscal year beginning July 1 of the fiscal year immediately prior to the current fiscal year.Section 103. Abbreviations.The following abbreviations when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"AIDS." Acquired immune deficiency syndrome."ARC." Appalachian Regional Commission."ARPA." American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2, 135 Stat. 4)."ARRA." American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5, 123 Stat. 115)."CCDFBG." Child Care and Development Fund Block Grant."CHIP." Children's Health Insurance Program."CSBG." Community Services Block Grant."DOE." Department of Energy."EDA." Economic Development Administration."EEOC." Equal Employment Opportunity Commission."EMG." Emergency."EPA." Environmental Protection Agency."ESEA." Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-10, 20 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq.)."FEMA." Federal Emergency Management Agency."FTA." Federal Transit Administration."HIV." Human immunodeficiency virus."HUD." Department of Housing and Urban Development."ICF." Intermediate care facilities."ID." Intellectual disabilities.20260HB2400PN3765 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "IIJA." Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Public Law 117-58, 135 Stat. 429)."IMLS." Institute of Museum and Library Services."IRA." Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169, 136 Stat. 1818)."LIHEABG." Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Block Grant."LIHEAP." Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program."LIHWAP." Low-Income Household Water Assistance Program."LSTA." Library Services and Technology Act (Public Law 104-208, 20 U.S.C. § 9101 et seq.)."MCH." Maternal and child health."MCHSBG." Maternal and Child Health Services Block Grant."MHSBG." Mental Health Services Block Grant."NSTIC." National Strategy for Trusted Identities in Cyberspace."PA SITES." Pennsylvania Strategic Investments to Enhance Sites."PHHSBG." Preventive Health and Health Services Block Grant."PREA." Prison Rape Elimination Act of 2003 (Public Law 108-79, 117 Stat. 972)."PRO Housing." Pathways to Removing Obstacles to Housing."SCDBG." Small Communities Development Block Grant."SNAP." Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Project."SSBG." Social Services Block Grant."STEP." State Trade and Export Promotion."SUPTRSBG." Substance Use Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Services Block Grant."TANFBG." Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Block Grant."TB." Tuberculosis.20260HB2400PN3765 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "TEA-21." Transportation Equity Act for the 21st Century (Public Law 105-178, 112 Stat. 107)."TEFAP." Temporary Emergency Food Assistance Program."VA." Veterans' Administration."VOCA." Victims of Crime Act of 1984 (Public Law 98-473, 42 U.S.C. § 10601 et seq.)."WIC." Women, Infants and Children Program."WIOA." Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128, 128 Stat. 1425).Section 104. State appropriations.(a) General Fund.--Except as provided in Part LI, the sums specified in this act, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated from the General Fund to agencies of the Executive, Legislative and Judicial Departments of the Commonwealth for the payment of salaries, wages or other compensation and travel expenses of the duly elected or appointed officers and employees of the Commonwealth, for the payment of fees for contractual services rendered, for the purchase or rental of goods and services, printing, public advertising by or through any medium, equipment, land and buildings and for payment of any other expenses, as provided by law or by this act, necessary for the proper conduct of the duties, functions and activities and for the purposes specified in this act for the current fiscal year and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the prior fiscal year.(b) Special funds and accounts.--Except as provided in Part LI, the sums specified in this act, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated from the special funds and accounts in the State Treasury to agencies of the Executive 20260HB2400PN3765 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Judicial Departments of the Commonwealth for the payment of salaries, wages or other compensation and travel expenses of the duly appointed officers and employees of the Commonwealth, for the payment of fees for contractual services rendered, for the purchase or rental of goods and services and for payment of any other expenses, as provided by law or by this act, necessary for the proper conduct of the duties, functions and activities and for the purposes specified in this act for the current fiscal year and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the prior fiscal year.Section 105. Federal appropriations.Except as otherwise provided in Part LI, the Federal appropriations specified in this act, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated to the agencies of the Executive, Legislative and Judicial Departments of the Commonwealth specified in this act for the payment of the expenses of implementing and carrying out the programs specified in this act for the current fiscal year and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the prior fiscal year. Unless otherwise stated, the Federal appropriations include any carryovers from the prior fiscal year.Section 106. References to Department of Criminal Justice.For the purposes of this act, a reference to the Department of Criminal Justice shall be deemed to be a reference to the Department of Corrections or the Pennsylvania Parole Board, or both, as applicable.PART IIGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONSFOR CURRENT FISCAL YEARSUBPART A20260HB2400PN3765 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENTSection 201. Governor.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Governor for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Office of the Governor: including the maintenance of the Governor's Home, the expense of entertainment of official guests and members of the General Assembly and the Judiciary, participation in the Governor's Conference, the expenses of the Executive Board and the payment of traveling expenses of persons other than employees of the Commonwealth appointed by the Governor to represent or otherwise serve the Commonwealth.State appropriation....... 12,104,000Section 202. Executive Offices.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Executive Offices for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Office of Administration.State appropriation....... 18,523,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For the Commonwealth Office of Digital Experience.State appropriation....... 14,564,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for executive offices:(1) (Reserved).For enhanced enterprise cybersecurity.State appropriation....... 10,000,000For the Inspector General.State appropriation....... 6,643,000For investigation of welfare fraud activities.State appropriation....... 10,995,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for investigation of welfare fraud activities:(1) "TANFBG - Program Accountability."Federal appropriation..... 4,500,000(2) "SNAP - Program Accountability."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000(3) "Medical Assistance - Program Accountability."Federal appropriation..... 9,250,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) "CCDFBG Subsidized Day Care - Fraud Investigation."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000For the Office of the Budget.State appropriation....... 27,500,000For transfer to enterprise systems lifecycle.State appropriation....... 60,000,000For audit of the Auditor General.State appropriation....... 99,000For the Office of General Counsel.State appropriation....... 9,821,000For the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission.State appropriation....... 14,530,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission:(1) "EEOC - Special Project Grant."Federal appropriation..... 2,100,000(2) "HUD - Special Project Grant."Federal appropriation..... 500,000For the Council on the Arts.State appropriation....... 1,108,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Council on the Arts:(1) "National Endowment for the Arts - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 1,295,000For the Juvenile Court Judges' Commission.State appropriation....... 4,057,000For the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.State appropriation....... 26,634,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency:(1) "Plan for Juvenile Justice."Federal appropriation..... 170,000(2) "Justice Assistance Grants."Federal appropriation..... 11,500,000(3) "Justice Assistance Grants - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(4) "Statistical Analysis Center."20260HB2400PN3765 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 400,000(5) "Criminal Identification Technology."Federal appropriation..... 5,000,000(6) "Crime Victims' Compensation Services."Federal appropriation..... 8,500,000(7) "Crime Victims' Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 80,000,000(8) "Violence Against Women Formula Grant Program."Federal appropriation..... 7,000,000(9) "Violence Against Women Formula Grant Program - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 600,000(9.1) "Community-Based Violence Intervention and Prevention."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000(10) "Residential Substance Abuse Treatment Program."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(11) "Crime Victims' Assistance (VOCA) - Administration/Operations."Federal appropriation..... 5,000,000(12) "Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention."20260HB2400PN3765 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 3,000,000(13) "Assault Services Program."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(14) "Safer Communities."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000(15) "Project Safe Neighborhoods."Federal appropriation..... 500,000(16) "Forensic Science Program."Federal appropriation..... 1,500,000(17) "Adam Walsh Implementation Support."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(18) (Reserved).(19) "Byrne Competitive Program."Federal appropriation..... 450,000(20) "Comprehensive Opioid Abuse Site-Based Program."Federal appropriation..... 5,000,000(21) (Reserved).(22) (Reserved).(23) "Prosecutor and Defender Incentives."Federal appropriation..... 400,000(24) "NICS Act Record Improvement Program (NARIP)."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (25) "Building Local Continuums - Youth Success."Federal appropriation..... 825,000(26) "National Sexual Assault Kit Initiative."Federal appropriation..... 2,500,000For county probation and reentry services.State appropriation....... 57,702,000For Office of Safe Schools Advocate.State appropriation....... 382,000For victims of juvenile offenders.State appropriation....... 1,300,000For violence and delinquency prevention programs.State appropriation....... 4,335,000For violence intervention and prevention.State appropriation....... 68,365,000For criminal indigent defense.State appropriation....... 7,500,000For juvenile probation services.State appropriation....... 18,945,000For grants to the arts, including costs to administer the grant program.State appropriation....... 9,590,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For law enforcement activities.State appropriation....... 3,000,000For transfer to School Safety and Security Fund - Targeted Grants.State appropriation....... 11,000,000For transfer to the Nonprofit Security Grant Fund.State appropriation....... 10,000,000Section 203. Lieutenant Governor.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Lieutenant Governor for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Office of the Lieutenant Governor.State appropriation....... 1,933,000Section 204. Attorney General.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Attorney General for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Office of Attorney General.State appropriation....... 58,914,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general 20260HB2400PN3765 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 government operations:(1) "State Medicaid Fraud Control Units."Federal appropriation..... 13,325,000(2) "Safe Neighborhoods."Federal appropriation..... 340,000For drug law enforcement.State appropriation....... 63,307,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for drug law enforcement:(1) "High Intensity Drug Trafficking Areas."Federal appropriation..... 5,300,000For supplemental law enforcement support.State appropriation....... 15,233,000For joint local-State firearm task forces.State appropriation....... 14,367,000For witness relocation programs.State appropriation....... 1,315,000For Child Predator Interception Unit.State appropriation....... 7,887,000For tobacco law enforcement.State appropriation....... 2,162,000For trials resulting from 20260HB2400PN3765 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 indictments by multicounty grand juries.State appropriation....... 200,000For school safety.State appropriation....... 2,639,000For human trafficking enforcement and prevention.State appropriation....... 2,377,000For organized retail theft prevention.State appropriation....... 3,108,000Section 205. Auditor General.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Auditor General for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Department of the Auditor General for postauditing, annually, periodically or specially, the affairs of any department, board or commission which is supported out of the General Fund, magisterial district judges, other fining offices, volunteer firemen's relief association funds and the offices of Statewide elected officials and for the proper auditing of appropriations for or relating to public assistance, 20260HB2400PN3765 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including any Federal sums supplementing such appropriations.State appropriation....... 45,610,000For the Board of Claims.State appropriation....... 2,003,000Section 206. Treasury Department.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Treasury Department for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Treasury Department, including the administration of Article XIII.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.State appropriation....... 47,197,000For the Board of Finance and Revenue.State appropriation....... 4,394,000For divestiture reimbursement.State appropriation....... 150,000For the payment of the Commonwealth's portion of the expenses of various councils, commissions, conferences, boards, associations, coalitions and institutes which are multistate 20260HB2400PN3765 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organizations of which the Commonwealth has been a member for at least one year and which membership enables the Commonwealth government to represent the citizens of Pennsylvania, such organizations being designed to promote or protect the member states' interests, or which promote governmental financial excellence or accountability.State appropriation....... 1,327,000For transfer to the ABLE Savings Program Fund, for administration of the Pennsylvania ABLE Savings Program.State appropriation....... 1,500,000For information technology cyber security.State appropriation....... 1,350,000For payment of law enforcement and emergency response personnel death benefits.State appropriation....... 3,330,000For compensation of the Commonwealth's loan and transfer agent for services and expenses in connection with the 20260HB2400PN3765 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration, transfer and payment of interest on bonds of the Commonwealth and other services required to be performed by the loan and transfer agent.State appropriation....... 40,000For general obligation debt service or to pay all arbitrage rebates to the Federal Government required under section 148 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 148).State appropriation....... 1,482,610,000Section 207. Department of Aging.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Aging for the current fiscal year: Federal StateThe following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for aging services:(1) "Programs for the Aging - Title III - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 1,781,000(2) "Programs for the Aging - Title V - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 127,000(3) "Medical Assistance - 20260HB2400PN3765 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Administration."Federal appropriation..... 888,000(4) "Programs for the Aging - Title VII - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 1,166,000(5) "Programs for the Aging - Title III."Federal appropriation..... 60,271,000(6) "Programs for the Aging - Nutrition."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000(7) "Programs for the Aging - Title V - Employment."Federal appropriation..... 12,269,000(8) "Programs for the Aging - Title VII - Elder Rights Protection."Federal appropriation..... 8,600,000(9) (Reserved).(10) "Medical Assistance - Support."Federal appropriation..... 9,000,000(11) "Programs for the Aging - Title III - Caregiver Support."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000(12) "Pre-Admission Assessment."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000(13) "Chronic Disease Self-Management Education."20260HB2400PN3765 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 271,000Section 208. Department of Agriculture.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Agriculture for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Agriculture.State appropriation....... 50,433,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Pennsylvania Plant Pest Detection System."Federal appropriation..... 1,300,000(2) (Reserved).(3) "Medicated Feed Mill Inspection."Federal appropriation..... 71,000(4) "National School Lunch Administration."Federal appropriation..... 2,900,000(5) "Emergency Food Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 9,000,000In addition to the specific amounts appropriated in this act, 20260HB2400PN3765 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all other money received from the Federal Government for emergency food assistance are appropriated to such program.(6) (Reserved).(7) "Pesticide Enforcement, Certification, Training and Control Program."Federal appropriation..... 754,000(8) "Agricultural Risk Protection."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(9) "Commodity Supplemental Food."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000In addition to the specific amounts appropriated in this act, all other money received from the Federal Government for commodity supplemental food are appropriated to such program.(10) "Organic Cost Distribution."Federal appropriation..... 650,000(11) "Animal Disease Control."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000(12) "Food Establishment Inspections."Federal appropriation..... 3,646,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) "Integrated Pest Management."Federal appropriation..... 250,000(14) (Reserved).(15) "Avian Influenza Surveillance."Federal appropriation..... 25,000,000(16) (Reserved).(17) (Reserved).(18) "Scrapie Disease Control."Federal appropriation..... 60,000(19) "Foot and Mouth Disease Monitoring."Federal appropriation..... 150,000(20) (Reserved).(21) "Innovative Nutrient and Sediment Reduction."Federal appropriation..... 6,500,000(22) "Animal Identification."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(23) "Specialty Crops."Federal appropriation..... 3,500,000(24) "Emerald Ash Borer Mitigation."Federal appropriation..... 30,000(25) (Reserved).(26) "Farmland Protection."Federal appropriation..... 6,000,000(27) "Crop Insurance."20260HB2400PN3765 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(28) "Spotted Lanternfly."Federal appropriation..... 5,000,000(29) "Animal Feed Regulatory Program."Federal appropriation..... 225,000(30) "Conservation Partnership Farmland Preservation."Federal appropriation..... 6,500,000For agricultural preparedness and response.State appropriation....... 11,000,000For agricultural excellence programs.State appropriation....... 3,300,000For agricultural business and workforce investment.State appropriation....... 4,800,000For farmers market food coupons.State appropriation....... 9,579,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for farmers market food coupons:(1) "Farmers Market Food Coupons."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000(2) "Senior Farmers Market 20260HB2400PN3765 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Nutrition."Federal appropriation..... 2,200,000In addition to the specific amounts appropriated in this act, all other money received from the Federal Government for farmers market food coupons and senior farmers market nutrition are appropriated to such program.For agricultural research.State appropriation....... 2,187,000For agricultural promotion, education and exports.State appropriation....... 303,000For agricultural innovation development.State appropriation....... 19,000,000For hardwoods research and promotion.State appropriation....... 725,000For livestock and consumer health protection.State appropriation....... 1,000,000For the Animal Health and Diagnostic Commission.State appropriation....... 6,000,000For development and operation of an open livestock show, including cattle, swine, sheep and horses.20260HB2400PN3765 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 215,000For planning and staging of an open dairy show.State appropriation....... 215,000For youth shows.State appropriation....... 169,000For grants to counties for the purchase of food to be provided to needy persons in this Commonwealth. This amount includes up to $6,500,000 for the Pennsylvania Agricultural Surplus System Program, up to $1,000,000 for The Emergency Food Assistance Development Program, up to $500,000 for the cost of distributing TEFAP commodities to counties, and up to $1,000,000 for the Senior Food Box Program.State appropriation....... 30,688,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated for local and regional school food purchases:(1) (Reserved).The following Federal amounts are appropriated for product promotion and marketing:(1) "Market Improvement."Federal appropriation..... 250,000For food marketing and 20260HB2400PN3765 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 research.State appropriation....... 494,000For transfer from the General Fund to the Nutrient Management Fund.State appropriation....... 6,200,000For Fresh Food Financing Initiative.State appropriation....... 2,000,000For transfer from the General Fund to the Conservation District Fund.State appropriation....... 2,669,000For transfer from the General Fund to the Agricultural College Land Scrip Fund restricted account.State appropriation....... 57,710,000For transfer from the General Fund to the State Farm Products Show Fund.State appropriation....... 5,000,000For transfer from the General Fund to the Pennsylvania Preferred® Trademark and Pennsylvania Preferred Organic® Trademark Licensing Fund.State appropriation....... 2,905,000Section 209. Department of Community and Economic Development.The following amounts are 20260HB2400PN3765 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Community and Economic Development for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Community and Economic Development.State appropriation....... 28,586,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "ARC - State Technical Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(2) "DOE Weatherization - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 6,000,000(3) "IIJA - DOE - Weatherization Administration."Federal appropriation..... 12,000,000(4) "SCDBG - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000(4.1) "SCDBG - Neighborhood Stabilization - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 800,000(4.2) "SCDBG - Disaster Recovery Administration."20260HB2400PN3765 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 2,500,000(5) "CSBG - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(6) "LIHEABG - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(7) "Economic Adjustment Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(8) "SCDBG - HUD Special Projects."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(9) "Continuum of Care (CoC) Planning Grant."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000(10) "EMG Solutions Administration."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(11) "Federal Grant Initiatives."Federal appropriation..... 30,000,000(12) "ARC Area Development."Federal appropriation..... 15,000,000(13) "Recovery Housing Administration."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(14) "PRO Housing."Federal appropriation..... 20,000,000(15) "IRA - Industrial Decarbonization."20260HB2400PN3765 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000For the Center for Local Government Services.State appropriation....... 6,040,000For the Office of Open Records.State appropriation....... 4,984,000For BusinessPA.State appropriation....... 9,320,000For the Office of International Business Development.State appropriation....... 4,525,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Office of International Business Development:(1) "SBA State Trade and Export Promotion (STEP)."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000For the purpose of marketing to attract tourists to this Commonwealth.State appropriation....... 19,567,000For the purpose of marketing to attract business to this Commonwealth.State appropriation....... 1,320,000For the Pennsylvania Military 20260HB2400PN3765 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Community Enhancement Commission.State appropriation....... 608,000For transfer from the General Fund to the Municipalities Financial Recovery Revolving Aid Fund.State appropriation....... 5,500,000For transfer from the General Fund to the Ben Franklin Technology Development Authority Fund. Not less than 80% of this amount shall be provided to the Ben Franklin Technology Partners.State appropriation....... 17,000,000For Intergovernmental Cooperation Authority - third class cities.State appropriation....... 100,000For Pennsylvania First.State appropriation....... 38,000,000For Workforce and Economic Development Network.State appropriation....... 12,500,000For Municipal Assistance Program.State appropriation....... 2,000,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for Keystone Communities:20260HB2400PN3765 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) "DOE Weatherization."Federal appropriation..... 30,000,000(1.1) "IIJA - DOE - Weatherization Program."Federal appropriation..... 150,000,000(2) "LIHEABG - Weatherization Program." In addition to the specific amounts appropriated in this act, all other money received from the Federal Government for the weatherization portion of the LIHEAP Program, either through an increase in the regular program or pursuant to a Presidential release of contingency funds, are appropriated to this program.Federal appropriation..... 60,000,000(3) "SCDBG - Disaster Recovery Grant."Federal appropriation..... 70,000,000(4) "SCDBG - Neighborhood Stabilization Program."Federal appropriation..... 5,000,000(5) "EMG Solutions Program."Federal appropriation..... 12,000,000(6) "CSBG - Program."Federal appropriation..... 50,000,000(7) "SCDBG Program."Federal appropriation..... 6,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) "ARC Construction - RSBA Program."Federal appropriation..... 40,000,000(9) "Recovery Housing Program."Federal appropriation..... 5,000,000(10) "IIJA - Broadband Equity, Access and Development."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000,000(11) "IIJA - State Digital Equity Capacity."Federal appropriation..... 50,000,000(12) "IIJA - EPA Brownfields Revolving Loan Fund."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000For Main Street Matters.State appropriation....... 20,211,000For historically disadvantaged businesses.State appropriation....... 20,051,000For partnerships for regional economic performance.State appropriation....... 10,880,000For Foundations in Industry.State appropriation....... 5,000,000For Appalachian Regional Commission.State appropriation....... 325,000For Manufacturing PA.State appropriation....... 13,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For Strategic Management Planning Program.State appropriation....... 3,617,000For tourism promotion related to accredited zoos.State appropriation....... 1,000,000For the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Technology Assistance Program.State appropriation....... 2,500,000For Super Computer Center projects.State appropriation....... 500,000For powdered metals.State appropriation....... 100,000For a rural leadership training program.State appropriation....... 100,000For infrastructure and facilities improvement grants.State appropriation....... 10,000,000For America250PA.State appropriation....... 1,250,000For food access initiative.State appropriation....... 1,000,000For local government emergency housing support.State appropriation....... 2,500,000For PA SITES debt service.State appropriation....... 35,735,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 210. (Reserved).Section 211. Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.State appropriation....... 30,755,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Topographic and Geologic Survey Grants."Federal appropriation..... 2,500,000(2) "Federal Sentinel Landscape Program."Federal appropriation..... 300,000(3) "Land and Water Conservation Fund." In addition to the amount under this paragraph, any contingency funds made available to the Commonwealth under the Federal Land and Water Conservation Fund 20260HB2400PN3765 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Act of 1965 (Public Law 88-578, 16 U.S.C. § 460l-4 et seq.) are appropriated.Federal appropriation..... 20,000,000(4) (Reserved).(5) "Highlands Conservation Program."Federal appropriation..... 23,670,000(6) "Chesapeake Bay Gateway Network."Federal appropriation..... 600,000For State parks operations.State appropriation....... 76,909,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for State parks:(1) "Federal Lands Access Program."Federal appropriation..... 400,000(2) (Reserved).For State forests operations.State appropriation....... 55,708,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for State forests:(1) "Forest Fire Protection and Control."Federal appropriation..... 3,200,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) "IIJA - Forest Fire Protection and Control."Federal appropriation..... 2,086,000(3) "IIJA - Community Wildfire Defense Grant Program."Federal appropriation..... 900,000(4) "Forest Management and Processing."Federal appropriation..... 21,600,000(5) "IIJA - Forest Management and Processing."Federal appropriation..... 34,000,000(6) "Aid to Volunteer Fire Companies."Federal appropriation..... 542,000(7) "IIJA - Aid to Volunteer Fire Companies."Federal appropriation..... 1,800,000(8) "Wetland Protection Fund."Federal appropriation..... 400,000(9) "National Fish and Wildlife Foundation."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000(10) "EPA Chesapeake Bay Grant."Federal appropriation..... 6,000,000(11) "USDA Good Neighbor Agreement."Federal appropriation..... 800,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) "Cooperative Endangered Species."Federal appropriation..... 60,000For forest pest management.State appropriation....... 5,000,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for forest pest management:(1) "Forest Insect and Disease Control."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(2) "IIJA - Forest Insect and Disease Control."Federal appropriation..... 1,410,000For heritage parks.State appropriation....... 5,000,000For parks, forests and recreation projects.State appropriation....... 900,000For payment of annual fixed charges in lieu of taxes to counties and townships on land acquired for water conservation and flood control.State appropriation....... 65,000For payment of annual fixed charges in lieu of taxes to political subdivisions for school districts on lands acquired by 20260HB2400PN3765 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Commonwealth for Project 70.State appropriation....... 95,000For payment of annual fixed charges in lieu of taxes to counties, school districts and townships on forest lands.State appropriation....... 8,014,000For payment of annual fixed charges in lieu of taxes to counties, school districts and local municipalities on State park lands.State appropriation....... 388,000Section 212. Department of Corrections.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Corrections.State appropriation....... 42,764,000For medical care.State appropriation....... 448,432,000For correctional education and training.State appropriation....... 52,510,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement 20260HB2400PN3765 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the sum appropriated for correctional education and training:(1) "Correctional Education."Federal appropriation..... 859,000For the State correctional institutions.State appropriation....... 2,616,893,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the State correctional institutions:(1) "Reimbursement for Incarcerated Aliens."Federal appropriation..... 2,500,000(2) "Criminal Justice and Mental Health Collaboration."Federal appropriation..... 600,000(3) (Reserved).(4) "Adult Reentry Education, Employment and Treatment."Federal appropriation..... 700,000(5) "Pay for Success."Federal appropriation..... 844,000(6) "PREA Program: Strategic Support for PREA Implementation."Federal appropriation..... 52,000For State field supervision.State appropriation....... 188,218,000The following Federal amounts 20260HB2400PN3765 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the State field supervision:(1) "Smart Supervision."Federal appropriation..... 427,000(2) "Body-Worn Cameras."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000For Pennsylvania Parole Board.State appropriation....... 14,442,000For the Sexual Offenders Assessment Board.State appropriation....... 8,364,000For the Board of Pardons.State appropriation....... 2,823,000For Office of Victim Advocate.State appropriation....... 4,280,000Section 213. (Reserved).Section 214. Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.State appropriation....... 3,615,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general 20260HB2400PN3765 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 government operations:(1) "SUPTRSBG - Administration and Operation."Federal appropriation..... 12,964,000(2) "Substance Use Special Projects - Administration and Operation."Federal appropriation..... 3,750,000(3) "State Opioid Response Administration."Federal appropriation..... 5,677,000For assistance to drug and alcohol programs.State appropriation....... 44,732,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for assistance to drug and alcohol programs:(1) "SUPTRSBG - Drug and Alcohol Services."Federal appropriation..... 77,811,000(2) "Substance Use Special Projects Grants."Federal appropriation..... 21,250,000(3) "State Opioid Response."Federal appropriation..... 109,371,000Section 215. Department of Education.The following amounts are appropriated from the General 20260HB2400PN3765 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Fund to the Department of Education for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Education.State appropriation....... 46,317,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Adult Basic Education - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 2,400,000(2) "Education of Exceptional Children - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 13,000,000(3) "Special Education - State Personnel Development."Federal appropriation..... 2,900,000(4) "ESEA - Title I - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000(5) "State Approving Agency (Veterans Affairs)."Federal appropriation..... 2,100,000(6) "Food and Nutrition Service."Federal appropriation..... 21,000,000(7) "Migrant Education - 20260HB2400PN3765 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Administration."Federal appropriation..... 750,000(8) "Career and Technical Education - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 4,300,000(9) "Title II - Improving Teacher Quality - Administration/State."Federal appropriation..... 7,400,000(10) "Jacob K. Javits Gifted and Talented Students Education."Federal appropriation..... 1,300,000(11) "Homeless Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 6,500,000(12) "Preschool Grants."Federal appropriation..... 960,000(13) "School Health Education Programs."Federal appropriation..... 200,000(14) "Preschool Development Grants."Federal appropriation..... 26,000,000(15) (Reserved).(16) (Reserved).(17) (Reserved).(18) (Reserved).(19) "Medical Assistance - Nurses Aide Training."Federal appropriation..... 335,000(20) "State and Community 20260HB2400PN3765 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Highway Safety."Federal appropriation..... 2,750,000(21) (Reserved).(22) "Title IV - 21st Century Community Learning Centers - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000(23) "National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP)."Federal appropriation..... 300,000(24) "Migrant Education Coordination Program."Federal appropriation..... 130,000(25) (Reserved).(26) (Reserved).(27) "Student Support and Academic Enrichment - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 8,750,000(28) (Reserved).(29) (Reserved).(30) (Reserved).(31) (Reserved).For the Drug and Alcohol Recovery High School Program State share of tuition payments.State appropriation....... 509,000For information and technology improvement.State appropriation....... 4,710,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For PA assessment.State appropriation....... 51,844,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for PA assessment:(1) "Title VI - Part A State Assessment."Federal appropriation..... 13,500,000For the State Library, providing reference services and administering aid to public libraries.State appropriation....... 2,749,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the State Library:(1) "LSTA - Library Development."Federal appropriation..... 8,500,000For programs of education and training at youth development centers and the monitoring of programs of education and training provided to incarcerated juveniles.State appropriation....... 14,790,000For payment of basic education funding to school districts.20260HB2400PN3765 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 8,312,444,000For dual enrollment payments.State appropriation....... 7,000,000For transfer to Public School Facility Improvement Grant Program in the Commonwealth Financing Authority.State appropriation....... 125,000,000For the Ready-to-Learn Block Grant.State appropriation....... 1,948,481,000For transfer to School Safety and Security Fund for physical safety and mental health.State appropriation....... 100,000,000For the Pre-K Counts Program.State appropriation....... 334,313,000For Head Start Supplemental Assistance Program.State appropriation....... 92,964,000For teacher professional development.State appropriation....... 7,544,000For adult and family literacy programs, summer reading programs and the adult high school diplomas program.State appropriation....... 19,674,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement 20260HB2400PN3765 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the sum appropriated for adult and family literacy programs:(1) "Adult Basic Education - Local."Federal appropriation..... 24,200,000For career and technical education.State appropriation..... 158,451,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for career and technical education:(1) "Career and Technical Education Act - Local."Federal appropriation..... 53,000,000For career and technical education equipment grants.State appropriation..... 20,000,000For authority rentals and Sinking Fund requirements.State appropriation....... 209,423,000For payments on account of pupil transportation.State appropriation....... 752,636,000For payments on account of nonpublic and charter school transportation.State appropriation....... 64,468,000For payments on account of special education of exceptional 20260HB2400PN3765 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 children.State appropriation....... 1,576,815,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for special education:(1) "Individuals with Disabilities Education - Local."Federal appropriation..... 600,000,000For payments for early intervention services.State appropriation....... 504,505,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for payments for early intervention services:(1) "Individuals with Disabilities Education."Federal appropriation..... 20,000,000For payment for tuition to school districts providing education to nonresident orphaned children placed in private homes by the court and nonresident inmates of children's institutions.State appropriation....... 38,452,000For payments of annual fixed charges to school districts in lieu of taxes for land acquired 20260HB2400PN3765 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the Commonwealth for water conservation or flood prevention.State appropriation....... 179,000For payment for maintenance of summer schools for school-age children of migrant laborers, including child-care services.State appropriation....... 1,107,000For payments to Pennsylvania Chartered Schools for Deaf and Blind Children.State appropriation....... 82,580,000For special education - approved private schools.State appropriation....... 167,721,000For grants to school districts to assist in meeting Federal matching requirements for grants received under the Federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966 (Public Law 89-642, 42 U.S.C. § 1771 et seq.) and to aid in providing a food program for needy children.State appropriation....... 97,802,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for school food services:(1) "Food and Nutrition - Local."20260HB2400PN3765 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 1,725,820,000For payment of the Commonwealth's share of Federal Social Security taxes for certain public school employees.State appropriation....... 712,922,000For payment of required contribution for public school employees' retirement.State appropriation....... 3,336,000,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated for basic education:(1) "ESEA - Title I - Local."Federal appropriation..... 1,250,000,000(2) "Title II - Improving Teacher Quality - Local."Federal appropriation..... 85,000,000(3) "Title IV - 21st Century Community Learning Centers - Local."Federal appropriation..... 91,000,000(4) "Title III - Language Instruction for LEP and Immigrant Students."Federal appropriation..... 35,000,000(5) "Title VI - Rural and Low Income Schools - Local."Federal appropriation..... 2,200,000(6) "Student Support and 20260HB2400PN3765 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Academic Enrichment - Local."Federal appropriation..... 110,000,000(7) "School-based Mental Health Services."Federal appropriation..... 6,988,000(8) "America's School Infrastructure Grant."Federal appropriation..... 1,750,000For services to nonpublic schools.State appropriation....... 101,839,000For textbooks, instructional material and instructional equipment for nonpublic schools.State appropriation....... 30,979,000For a subsidy to public libraries.State appropriation....... 75,470,000For aid to the Free Library of Philadelphia and the Carnegie Library of Pittsburgh to meet the costs incurred in serving as regional libraries in the distribution of braille reading materials, talking book machines and other reading materials to persons who are blind or otherwise disabled.State appropriation....... 3,000,000For library access.20260HB2400PN3765 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 3,071,000For Safe Schools Initiative.State appropriation....... 1,614,000For safe driving course.State appropriation....... 326,000For community colleges.State appropriation....... 277,338,000For transfer from the General Fund to the Community College Capital Fund.State appropriation....... 54,161,000For regional community college services.State appropriation....... 2,221,000For Northern Pennsylvania Regional College.State appropriation....... 7,717,000For community education councils.State appropriation....... 2,489,000For hunger-free campus initiative.State appropriation....... 1,000,000For Parent Pathways.State appropriation....... 1,661,000For sexual assault prevention.State appropriation....... 1,500,000For transfer to State-related University Performance Fund.State appropriation....... 30,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 216. State System of Higher Education.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the State System of Higher Education for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the State System of Higher Education, including the Chancellor's Office.State appropriation....... 625,755,000Section 217. Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.State appropriation....... 23,600,000Section 218. Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor payment of education assistance grants.State appropriation....... 419,236,000For Pennsylvania internship program grants.20260HB2400PN3765 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 468,000For Ready-to-Succeed Scholarships.State appropriation....... 59,939,000For matching payments for student aid funds.State appropriation....... 13,646,000For institutional assistance grants to be allotted by the Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency.State appropriation....... 26,521,000For higher education for the disadvantaged.State appropriation....... 8,000,000For higher education for blind and deaf students.State appropriation....... 51,000For the Horace Mann Bond-Leslie Pinckney Hill Scholarship and for outreach and recruitment activities at Lincoln and Cheyney Universities related to the scholarship. This appropriation also contains funds for the continuation of support to students currently receiving equal opportunity professional education awards.State appropriation....... 1,832,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For the Cheyney University Honors Academy.State appropriation....... 5,980,000For Targeted Industry Cluster Scholarship Program.State appropriation....... 11,652,000For student teacher stipend.State appropriation....... 35,000,000For Grow PA Scholarships.State appropriation....... 32,500,000Section 219. Department of Environmental Protection.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Environmental Protection for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Environmental Protection.State appropriation....... 32,778,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations of the Department of Environmental Protection:(1) "IIJA - DOE - Energy Programs."Federal appropriation..... 22,300,000(2) "IIJA - Orphan Well 20260HB2400PN3765 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Plugging."Federal appropriation..... 195,000,000(3) "IIJA - Energy Efficiency and Conservation."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000(4) "IIJA - Assistance for Small and Disadvantaged Communities."Federal appropriation..... 103,189,000(5) "IIJA - Electric Grid Resilience."Federal appropriation..... 269,250,000(6) "IIJA - Methane Emissions Reduction Grant."Federal appropriation..... 20,000,000For environmental program management.State appropriation....... 48,012,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for environmental program management:(1) "Coastal Zone Management."Federal appropriation..... 4,700,000(1.1) "IIJA - Coastal Zone Management."Federal appropriation..... 8,454,000(1.2) "IRA - Coastal Zone Management."20260HB2400PN3765 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 376,000(2) "Construction Management Assistance Grants - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 1,400,000(3) "Storm Water Permitting Initiative."Federal appropriation..... 2,300,000(4) "Safe Drinking Water Act - Management."Federal appropriation..... 11,000,000(5) "Water Pollution Control Grants - Management."Federal appropriation..... 5,500,000(6) "Air Pollution Control Grants - Management."Federal appropriation..... 4,200,000(7) "Surface Mine Conservation - Management."Federal appropriation..... 6,500,000(8) "Wetland Protection Fund."Federal appropriation..... 840,000(9) "Diagnostic X-ray Equipment Testing."Federal appropriation..... 1,300,000(10) (Reserved).(11) "Water Quality Management Planning Grants."Federal appropriation..... 1,715,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11.1) "IIJA - Water Quality Management Planning Grants."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(12) "Small Operators Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 300,000(13) (Reserved).(14) "Indoor Radon Abatement."Federal appropriation..... 950,000(15) "Non-Point Source Implementation."Federal appropriation..... 15,300,000(16) "Survey Studies."Federal appropriation..... 6,000,000(17) (Reserved).(18) "National Dam Safety."Federal appropriation..... 1,500,000(19) "IIJA - National Dam Safety Program."Federal appropriation..... 550,000(20) "State Energy Program (SEP)."Federal appropriation..... 15,000,000(21) "Surface Mine Conservation."Federal appropriation..... 680,000(22) "Multipurpose Grants to States and Tribes."Federal appropriation..... 600,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (22.1) "Coal Combustion Residuals Grant."Federal appropriation..... 500,000(23) "IIJA - Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund."Federal appropriation..... 3,700,000(24) "IIJA - Resilient and Efficient Codes Implementation."Federal appropriation..... 6,000,000(25) "IIJA - Energy Auditor Training Grant."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(26) "IIJA - Solid Waste Infrastructure for Recycling."Federal appropriation..... 1,101,000(27) "IRA - Energy Performance - Homes Program."Federal appropriation..... 135,000,000(28) "IRA - Energy Performance - Electric Appliance."Federal appropriation..... 140,000,000(29) (Reserved).(30) (Reserved).(31) "IIJA - DOE Clean Energy Demonstration Projects."Federal appropriation..... 150,000,000(32) "IIJA - Advanced Energy Manufacturing."Federal appropriation..... 50,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (33) "IIJA - Hydroelectricity Development Programs."Federal appropriation..... 25,000,000(34) "IRA - Clean Air Act Grant."Federal appropriation..... 30,300,000(35) "IRA - DOE - Planning Grants/Other Capacity Building Funding."Federal appropriation..... 71,000,000(36) "IRA - EPA - Planning Grants/Other Capacity Building Funding."Federal appropriation..... 520,000,000(37) "IRA - EPA - Green Bank and Energy Financing Initiatives."Federal appropriation..... 100,000,000(38) "IRA - DOE - Clean Energy Demonstration Projects."Federal appropriation..... 150,000,000(39) "IRA - Transmission Siting and Economic Development Program."Federal appropriation..... 50,000,000(40) "IRA - Assistance for Latest and Zero Building Energy Code."Federal appropriation..... 16,000,000(41) "IRA - Solar For All."20260HB2400PN3765 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 166,120,000For Chesapeake Bay agricultural abatement.State appropriation....... 6,393,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for Chesapeake Bay Pollution agricultural abatement:(1) "Chesapeake Bay Pollution Abatement."Federal appropriation..... 23,000,000(2) "IIJA - Chesapeake Bay."Federal appropriation..... 15,933,000For environmental protection operations.State appropriation....... 137,787,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for environmental protection operations:(1) "EPA - Planning Grant - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 8,400,000(2) "Water Pollution Control Grants."Federal appropriation..... 8,900,000(3) "Air Pollution Control Grants."20260HB2400PN3765 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 6,800,000(4) "Surface Mine Control and Reclamation."Federal appropriation..... 15,000,000(5) "Training and Education of Underground Coal Miners."Federal appropriation..... 1,700,000(6) (Reserved).(7) "Safe Drinking Water."Federal appropriation..... 5,700,000(8) "Oil Pollution Spills Removal."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(9) "USDA Good Neighbor Authority."Federal appropriation..... 200,000(10) "IIJA - USDA Good Neighbor Authority."Federal appropriation..... 18,500,000(11) "IIJA - Brownfields."Federal appropriation..... 6,000,000For black fly control and research.State appropriation....... 9,428,000For vector borne disease management.State appropriation....... 7,619,000For transfer to Well Plugging Account.State appropriation....... 19,026,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For transfer to Hazardous Sites Cleanup Fund.State appropriation....... 20,000,000For Delaware River master.State appropriation....... 38,000For Susquehanna River Basin Commission.State appropriation....... 740,000For Interstate Commission on the Potomac River Basin.State appropriation....... 23,000For Delaware River Basin Commission.State appropriation....... 217,000For Ohio River Valley Water Sanitation Commission.State appropriation....... 68,000For Chesapeake Bay Commission.State appropriation....... 370,000For transfer to the Conservation District Fund.State appropriation....... 8,494,000For Interstate Mining Commission.State appropriation....... 15,000Section 220. Department of General Services.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of General Services for the current fiscal 20260HB2400PN3765 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of General Services.State appropriation....... 79,822,000For administration and operation of the Capitol Police.State appropriation....... 20,021,000For rental, relocation and municipal charges.State appropriation....... 21,694,000For space optimization and utilization improvements.State appropriation....... 16,138,000For utility costs, including implementation of third-party shared savings programs.State appropriation....... 29,323,000For excess insurance coverage.State appropriation....... 4,500,000For transfer to the Insurance Fund.State appropriation....... 1,500,000For fire protection services for the Capitol complex in Harrisburg.State appropriation....... 7,000,000Section 221. Department of Health.The following amounts are appropriated from the General 20260HB2400PN3765 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Fund to the Department of Health for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Health.State appropriation....... 35,408,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "WIC - Administration and Operation."Federal appropriation..... 43,268,000(2) "Health Assessment."Federal appropriation..... 752,000(3) "PHHSBG - Administration and Operation."Federal appropriation..... 5,150,000(4) "MCHSBG - Administration and Operation."Federal appropriation..... 16,659,000(5) (Reserved).(6) "EMS for Children."Federal appropriation..... 331,000(7) "TB - Administration and Operation."Federal appropriation..... 1,592,000(8) "Lead - Administration and Operation."Federal appropriation..... 1,100,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) "AIDS Health Education - Administration and Operation."Federal appropriation..... 8,098,000(10) "Primary Care Cooperative Agreements."Federal appropriation..... 510,000(11) "HIV/AIDS Surveillance."Federal appropriation..... 687,000(12) "HIV Care Administration and Operation."Federal appropriation..... 645,000(13) "Cancer Prevention and Control."Federal appropriation..... 7,879,000(14) "Environmental Public Health Tracking."Federal appropriation..... 2,504,000(15) "Special Preparedness Initiatives."Federal appropriation..... 400,000(16) "State Loan Repayment Program."Federal appropriation..... 1,320,000For health promotion and disease prevention.State appropriation....... 7,496,000For quality assurance.State appropriation....... 33,522,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement 20260HB2400PN3765 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the sum appropriated for quality assurance:(1) "Medicare - Health Service Agency Certification."Federal appropriation..... 14,100,000(2) "Medicaid Certification."Federal appropriation..... 11,300,000For health innovation.State appropriation....... 813,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for vital statistics:(1) "Cooperative Health Statistics."Federal appropriation..... 3,439,000(2) "Health Statistics."Federal appropriation..... 104,000(3) "Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance System."Federal appropriation..... 1,300,000For the State Laboratory.State appropriation....... 7,232,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the State Laboratory:(1) "Clinical Laboratory Improvement."Federal appropriation..... 816,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) "Epidemiology and Laboratory Surveillance and Response."Federal appropriation..... 6,710,000For the State Health Care Centers.State appropriation....... 35,188,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the State health care centers:(1) "Disease Control Immunization Program."Federal appropriation..... 12,150,000(2) "PHHSBG - Block Program Services."Federal appropriation..... 8,055,000(3) "Preventive Health Special Projects."Federal appropriation..... 2,789,000(4) "Collaborative Chronic Disease Programs."Federal appropriation..... 4,422,000(5) "Sexual Violence Prevention and Education."Federal appropriation..... 1,857,000(6) "Live Healthy."Federal appropriation..... 4,953,000For sexually transmitted disease screening and treatment.20260HB2400PN3765 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 2,154,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for sexually transmitted disease screening and treatment:(1) "Survey and Follow-up - Sexually Transmitted Diseases."Federal appropriation..... 4,243,000For the Achieving Better Care by Monitoring All Prescriptions Program.State appropriation....... 3,148,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Achieving Better Care By Monitoring All Prescriptions Program:(1) "Prescription Drug Monitoring."Federal appropriation..... 13,866,000For diabetes programs.State appropriation....... 112,000For primary health care practitioners.State appropriation....... 8,350,000For community-based health care subsidy.State appropriation....... 2,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For screening of newborns.State appropriation....... 7,329,000For cancer screening services.State appropriation....... 2,563,000For AIDS programs and special pharmaceutical services.State appropriation....... 10,436,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for AIDS programs and special pharmaceutical services:(1) "AIDS Health Education Program."Federal appropriation..... 1,375,000(2) "AIDS - Ryan White and HIV Care."Federal appropriation..... 48,355,000(3) "Housing for Persons with AIDS."Federal appropriation..... 5,018,000For regional cancer institutes.State appropriation....... 2,000,000For reimbursement to school districts on account of health services.State appropriation....... 37,620,000For maintenance of local health departments.20260HB2400PN3765 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 36,265,000For local health departments for environmental health services.State appropriation....... 2,697,000For maternal and child health services.State appropriation....... 1,447,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for maternal and child health services:(1) "MCH Lead Poisoning Prevention and Abatement."Federal appropriation..... 2,400,000(2) (Reserved).(3) "MCHSBG - Program Services."Federal appropriation..... 20,833,000(4) "Special Supplemental Food Service Program for Women, Infants and Children (WIC)." In addition to the specific amounts appropriated in this act, all other money received from the Federal Government for the Special Supplemental Food Service Program for Women, Infants and Children are appropriated to the program.20260HB2400PN3765 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 277,910,000(5) "Abstinence Education."Federal appropriation..... 3,731,000(6) "Traumatic Brain Injury."Federal appropriation..... 485,000(7) "Family Health Special Projects."Federal appropriation..... 4,207,000(8) "Screening Newborns."Federal appropriation..... 1,798,000(9) "Newborn Hearing Screening and Intervention."Federal appropriation..... 337,000(10) "Teenage Pregnancy Prevention."Federal appropriation..... 4,677,000For tuberculosis screening and treatment.State appropriation....... 1,084,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for tuberculosis screening and treatment:(1) "Tuberculosis Control Program."Federal appropriation..... 49,000For renal dialysis services.State appropriation....... 6,678,000For services to children with 20260HB2400PN3765 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 special needs.State appropriation....... 1,728,000For adult cystic fibrosis and other chronic respiratory illnesses.State appropriation....... 795,000For diagnosis and treatment for Cooley's anemia.State appropriation....... 106,000For hemophilia services.State appropriation....... 1,017,000For lupus programs.State appropriation....... 106,000For sickle cell anemia services, including camps for children with sickle cell anemia. State appropriation....... 1,335,000For Lyme disease.State appropriation....... 3,180,000For regional poison control centers.State appropriation....... 742,000For trauma prevention.State appropriation....... 488,000For epilepsy support services.State appropriation....... 583,000For Tourette's syndrome.State appropriation....... 159,000For amyotrophic lateral sclerosis support services.20260HB2400PN3765 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 1,501,000For neurodegenerative disease research.State appropriation....... 5,000,000Section 222. Department of Human Services.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Human Services for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Human Services.State appropriation....... 163,689,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Medical Assistance - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 41,327,000(2) (Reserved).(3) "SNAP - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 7,321,000(4) "TANFBG - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 12,864,000(5) "CCDFBG - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 39,128,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) "Child Welfare - Title IV-E - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 13,009,000(7) "Child Welfare Services - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 999,000(8) (Reserved).(9) "Developmental Disabilities - Basic Support."Federal appropriation..... 4,813,000(10) "Disabled Education - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 1,140,000(11) "Early Head Start Expansion Program."Federal appropriation..... 2,500,000(12) "MCH - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 265,000(13) "MHSBG - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 1,465,000(14) "Rural Health Transformation Program Restricted Account - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000(15) "Refugees and Persons Seeking Asylum - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 3,085,000(16) (Reserved).For information systems.20260HB2400PN3765 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 109,130,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for information systems:(1) "Medical Assistance - Information Systems."Federal appropriation..... 159,675,000(2) (Reserved).(3) "SNAP - Information Systems."Federal appropriation..... 36,194,000(4) "TANFBG - Information Systems."Federal appropriation..... 19,531,000(5) "Child Welfare - Title IV-E - Information Systems."Federal appropriation..... 21,580,000(6) "Child Support Enforcement - Information Systems."Federal appropriation..... 9,917,000(7) "CHIP - Information Systems."Federal appropriation..... 16,869,000For Statewide operations related to county administration of the public assistance and medical assistance programs.State appropriation....... 79,232,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for Statewide operations related to county administration of the public assistance and medical assistance programs:(1) "Medical Assistance - Statewide."Federal appropriation..... 77,555,000(2) "SNAP - Statewide."Federal appropriation..... 49,894,000(3) "TANFBG - Statewide."Federal appropriation..... 1,072,000(4) "Children's Health Insurance Administration."Federal appropriation..... 3,444,000For county assistance office operations related to administration of the public assistance and medical assistance programs.State appropriation....... 455,709,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for county assistance office operations related to administration of the public assistance and medical assistance programs:20260HB2400PN3765 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) "Medical Assistance - County Assistance Offices."Federal appropriation..... 218,435,000(2) "TANFBG - County Assistance Offices."Federal appropriation..... 39,825,000(3) "CHIP - County Assistance Offices."Federal appropriation..... 17,269,000(4) "SNAP - County Assistance Offices."Federal appropriation..... 139,357,000(5) "SSBG - County Assistance Offices."Federal appropriation..... 3,000,000(6) "LIHEABG - Administration and Audit Costs." In addition to the specific amounts appropriated in this act, all other money received from the Federal Government for the administration of the LIHEAP Program, either through an increase in the regular program or pursuant to a Presidential release of contingency funds, are appropriated to the LIHEAP Program.Federal appropriation..... 36,368,000For child support enforcement.20260HB2400PN3765 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 19,445,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for child support enforcement:(1) "Child Support Enforcement Program - Title IV-D."Federal appropriation..... 208,865,000For New Directions.State appropriation....... 26,706,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for New Directions:(1) "TANFBG - New Directions."Federal appropriation..... 142,150,000(2) "Medical Assistance - New Directions."Federal appropriation..... 15,485,000(3) "SNAP - New Directions."Federal appropriation..... 23,033,000(4) "CHIP - New Directions."Federal appropriation..... 1,091,000For youth development institutions and forestry camps.State appropriation....... 145,601,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement 20260HB2400PN3765 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the sum appropriated for youth development institutions:(1) "SSBG - Basic Institutional Programs."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000(2) "Food Nutrition Services."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000For mental health services, including grants to counties or other county-based human services included under the Human Services Block Grant Program, exclusive of capital improvements.State appropriation....... 1,003,276,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for mental health services:(1) "Medical Assistance - Mental Health."Federal appropriation..... 237,588,000(2) (Reserved).(3) "Medicare Services - State Hospitals."Federal appropriation..... 14,500,000(4) "Homeless Mentally Ill."Federal appropriation..... 3,310,000(5) "MHSBG - Community Mental Health Services."20260HB2400PN3765 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 55,829,000(6) "SSBG - Community Mental Health Services."Federal appropriation..... 10,366,000(7) "Mental Health Data Infrastructure."Federal appropriation..... 250,000(8) (Reserved).(9) (Reserved).(10) "Collaborative Care Model."Federal appropriation..... 1,500,000(11) "Systems of Care Expansion."Federal appropriation..... 3,000,000(12) "Youth Suicide Prevention."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000(13) "Adolescents and Young Adults at High Risk for Psychosis."Federal appropriation..... 621,000(14) "Transforming the Crisis Mental Health System."Federal appropriation..... 20,000,000For intellectual disabilities - State centers.State appropriation....... 110,114,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement 20260HB2400PN3765 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the sum appropriated for intellectual disabilities - State centers:(1) "Medical Assistance - State Centers."Federal appropriation..... 146,094,000(2) "Medicare Services - State Centers."Federal appropriation..... 247,000For cash assistance grants, including employment and training and supportive services for cash assistance recipients.State appropriation....... 24,635,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for cash assistance:(1) "TANFBG - Cash Grants."Federal appropriation..... 142,407,000(2) "Other Federal Support - Cash Grants."Federal appropriation..... 15,211,000(3) "Summer EBT."Federal appropriation..... 175,000,000(4) "LIHEABG - Program." In addition to the specific amounts appropriated in this act, all other money received from the Federal Government for the LIHEAP 20260HB2400PN3765 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Program, either through an increase in the regular program or pursuant to a Presidential release of contingency funds, are appropriated to the LIHEAP Program.Federal appropriation..... 231,550,000(5) "Refugees and Persons Seeking Asylum - Social Services."Federal appropriation..... 60,303,000For supplemental grants to aged, blind and disabled persons.State appropriation....... 113,842,000For medical assistance payments - capitation plans. For provision of outpatient services and inpatient hospital services to eligible persons enrolled in an approved capitation plan.State appropriation....... 4,358,991,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance - capitation plans:(1) "Medical Assistance - Capitation."Federal appropriation..... 16,575,288,000For primary health care and preventive services for eligible 20260HB2400PN3765 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical assistance recipients in the fee-for-service delivery system.State appropriation....... 731,161,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for eligible medical assistance recipients in the fee-for-service delivery system:(1) "Medical Assistance - Fee-For-Service."Federal appropriation..... 2,254,228,000(2) "Rural Health Transformation."Federal appropriation..... 200,000,000For payment to the Federal Government for the Medicare Drug Program.State appropriation....... 1,129,538,000For medical assistance - workers with disabilities.State appropriation....... 113,524,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance - workers with disabilities.(1) "Medical Assistance - Workers with Disabilities."20260HB2400PN3765 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 131,888,000For medical assistance payments to qualifying university-affiliated physician practice plans.State appropriation....... 4,000,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance payments to qualifying university-affiliated physician practice plans:(1) "Medical Assistance - Physician Practice Plans."Federal appropriation..... 5,392,000For medical assistance payments - hospital-based burn centers.State appropriation....... 4,438,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance payments - hospital-based burn centers:(1) "Medical Assistance - Hospital-based Burn Centers."Federal appropriation..... 5,983,000For medical assistance payments - obstetrics and neonatal services.20260HB2400PN3765 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 10,682,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance payments - obstetrics and neonatal services:(1) "Medical Assistance - Obstetrics and Neonatal Services."Federal appropriation..... 18,443,000For medical assistance payments - trauma centers.State appropriation....... 8,657,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance payments - trauma centers:(1) "Medical Assistance - Trauma Centers."Federal appropriation..... 11,670,000For medical assistance payments to academic medical centers.State appropriation....... 24,681,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance payments to academic medical centers:20260HB2400PN3765 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) "Medical Assistance - Academic Medical Centers."Federal appropriation..... 33,270,000For medical assistance - transportation.State appropriation....... 70,117,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance - transportation:(1) "Medical Assistance - Transportation."Federal appropriation..... 93,546,000For women's service programs.State appropriation....... 8,263,000For Children's Health Insurance Program.State appropriation....... 104,257,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for Children's Health Insurance Program:(1) "Children's Health Insurance Program."Federal appropriation..... 354,105,000For medical assistance - long-term living.State appropriation....... 188,464,000The following Federal amounts 20260HB2400PN3765 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for long-term living:(1) "Medical Assistance - Long-term Living."Federal appropriation..... 190,724,000For Medical Assistance - Community HealthChoices.State appropriation....... 7,231,075,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for Community HealthChoices:(1) "Medical Assistance - Community HealthChoices."Federal appropriation..... 11,333,265,000For long-term care - managed care.State appropriation....... 188,826,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for long-term care - managed care.(1) "Medical Assistance - Long-term Care - Managed Care."Federal appropriation..... 251,092,000For intellectual disabilities - community-based program, which shall include grants to counties for noninstitutional programs, or 20260HB2400PN3765 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other county-based human services included under the Human Services Block Grant Program, exclusive of capital improvements.State appropriation....... 174,981,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the intellectual disabilities - community-based program:(1) "Medical Assistance - Community ID Services."Federal appropriation..... 101,683,000(2) "Autism Spectrum Disorder Surveillance Program."Federal appropriation..... 448,000(3) "SSBG - Community ID Services."Federal appropriation..... 5,651,000For intellectual disabilities - intermediate care facilities.State appropriation....... 178,667,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for ID/ICF:(1) "Medical Assistance - ID/ICF."Federal appropriation..... 291,659,000For intellectual disabilities - community waiver program.20260HB2400PN3765 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 2,783,366,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for intellectual disabilities - community waiver program:(1) "Medical Assistance - Community ID Waiver Program."Federal appropriation..... 3,415,795,000For services to persons with autism spectrum disorders, including oversight, supportive services and provider training.State appropriation....... 35,311,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for services to persons with autism spectrum disorders:(1) "Medical Assistance - Autism Intervention Services."Federal appropriation..... 49,843,000For behavioral health services or other county-based human services included under the Human Services Block Grant Program.State appropriation....... 57,149,000For special pharmaceutical services for atypical antipsychotic drug therapy for 20260HB2400PN3765 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 persons residing in the community who suffer from schizophrenia.State appropriation....... 400,000For payments and services to counties for children and youth programs and for the care of delinquent and dependent children. This appropriation funding level is sufficient for an aggregate child welfare needs-based budget allocation for the current fiscal year at $2,612,669,688. The department may use up to $40,544,450 of this appropriation to fund contracts for adoption services. The department may also use funds from this appropriation for assistance to counties in meeting Federal reimbursement documentation requirements.State appropriation....... 1,494,733,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for payments and services to counties for children and youth programs and child abuse and neglect prevention:(1) "Child Welfare Services."20260HB2400PN3765 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 41,611,000(2) "Child Welfare - Title IV-E."Federal appropriation..... 468,984,000(3) (Reserved).(4) "Medical Assistance - Child Welfare."Federal appropriation..... 3,828,000(5) "TANFBG - Child Welfare."Federal appropriation..... 58,508,000(6) "SSBG - Child Welfare."Federal appropriation..... 12,021,000(7) "Child Welfare Training and Certification."Federal appropriation..... 23,534,000(8) "Community-based Family Resource and Support."Federal appropriation..... 344,000(9) "Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment."Federal appropriation..... 12,515,000(10) "Title IV-B - Caseworker Visits."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000(11) "Children's Justice Act."Federal appropriation..... 1,555,000For community-based family centers.State appropriation....... 34,558,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for community-based family centers:(1) "Family Preservation - Family Centers."Federal appropriation..... 2,691,000(2) "Family Resource and Support - Family Centers."Federal appropriation..... 3,269,000(3) "Title IV-B - Family Centers."Federal appropriation..... 5,871,000(4) "MCH - Early Childhood Home Visiting."Federal appropriation..... 18,358,000(5) "Early Childhood Comprehensive Systems."Federal appropriation..... 330,000For child-care services.State appropriation....... 300,286,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for child-care services:(1) "TANFBG - Child-care Services."Federal appropriation..... 358,647,000(2) "CCDFBG - Child-care Services."20260HB2400PN3765 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 483,685,000(3) "SSBG - Child-care Services."Federal appropriation..... 30,977,000(4) "Head Start Collaboration Project."Federal appropriation..... 505,000For child care recruitment and retention.State appropriation....... 35,000,000For the child-care assistance program.State appropriation....... 124,876,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the child-care assistance program:(1) "TANFBG - Child-care Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 108,835,000(2) "CCDFBG - Child-care Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 82,102,000(3) "SNAP - Child-care Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 3,080,000For the Nurse Family Partnership program.State appropriation....... 13,889,000The following Federal amounts 20260HB2400PN3765 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Nurse Family Partnership program:(1) "Medical Assistance - Nurse Family Partnership."Federal appropriation..... 3,916,000For early intervention services.State appropriation....... 193,217,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for early intervention services:(1) "Medical Assistance - Early Intervention."Federal appropriation..... 101,069,000(2) "Education for Children with Disabilities - Early Intervention."Federal appropriation..... 17,305,000For domestic violence programs.State appropriation....... 23,063,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for domestic violence programs:(1) "Family Violence Prevention Services."Federal appropriation..... 5,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) "SSBG - Domestic Violence Programs."Federal appropriation..... 5,705,000For rape crisis programs.State appropriation....... 12,171,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for rape crisis programs:(1) "SSBG - Rape Crisis."Federal appropriation..... 1,721,000For breast cancer screening.State appropriation....... 1,828,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for breast cancer screening:(1) "SSBG - Family Planning."Federal appropriation..... 2,000,000For the Human Services Development Fund.State appropriation....... 13,460,000For legal services.State appropriation....... 6,661,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for legal services:(1) "SSBG - Legal Services."Federal appropriation..... 5,049,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For provision of services to the homeless or other county-based human services included under the Human Services Block Grant Program.State appropriation....... 23,496,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for services to the homeless:(1) "SSBG - Homeless Services."Federal appropriation..... 4,183,000For 211 communications.State appropriation....... 1,000,000For services for the visually impaired.State appropriation....... 4,702,000Section 223. (Reserved).Section 224. Department of Labor and Industry.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Labor and Industry for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Labor and Industry.State appropriation....... 17,339,000The following Federal amounts 20260HB2400PN3765 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 11,000,000(2) (Reserved).(3) (Reserved).(4) "Community Service and Corps."Federal appropriation..... 19,000,000(5) "Disability Determination."Federal appropriation..... 164,838,000(6) "New Hires."Federal appropriation..... 1,701,000For occupational and industrial safety.State appropriation....... 6,811,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for occupational and industrial safety:(1) "Lead Certification and Accreditation."Federal appropriation..... 494,000For occupational disease payments.20260HB2400PN3765 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 106,000For transfer from the General Fund to the Vocational Rehabilitation Fund for work of the State Board of Vocational Rehabilitation.State appropriation....... 49,718,000For supported employment.State appropriation....... 397,000For centers for independent living, including independent living services purchased by Office of Vocational Rehabilitation district offices.State appropriation....... 2,634,000To carry out the provisions of section 306(h) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.State appropriation....... 131,000For assistive technology financing.State appropriation....... 1,000,000For assistive technology demonstration and training.State appropriation....... 850,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated for employment services:(1) "Reed Act - Unemployment 20260HB2400PN3765 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Insurance." For administrative expenses of the unemployment insurance program.Federal appropriation..... 2,500,000(2) "Reed Act - Employment Services and Unemployment Insurance."(a) For administrative expenses of the public employment offices and unemployment insurance program, including staff and related costs to provide reemployment services to unemployment claimants to enhance the public employment service and PA CareerLink service delivery systems and to train and give technical assistance and professional development to staff who deliver employment and workforce services.(b) For administrative expenses of the unemployment insurance program, including improvements to the unemployment insurance program's information processing and telecommunications systems and applications; staffing; service contracts and technology to address the 20260HB2400PN3765 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unemployment compensation program appeals workload; and interest payments on loans.Federal appropriation..... 2,500,000(3) (Reserved).(4) "WIOA - Adult Employment and Training."Federal appropriation..... 50,000,000(5) (Reserved).(6) "WIOA - Youth Employment and Training."Federal appropriation..... 84,000,000(7) (Reserved).(8) "WIOA - Statewide Activities."Federal appropriation..... 30,000,000(9) (Reserved).(10) "WIOA - Dislocated Workers."Federal appropriation..... 109,000,000(11) "TANFBG - Youth Employment and Training."Federal appropriation..... 25,000,000For New Choices/New Options.State appropriation....... 1,000,000For industry partnerships.State appropriation....... 6,313,000For schools-to-work.State appropriation....... 7,000,000For apprenticeship training.20260HB2400PN3765 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 10,000,000Section 225. Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.The following sums are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.State appropriation....... 41,161,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Facilities Maintenance."Federal appropriation..... 120,000,000(2) "Federal Construction Grants."Federal appropriation..... 80,000,000For Keystone State Challenge Academy.State appropriation....... 2,749,000For armory maintenance and repair.State appropriation....... 3,965,000For honor guards for burials of veterans.State appropriation....... 187,000For American battle monuments.20260HB2400PN3765 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 50,000For special State duty.State appropriation....... 200,000For the operation and maintenance of the veterans homes.State appropriation....... 131,219,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the veterans homes:(1) "Operations and Maintenance."Federal appropriation..... 124,000,000(2) "Medical Reimbursements."Federal appropriation..... 250,000(3) "Enhanced Veterans Reimbursement."Federal appropriation..... 38,000,000For payment of gratuities for the education of children of certain veterans.State appropriation....... 425,000For transfer from the General Fund to the Educational Assistance Program Fund.State appropriation....... 14,525,000For pensions for veterans blinded through service-connected injuries or disease.20260HB2400PN3765 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 222,000To provide for pensions for amputee and paralyzed veterans as required by 51 Pa.C.S. § 7702 (relating to amputee and paralyzed veteran's pension).State appropriation....... 5,040,000For payment of pensions to dependents of soldiers of the Pennsylvania National Guard killed in the line of duty.State appropriation....... 5,000For supplemental life insurance premiums.State appropriation....... 164,000For grants for disabled American veterans' transportation.State appropriation....... 336,000For veterans outreach services.State appropriation....... 4,901,000For the Civil Air Patrol.State appropriation....... 120,000Section 226. Department of Revenue.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Revenue for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government 20260HB2400PN3765 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 operations of the Department of Revenue.State appropriation....... 167,990,000For technology and process modernization.State appropriation....... 12,435,000For the distribution of public utility realty tax.State appropriation....... 35,491,000Section 227. Department of State.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of State for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of State.State appropriation....... 10,264,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Federal Election Reform."Federal appropriation..... 4,300,000(2) "Occupational Licensing."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000For the Statewide uniform registry of electors.State appropriation....... 20,594,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For voter registration and education programs.State appropriation....... 1,998,000For lobbying disclosure.State appropriation....... 622,000For costs related to absentee voting by persons in military services.State appropriation....... 20,000For Election Code debt service.State appropriation....... 9,236,000Section 228. Department of Transportation.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Transportation for the current fiscal year: Federal StateThe following Federal amounts are appropriated for rail freight and intermodal coordination:(1) (Reserved).(2) "Federal Transit Administration - Capital Improvement Grants."Federal appropriation..... 39,000,000(3) (Reserved).(4) "Surface Transportation - Operating."Federal appropriation..... 32,500,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) "Surface Transportation - Assistance."Federal appropriation..... 975,000(6) "Surface Transportation Assistance Capital."Federal appropriation..... 52,000,000(7) "FTA - Keystone Corridor Equipment and Purchases."Federal appropriation..... 70,000,000(8) "FTA - Safety Oversight."Federal appropriation..... 8,000,000(9) "FTA - Hybrid Mass Transit Vehicles."Federal appropriation..... 30,000,000(10) "FTA - Urbanized Formula."Federal appropriation..... 635,000(11) "FRA - State of Good Repair."Federal appropriation..... 30,000,000For costs related to the collection of vehicle sales tax.State appropriation....... 441,000For costs related to voter registration with driver licensing.State appropriation....... 1,268,000For transfer to the Aviation Restricted Account.State appropriation....... 1,600,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 229. Pennsylvania State Police.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Pennsylvania State Police for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Pennsylvania State Police.State appropriation....... 1,243,810,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Area Computer Crime."Federal appropriation..... 16,455,000For law enforcement information technology.State appropriation....... 34,140,000For the Statewide Public Safety Radio Network.State appropriation....... 28,488,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Statewide Public Safety Radio Network:(1) "Broadband Network Planning."Federal appropriation..... 4,050,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For the Municipal Police Officers' Education and Training Commission, including in-service training.State appropriation....... 3,555,000For municipal police training grants.State appropriation....... 5,000,000For commercial vehicle inspections.State appropriation....... 15,572,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for motor carrier safety:(1) "Motor Carrier Safety."Federal appropriation..... 10,269,000(2) "IIJA - Motor Carrier Safety."Federal appropriation..... 9,500,000For patrol vehicles.State appropriation....... 15,600,000For Multi-Biometric Identification System.State appropriation....... 885,000For gun checks.State appropriation....... 8,905,000Section 230. (Reserved).Section 231. Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency.The following amounts are 20260HB2400PN3765 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriated from the General Fund to the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency.State appropriation....... 17,567,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "IIJA - State and Local Cybersecurity."Federal appropriation..... 16,000,000(2) "Civil Preparedness."Federal appropriation..... 100,000,000(3) "Hazardous Materials Planning and Training."Federal appropriation..... 2,500,000(4) "Regional Events Security and Support."Federal appropriation..... 5,000,000For the Office of the State Fire Commissioner.State appropriation....... 4,800,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Office of the State Fire 20260HB2400PN3765 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commissioner:(1) "Fire Prevention."Federal appropriation..... 20,000For search and rescue programs.State appropriation....... 250,000For firefighters' memorial flags.State appropriation....... 10,000For Red Cross Extended Care Program.State appropriation....... 350,000For hazard mitigation.State appropriation....... 3,000,000For disaster relief.State appropriation....... 10,000,000For State disaster assistance.State appropriation....... 5,000,000Section 232. Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission.State appropriation....... 24,508,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement 20260HB2400PN3765 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Historic Preservation."Federal appropriation..... 3,150,000(2) "Surface Mining Review."Federal appropriation..... 180,000(3) "Environmental Review."Federal appropriation..... 428,000(4) "American Battlefield Protection Program."Federal appropriation..... 6,000,000(5) (Reserved).For cultural and historical support.State appropriation....... 2,000,000Section 233. (Reserved).Section 234. Environmental Hearing Board.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Environmental Hearing Board for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Environmental Hearing Board.State appropriation....... 3,059,000Section 235. (Reserved).Section 236. Health Care Cost Containment Council.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Health Care Cost Containment 20260HB2400PN3765 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Council for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Health Care Cost Containment Council.State appropriation....... 4,934,000Section 237. State Ethics Commission.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the State Ethics Commission for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the general government operations of the State Ethics Commission as allocated by resolution adopted by a majority of the members appointed to the State Ethics Commission.State appropriation....... 4,118,000SUBPART BJUDICIAL DEPARTMENTSection 241. Supreme Court.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Supreme Court for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Supreme Court: including the salaries of the Supreme Court justices, for the office of prothonotary and for the library in the Eastern District 20260HB2400PN3765 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and Western District, for the office of prothonotary in the Middle District, for criers, tipstaves, official stenographers, court officers and the law secretary of the Chief Justice in Eastern, Middle and Western Districts and workers' compensation insurance premiums for all Supreme Court employees not funded by other appropriations, for the office of State reporters, including the salaries and compensation of employees, including the fees for prothonotaries of the Supreme Court of the Eastern, Middle and Western Districts on assignment to judges to counties other than their own, and further including assessments for the National Center of State Courts.State appropriation....... 24,320,000For vouchered expenses for justices.State appropriation....... 118,000For judicial center operations.State appropriation....... 1,298,000For the judicial council for the unified judicial system.20260HB2400PN3765 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 141,000For Unified Judicial System cybersecurity and disaster recovery.State appropriation....... 3,490,000For district court administrators for the unified judicial system.State appropriation....... 32,673,000For the Commission for Fairness and Justice.State appropriation....... 509,000For court management education for the unified judicial system.State appropriation....... 78,000For Rules Committees.State appropriation....... 1,945,000For the Court Administrator of Pennsylvania, including the expenses of the Judicial Council of Pennsylvania and the District Justice Administrator.State appropriation....... 17,760,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Court Administrator:(1) "Court Improvement Project."Federal appropriation..... 1,400,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For the Integrated Criminal Justice System.State appropriation....... 3,521,000For the unified judicial system security program.State appropriation....... 2,783,000For the Office of Elder Justice in the Courts.State appropriation....... 531,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for the Office of Elder Justice in the Courts:(1) "Elder Justice Innovation."Federal appropriation..... 1,000,000Section 242. Superior Court.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Superior Court for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries and expenses of the Superior Court: including the salary of the Superior Court judges, for panelization of judges program, for criers, tipstaves, official stenographers, court officers and law secretary of the president judge and workers' compensation insurance premiums 20260HB2400PN3765 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for all employees of the Superior Court, for the prothonotary's office in the Philadelphia District, including salaries and compensation for employees, including the expenses of dockets, stationery, supplies, books for the library and other costs of the Superior Court and its offices.State appropriation....... 45,339,000For vouchered expenses for active judges.State appropriation....... 183,000Section 243. Commonwealth Court.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to Commonwealth Court for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries of judges and for the salaries and expenses of employees.State appropriation....... 29,264,000For vouchered expenses for active judges.State appropriation....... 132,000Section 244. Courts of common pleas.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the courts of common pleas for the current fiscal year: Federal State20260HB2400PN3765 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For the courts of common pleas: including the salaries and expenses of judges, including the expenses of traveling judges, including the mileage in divided judicial districts, and the payment of a per diem salary, mileage and miscellaneous expenses to active visiting judges for the performance of their official duties.State appropriation....... 165,126,000For senior judges.State appropriation....... 4,480,000For common pleas judicial education.State appropriation....... 1,593,000For treatment courts.State appropriation....... 1,425,000Section 245. Community courts - magisterial district judges.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the community courts and magisterial district judges for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries and expenses of community court judges and magisterial district judges.State appropriation....... 119,179,000For magisterial district 20260HB2400PN3765 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 judges' education.State appropriation....... 1,025,000Section 246. (Reserved).Section 247. Philadelphia Municipal Court.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Philadelphia Municipal Court for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries and expenses of judges and hearing officers, including the traffic division.State appropriation....... 11,027,000Section 248. Judicial conduct.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund for judicial conduct for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor salaries and expenses of the Judicial Conduct Board.State appropriation....... 2,970,000For salaries and expenses of the Judicial Ethics Advisory Board.State appropriation....... 369,000For salaries and expenses of the Court of Judicial Discipline.State appropriation....... 618,000Section 249. Juror cost reimbursement.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund 20260HB2400PN3765 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for juror cost reimbursement for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor juror cost reimbursement.State appropriation....... 1,118,000Section 250. County court reimbursement.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund for court costs for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor payment to counties as reimbursement for costs incurred by counties in the administration and operation of courts of common pleas during the calendar year which immediately precedes the beginning of the current fiscal year.State appropriation....... 23,136,000For senior judge operational support grants.State appropriation....... 1,375,000For payment to counties as reimbursement for costs incurred by counties for court interpreter services.State appropriation....... 2,629,000SUBPART CGENERAL ASSEMBLYSection 261. Senate.The following amounts are 20260HB2400PN3765 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriated from the General Fund to the Senate for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the following purposes:Salaries of Senators.State appropriation....... 9,493,000Salaries, wages and other personnel expenses of employees of the Chief Clerk and all necessary expenditures to be allocated and disbursed at the direction of the President pro tempore.State appropriation....... 3,686,000Salaries, wages and other personnel expenses of employees of the Senate and expenses of the office of the President pro tempore, including member lodging rental, to be disbursed at the direction of the President pro tempore.State appropriation....... 17,005,000Incidental expenses for payment of salaries, wages, other personnel expenses, maintenance and other expenses of the Senate.State appropriation....... 3,851,000The above appropriations for 20260HB2400PN3765 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incidental expenses shall be paid prior to the payment of such expenses on warrant of the State Treasurer in favor of the Chief Clerk upon the presentation of requisitions for the same provided that the total amount of requisitions for advancements, less the total amount of expenditures made as certified by such officer to the State Treasurer, shall not exceed the amount of the bond of the officer having control of the disbursement from the funds advanced.Miscellaneous expenses: Mileage and expenses, Senators: In addition to the annual allocation for expenses authorized by law for each member of the Senate, each member shall receive an annual allocation in an amount established by the Senate Committee on Management Operations for actual expenses incurred for lodging and meals while away from home on official legislative business, official postage and all other expenses incidental to legislative duties as provided for 20260HB2400PN3765 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in the Financial Operating Rules of the Senate. Upon presentation of requisitions by the Chief Clerk for such expenses, such requisitions shall be paid on warrant of the State Treasurer directly to and in favor of the persons designated in such requisitions as entitled to receive such payments.State appropriation....... 1,517,000Legislative purchasing and expenses: For furniture, technology improvements, restorations, security enhancements, North Office Building modernization, equipment, renovations, personnel expenses and other expenses.State appropriation....... 8,619,000Upon presentation of requisitions by the Chief Clerk against the appropriations for legislative purchasing and expenses, such shall be paid on warrant of the State Treasurer directly to and in favor of the persons designated in such requisitions as entitled to receive such payments.20260HB2400PN3765 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Expenses of the Committee on Appropriations (R) and the Committee on Appropriations (D): For investigating schools, colleges, universities, correctional institutions, mental hospitals, medical and surgical hospitals, homes and other institutions and agencies supported, in whole or in part, by appropriations from the State Treasury in analyzing reports, expenditures and the general operation and administration of the institutions and agencies, in examining and analyzing requests of the same and of the various departments, boards and commissions of the Commonwealth, and for the collection of data from other states, attending seminars and conferences and in cooperating and exchanging information with legislative budget and financial committees of other states, and for the necessary travel expenses, and all other expenses deemed necessary by the chair (R) or the chair (D), as appropriate, or for salary, wages 20260HB2400PN3765 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and other personnel expenses deemed appropriate by the respective caucus staff administrator in compiling data and information connected with the work of the Senate in compiling comparative costs and other fiscal data and information for the use of the committee and the Senate during legislative sessions and during the interim between legislative sessions to the discharge of such duties. The committee, upon authorization of the majority chair, shall have the authority to examine and inspect all properties, equipment, facilities, files, records and accounts of any State office, department, institution, board, committee, commission or agency or any institution or agency supported, in whole or in part, by appropriation from the State Treasury and to administer oaths. The Committee on Appropriations may issue subpoenas under the hand and seal of the majority chair to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers, 20260HB2400PN3765 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 books, accounts, documents and testimony touching matters properly being inquired into by the committee and to cause the deposition of witnesses either residing within or without the State to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for taking depositions in civil actions. Upon presentation of requisitions by the Chief Clerk for such expenses, such shall be paid on warrant of the State Treasurer directly to and in favor of the persons designated in such requisition as entitled to receive such compensation or expenses. The sum appropriated shall be divided equally by the State Treasurer and shall be deposited in separate accounts for the Committee on Appropriations (R) and the Committee on Appropriations (D).State appropriation....... 3,229,000Caucus Operations Account (R) and the Caucus Operations Account (D): For payment of salaries, wages and all other incidental expenses incurred in hiring personnel and staff for services 20260HB2400PN3765 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which, in the opinion of the Floor Leader (R) or the Floor Leader (D) as may be appropriate, may be required or arise during legislative sessions and during the interim between legislative sessions and for the payment of all other expenses, including member lodging rental, related to the performance of Senate duties and responsibilities. Upon presentation of requisitions by the Chief Clerk, such shall be paid on warrant of the State Treasurer directly to and in favor of the persons designated in such requisition as entitled to receive such compensation or expenses. The entire sum appropriated shall be divided by the State Treasurer in amounts to be determined by a unanimous vote of the Executive Committee of the Senate Committee on Management Operations or in the absence of a unanimous vote of the Executive Committee then by a majority vote of the Senate Committee on Management Operations and such amounts shall be deposited into the Caucus 20260HB2400PN3765 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Operations (R) and Caucus Operations (D) Accounts.State appropriation....... 98,610,000All appropriations made in this act or in any other fiscal year to any account of the minority caucus of the Senate remaining unexpended and unencumbered on the effective date of this part may be transferred by the Committee on Management Operations, by a vote of two-thirds of its members, in its discretion to such Senate accounts as the committee deems necessary. All other appropriations made in this act or any other fiscal year to any other account of the Senate remaining unexpended and unencumbered on the effective date of this part may be transferred by the Committee on Management Operations, by a majority vote of its members. Such power to transfer appropriations shall be limited to the current fiscal year.Section 262. House of Representatives.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the House of Representatives 20260HB2400PN3765 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the following purposes:Representatives' compensation, extra compensation to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and leaders of the House of Representatives and other necessary expenses.State appropriation....... 42,230,000For caucus operations. For allocation in such amounts as may be designated by the Legislative Management Committee (R) and the Legislative Management Committee (D) for payment of salaries, wages and all other compensation and necessary expenses incurred in hiring personnel and staff for services in the furtherance of the operations of the House of Representatives as may be appropriate, required or arise during legislative sessions and during the interim between legislative sessions. Of the sum appropriated, the State Treasurer shall deposit $79,062,880 in the Caucus Operations Account (D) and 20260HB2400PN3765 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $72,981,120 in the Caucus Operations Account (R). Upon presentation of requisitions by the Chief Clerk of the House for such compensation or expenses, such shall be paid on warrant of the State Treasurer directly to and in favor of the persons designated in such requisitions as entitled to receive such compensation or expenses. An accounting, together with supporting documents whenever possible, shall be filed in the Office of the Chief Clerk of such expenses since the filing of the prior account.State appropriation....... 152,044,000For the operation of the Speaker's Office.State appropriation....... 1,910,000For Bipartisan Management Committee, Chief Clerk, Comptroller and the Commonwealth Emergency Medical System.State appropriation....... 18,880,000For mileage: Representatives, officers and employees.State appropriation....... 672,000For postage: Chief Clerk and 20260HB2400PN3765 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Legislative Journal.State appropriation....... 2,816,000For contingent expenses (R) and (D). The sum appropriated shall be allocated to the officers and members in the same manner and proportion as appropriations for contingent expenses contained in section 252 of the act of July 4, 2004 (P.L.1837, No.7A), known as the General Appropriation Act of 2004.State appropriation....... 1,118,000The above appropriations for postage and for contingent expenses shall be paid prior to the payment of such expenses on warrant of the State Treasurer in favor of the officers above named upon the presentation of their requisitions for the same, provided that the total amount of requisitions for advancements, less the total amount of expenditures made as certified by such officers to the State Treasurer, shall not exceed the amount of the bond of the officer having control of the disbursement from the funds advanced.20260HB2400PN3765 - 148 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Miscellaneous expenses: Incidental expenses.State appropriation....... 7,569,000Expenses - Representatives: In addition to annual reimbursement for expenses heretofore authorized by law for each member of the House of Representatives, each member shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual expenses, not exceeding the sum of $12,500 annually, incurred for lodging and meals while away from home on official legislative business, home office expenses, official postage, staff and all other expenses incidental to legislative duties.State appropriation....... 4,251,000Legislative printing and expenses.State appropriation....... 14,413,000For the payment of the expenses of the Committee on Appropriations (R) of the House of Representatives in investigating schools, colleges, universities, correctional institutions, mental hospitals, medical and surgical hospitals, homes and other 20260HB2400PN3765 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 institutions and agencies supported, in whole or in part, by appropriations from the State Treasury in analyzing reports, expenditures and the general operation and administration of the institutions and agencies in examining and analyzing requests of the same and of the various departments, boards and commissions of the Commonwealth, and for the collection of data from other states, attending seminars and conferences, and in cooperating and exchanging information with legislative budget and financial committees of other states, and any office expenses necessary to serve the committee and its chair, and for the necessary clerical assistance and other assistance, travel expenses and all other expenses deemed necessary by the chair in compiling data and information connected with the work of the committee in compiling comparative cost and other fiscal data and information for the use of the committee and the House of 20260HB2400PN3765 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Representatives during legislative sessions and during the interim between legislative sessions to the discharge of such duties. The committee shall have the authority to examine and inspect all properties, equipment, facilities, files, records and accounts of any State office, department, institution, board, committee, commission or agency or any institution or agency supported, in whole or in part, by appropriation from the State Treasury and to administer oaths. The sum appropriated shall be paid on warrant of the State Treasurer in favor of the chair of the committee on the presentation of his requisition for the same. The chair of the Committee on Appropriations (R) shall, not later than 30 days after the termination of his term of office or until his successor is elected and also within 30 days after the adjournment of any regular or special session, file an account, together with supporting documents whenever possible, in the office 20260HB2400PN3765 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the Committee on Appropriations (R), of the committee's expenses since the filing of the prior account.State appropriation....... 3,616,000For the payment of the expenses of the Committee on Appropriations (D) of the House of Representatives in investigating schools, colleges, universities, correctional institutions, mental hospitals, medical and surgical hospitals, homes and other institutions and agencies supported, in whole or in part, by appropriations from the State Treasury in analyzing reports, expenditures, and the general operation and administration of the institutions and agencies in examining and analyzing requests of the same and of the various departments, boards and commissions of the Commonwealth and for the collection of data from other states, attending seminars and conferences, and in cooperating and exchanging information with legislative budget and financial committees of 20260HB2400PN3765 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other states, and any office expenses necessary to serve the committee and its chair, and for the necessary clerical assistance, and other assistance, travel expenses and all other expenses deemed necessary by the chair in compiling data and information connected with the work of the committee in compiling comparative cost and other fiscal data and information for the use of the committee and the House of Representatives during legislative sessions and during the interim between legislative sessions to the discharge of such duties. The committee shall have the authority to examine and inspect all properties, equipment, facilities, files, records and accounts of any State office, department, institution, board, committee, commission or agency or any institution or agency supported, in whole or in part, by appropriation from the State Treasury and to administer oaths. The sum appropriated shall be paid on warrant of the State Treasurer 20260HB2400PN3765 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in favor of the chair of the Committee on Appropriations (D) on the presentation of his requisition for the same. The chair of the Committee on Appropriations (D) shall, not later than 30 days after the termination of his term of office or until his successor is elected and also within 30 days after the adjournment of any regular or special session, file an account, together with supporting documents whenever possible, in the office of the Committee on Appropriations (D) of the House of Representatives, of his expenses since the filing of the prior account.State appropriation....... 3,616,000The Committee on Appropriations may issue subpoenas under the hand and seal of the majority chair to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of any papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony touching matters properly being inquired into by the committee and to cause the deposition of witnesses either 20260HB2400PN3765 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residing within or without the State to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for taking depositions in civil actions.For the payment to the Special Leadership Account (R) for payment of salaries, wages and all other incidental expenses incurred in hiring personnel and staff or for services, which, in the opinion of the Floor Leader, may be required or arise during legislative sessions and during the interim between legislative sessions and for the payment of all other expenses related to the performance of his duties and responsibilities. The sum appropriated shall be paid on warrant of the State Treasurer in favor of the Floor Leader on the presentation of his requisition for the same. The Floor Leader shall, not later than 30 days after the termination of his term of office or until his successor is elected and also within 30 days after the adjournment of any regular or special session, file an account, together with 20260HB2400PN3765 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supporting documents whenever possible, in the office of the Floor Leader, of such expenses since the filing of the prior account.State appropriation....... 7,186,000For the payment to the Special Leadership Account (D) for payment of salaries, wages and all other incidental expenses incurred in hiring personnel and staff or for services which, in the opinion of the Floor Leader, may be required or arise during legislative sessions and during the interim between legislative sessions and for the payment of all other expenses related to the performance of his duties and responsibilities. The sum appropriated shall be paid on warrant of the State Treasurer in favor of the Floor Leader on the presentation of his requisition for the same. The Floor Leader shall, not later than 30 days after the termination of his term of office or until his successor is elected and also within 30 days after the adjournment of any 20260HB2400PN3765 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regular or special session, file an account, together with supporting documents whenever possible, in the office of the Floor Leader, of such expense since the filing of the prior account.State appropriation....... 7,186,000All appropriations made in this act or in any other fiscal year to any account of the House of Representatives remaining unexpended and unencumbered on the effective date of this part, may be transferred by the authority responsible for administering the account, in its discretion, to such House accounts as that responsible authority deems necessary. Such power to transfer appropriations shall be limited to the current fiscal year.SUBPART DGOVERNMENT SUPPORT AGENCIESSection 271. Legislative Reference Bureau.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Legislative Reference Bureau for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all 20260HB2400PN3765 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary expenses for the work of the Legislative Reference Bureau, including the Code and Bulletin section.State appropriation....... 11,000,000For the Pennsylvania Bulletin and Pennsylvania Code and related expenses.State appropriation....... 1,100,000For contingent expenses.State appropriation....... 25,000Section 272. Legislative Budget and Finance Committee.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the work of the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee.State appropriation....... 2,270,000Section 273. Legislative Data Processing Committee.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Legislative Data Processing Committee for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor salaries, wages, other personnel expenses, operating 20260HB2400PN3765 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 costs, contracts, equipment, software, other incidental expenses and costs associated with the operation of the Legislative Data Processing Center, including an allocation of $2,309,000 to each of the Senate Republican and Democratic Caucus computer services departments for the payment of operating costs, contracts, equipment, software, other incidental expenses and costs at the direction of the respective caucus staff administrator, and an allocation of $9,500,000 to the House of Representatives Democratic Caucus Computer Services Account, and an allocation of $9,500,000 to the House of Representatives Republican Caucus Computer Services Account for the payment of operating costs, contracts, equipment, software, other incidental expenses and costs and an allocation of $400,000 to each of the Senate Republican and Democratic caucuses for committee and contingent expenses to be allocated in amounts determined by unanimous agreement of the 20260HB2400PN3765 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 executive committee of the Senate Committee on Management Operations, and an allocation of $400,000 to each of the House of Representatives Democratic and Republican Caucuses for costs associated with caucus operations and an allocation of $4,460,000 to the House of Representatives Democratic Caucus for disbursement by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.State appropriation....... 37,755,000For information technology modernization.State appropriation....... 5,100,000Section 274. Joint State Government Commission.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Joint State Government Commission for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the work of the Joint State Government Commission.State appropriation....... 1,951,000Section 275. Local Government Commission.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund 20260HB2400PN3765 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the Local Government Commission for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all expenses necessary for the work of the Local Government Commission.State appropriation....... 1,283,000For the compilation and distribution of various municipal codes.State appropriation....... 24,000Section 276. (Reserved).Section 277. Legislative Audit Advisory Commission.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Legislative Audit Advisory Commission for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all expenses necessary for the work of the Legislative Audit Advisory Commission.State appropriation....... 285,000Section 278. Independent Regulatory Review Commission.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Independent Regulatory Review Commission for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the work of 20260HB2400PN3765 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Independent Regulatory Review Commission.State appropriation....... 2,530,000Section 279. Capitol Preservation Committee.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Capitol Preservation Committee for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the operation of the Capitol Preservation Committee.State appropriation....... 1,827,000For the restoration of the Capitol and its artifacts, including support facilities and services.State appropriation....... 3,157,000Section 280. Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing.State appropriation....... 3,053,000Section 281. Center for Rural Pennsylvania.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Center for Rural 20260HB2400PN3765 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Center for Rural Pennsylvania.State appropriation....... 1,250,000Section 282. Commonwealth Mail Processing Center.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Commonwealth Mail Processing Center for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor salaries, wages, other personnel expenses, operating costs, contracts, equipment, software, other incidental expenses and costs associated with the operation of the Commonwealth Mail Processing Center, including an allocation of $1,040,000 to the Chief Clerk of the Senate for payment of postage and communication expenses as determined by the Senate Committee on Management Operations.State appropriation....... 3,583,000Section 283. Independent Fiscal Office.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Independent Fiscal Office for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all 20260HB2400PN3765 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expenses necessary for the work of the Independent Fiscal Office, including up to $200,000 for pension actuarial analysis.State appropriation....... 2,343,000PART IIISTATE LOTTERY FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 301. Department of Aging.The following amounts are appropriated from the State Lottery Fund to the Department of Aging for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Aging.State appropriation....... 20,930,000For PENNCARE for older Pennsylvanians for the purpose of developing, operating and purchasing services for the aged and other adults, including, but not limited to, model projects, community care services, audits of area agencies on aging, protective services and counseling services.State appropriation....... 299,262,000For preadmission assessment.State appropriation....... 8,750,000For caregiver support.State appropriation....... 12,103,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For transfer from the State Lottery Fund to the Pharmaceutical Assistance Fund.State appropriation....... 155,000,000For Alzheimer's outreach.State appropriation....... 250,000For grants to senior centers.State appropriation....... 3,000,000For Aging Our Way, PA.State appropriation....... 5,950,000Section 302. Department of Human Services.The following amounts are appropriated from the State Lottery Fund to the Department of Human Services for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor medical assistance - transportation services.State appropriation....... 4,000,000For medical assistance - Community HealthChoices.State appropriation....... 440,000,000PART IVTOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 401. Department of Community and Economic Development.The following amounts are appropriated from the Tobacco Settlement Fund to the Department of Community and Economic Development for the current fiscal 20260HB2400PN3765 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year: Federal StateFor life sciences greenhouses.State appropriation....... 3,000,000Section 402. Department of Human Services.The following amounts are appropriated from the Tobacco Settlement Fund to the Department of Human Services for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor medical assistance - Community HealthChoices.State appropriation....... 131,402,000PART VJUDICIAL COMPUTER SYSTEM AUGMENTATION ACCOUNTAPPROPRIATIONSSection 501. Supreme Court.The following amounts are appropriated from the Judicial Computer System Augmentation Account to the Supreme Court for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Statewide judicial computer system.State appropriation....... 46,181,000PART VIEMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES OPERATING FUNDAPPROPRIATIONSSection 601. Department of Health.The following amounts are appropriated from the Emergency 20260HB2400PN3765 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Medical Services Operating Fund to the Department of Health for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor emergency medical services.State appropriation....... 18,123,000For Catastrophic Medical and Rehabilitation Program.State appropriation....... 4,800,000PART VIISTATE STORES FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 701. Pennsylvania State Police.The following amounts are appropriated from the State Stores Fund to the Pennsylvania State Police for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor liquor control enforcement operational expenses.State appropriation....... 40,241,000PART VIIIMOTOR LICENSE FUND APPROPRIATIONSSUBPART AMOTOR LICENSE FUNDSection 801. Department of Transportation.The following amounts are appropriated from the Motor License Fund to the Department of Transportation for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the proper 20260HB2400PN3765 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administration of the Department of Transportation, including the State Transportation Commission and the State Transportation Advisory Committee and the Statewide coordination of municipal services.State appropriation....... 95,556,000For operation of welcome centers.State appropriation....... 4,971,000For the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the operation of the highway and safety improvement programs, including planning and research, design, engineering, right-of-way acquisition and the operation of the engineering district facilities and liaison services with communities on local road engineering and construction activities.State appropriation....... 450,000,000For the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the administration and operation of the maintenance program for State roads, bridges, tunnels and structures, including the operation of the county maintenance district 20260HB2400PN3765 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilities.State appropriation....... 1,199,588,000For highway systems technology and innovation.State appropriation....... 25,000,000For reinvestment in Department of Transportation facilities.State appropriation....... 16,500,000For the salaries, wages and all necessary expenses for the administration of the traffic safety program and the administration and operation of the operator and vehicle registration programs.State appropriation....... 283,850,000For payments to municipalities pursuant to the act of June 1, 1956 (1955 P.L.1944, No.655), referred to as the Liquid Fuels Tax Municipal Allocation Law.State appropriation....... 30,000,000For payments to municipalities to assist in maintenance and construction costs of roads.State appropriation....... 231,937,000For supplemental payments to municipalities to assist in maintenance and construction costs of roads in accordance with 75 20260HB2400PN3765 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93 (relating to supplemental funding for municipal highway maintenance).State appropriation....... 5,000,000For maintenance and construction of county bridges. An allocation to a county under this appropriation may be used in whole or in part by the county for grants to municipalities for distribution in accordance with 75 Pa.C.S. § 9010(c) (relating to disposition and use of tax).State appropriation....... 5,000,000For municipal traffic signals.State appropriation....... 40,000,000Section 802. (Reserved).Section 803. Treasury Department.The following amounts are appropriated from the Motor License Fund to the Treasury Department for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the payment of salaries, wages and all necessary expenses in the proper administration of the program to refund liquid fuels taxes to which the Commonwealth is not entitled.State appropriation....... 615,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For the payment of principal and interest requirements on general obligation bonds issued for transportation projects.State appropriation....... 37,965,000For payment of principal and interest requirements on general obligation bonds issued for public improvements.State appropriation....... 21,190,000For payment of the compensation of the Commonwealth's loan and transfer agent for services and expenses in connection with the registration, transfer and payment of interest on bonds of the Commonwealth and other services required to be performed by the loan and transfer agent.State appropriation....... 40,000Section 804. Department of Agriculture.The following amounts are appropriated from the Motor License Fund to the Department of Agriculture for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor administration of the weights and measures program.State appropriation....... 5,908,000For the State Conservation 20260HB2400PN3765 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commission for the maintenance and improvement of dirt and gravel roads.State appropriation....... 28,000,000Section 805. (Reserved).Section 806. Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.The following amounts are appropriated from the Motor License Fund to the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the maintenance and mitigation of dust and sediment pollution from forestry roads.State appropriation....... 7,000,000Section 807. (Reserved).Section 808. (Reserved).Section 809. Department of General Services.The following amounts are appropriated from the Motor License Fund to the Department of General Services for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor payment of tort claims.State appropriation....... 9,000,000Section 810. Department of Revenue.The following amounts are appropriated from the Motor License Fund to the Department of Revenue for the current fiscal year: Federal State20260HB2400PN3765 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For administration and enforcement of various Motor License Fund tax regulations.State appropriation....... 20,000,000Section 811. Pennsylvania State Police.The following amounts are appropriated from the Motor License Fund to the Pennsylvania State Police for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations.State appropriation....... 250,000,000SUBPART BAVIATION RESTRICTED ACCOUNTSection 821. Department of Transportation.The following amounts are appropriated from the Aviation Restricted Account to the Department of Transportation for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor payment for aviation operations, including the operation and maintenance of State-owned aircraft, payment of general expenses, supplies, printing and equipment; for the development and maintenance of State airports and the maintenance and repair of landing fields, intermediate landing fields, landing field 20260HB2400PN3765 - 173 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment, beacon sites and other navigation facilities; and for the encouragement and development of civil aeronautics.State appropriation....... 4,989,000For airport development.State appropriation....... 6,000,000For real estate tax rebate payments to privately owned public-use airports.State appropriation....... 250,000PART IXHAZARDOUS MATERIAL RESPONSE FUNDAPPROPRIATIONSSection 901. Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency.The following amounts are appropriated from the Hazardous Material Response Fund to the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general administration and operational expenses.State appropriation....... 75,000For training programs for hazardous material response teams.State appropriation....... 75,000For grants to support counties' activities.State appropriation....... 900,000For public and facility owner 20260HB2400PN3765 - 174 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education.State appropriation....... 50,000PART XMILK MARKETING FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 1001. Pennsylvania Milk Board.The following amounts are appropriated from the Milk Marketing Fund to the Pennsylvania Milk Board for the current fiscal year:Federal StateFor the operation of the Pennsylvania Milk Board.State appropriation....... 2,947,000PART XIHOME INVESTMENT TRUST FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 1101. Department of Community and Economic Development.The following amounts are appropriated from the Home Investment Trust Fund to the Department of Community and Economic Development for the current fiscal year: Federal StateThe following Federal amounts are appropriated for the administration of the Affordable Housing Act:(1) "Affordable Housing Act - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 4,000,000PART XII20260HB2400PN3765 - 175 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TUITION ACCOUNT GUARANTEED SAVINGSPROGRAM FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 1201. Treasury Department.The following amounts are appropriated from the Tuition Account Guaranteed Savings Program Fund to the Treasury Department for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the operation of the Tuition Account Program Bureau.State appropriation....... 3,339,000PART XIIIBANKING FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 1301. Department of Banking and Securities.The following amounts are appropriated from the Banking Fund to the Department of Banking and Securities for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Department of Banking and Securities.State appropriation....... 26,250,000PART XIVFIREARM RECORDS CHECK FUNDAPPROPRIATIONSSection 1401. Pennsylvania State Police.The following amounts are appropriated from the Firearm Records Check Fund to the 20260HB2400PN3765 - 176 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania State Police for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor activities associated with the purchase of firearms by individuals.State appropriation....... 4,300,000PART XVBEN FRANKLIN TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENTAUTHORITY FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 1501. Department of Community and Economic Development.The following amounts are appropriated from the Ben Franklin Technology Development Authority Fund to the Department of Community and Economic Development for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the Ben Franklin Technology Development Authority Fund.State appropriation....... 17,500,000PART XVIOIL AND GAS LEASE FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 1601. Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.The following amounts are appropriated from the Oil and Gas Lease Fund to the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations.State appropriation....... 28,500,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 177 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 For State parks operations.State appropriation....... 32,000,000For State forests operations.State appropriation....... 28,500,000PART XVIIHOME IMPROVEMENT ACCOUNT APPROPRIATIONSSection 1701. Attorney General.The following amounts are appropriated from the Home Improvement Account to the Attorney General for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor home improvement consumer protection.State appropriation....... 2,901,000PART XVIIICIGARETTE FIRE SAFETY ANDFIREFIGHTER PROTECTION ACTENFORCEMENT FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 1801. Attorney General.The following amounts are appropriated from the Cigarette Fire Safety and Firefighter Protection Act Enforcement Fund to the Attorney General for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor cigarette fire safety and firefighter protection enforcement.State appropriation....... 50,000PART XIX20260HB2400PN3765 - 178 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INSURANCE REGULATION ANDOVERSIGHT FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 1901. Insurance Department.The following amounts are appropriated from the Insurance Regulation and Oversight Fund to the Insurance Department for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor general government operations of the Insurance Department.State appropriation....... 44,281,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to the Insurance Department:(1) "For Insurance Market Reform."Federal appropriation..... 5,000,000PART XXPENNSYLVANIA RACE HORSE DEVELOPMENTRESTRICTED RECEIPTS ACCOUNT APPROPRIATIONSSection 2001. Department of Agriculture.The following amounts are appropriated from the Pennsylvania Race Horse Development Restricted Receipts Account to the Department of Agriculture for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor Animal Health and 20260HB2400PN3765 - 179 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Diagnostic Commission.State appropriation....... 5,350,000For the Pennsylvania Veterinary Laboratory System.State appropriation....... 5,309,000For payments to Pennsylvania fairs.State appropriation....... 4,000,000PART XXI(Reserved)PART XXIIMULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION FUND APPROPRIATIONS(Reserved)PART XXIIISTATE RACING FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 2301. Department of Agriculture.The following amounts are appropriated from the State Racing Fund to the Department of Agriculture for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the State Horse Racing Commission.State appropriation....... 8,371,000For the Pennsylvania Equine Toxicology and Research Laboratory.State appropriation....... 15,649,000For horse racing promotion.State appropriation....... 1,857,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 180 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2302. Department of Revenue.The following amounts are appropriated from the State Racing Fund to the Department of Revenue for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor administration of racing revenue collections.State appropriation....... 281,000PART XXIVABLE SAVINGS PROGRAM FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 2401. Treasury Department.The following amounts are appropriated from the ABLE Savings Program Fund to the Treasury Department for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor the operation of the Pennsylvania ABLE Savings Program.State appropriation....... 1,426,000PART XXVTOURISM PROMOTION FUND RESTRICTED ACCOUNT APPROPRIATIONSSection 2501. Department of Community and Economic Development.The following amounts are appropriated from the Tourism Promotion Fund Restricted Account to the Department of Community and Economic Development for the 20260HB2400PN3765 - 181 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 current fiscal year: Federal StateFor marketing to attract tourists.State appropriation....... 11,000,000PART XXVIENHANCED REVENUE COLLECTION ACCOUNTAPPROPRIATIONS(Reserved)PART XXVIIPENNVEST DRINKING WATER REVOLVING FUNDAPPROPRIATIONSSection 2701. Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority.The following amounts are appropriated from the PENNVEST Drinking Water Revolving Fund to the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority for the current fiscal year: Federal StateThe following Federal amounts are appropriated to the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority:(1) "Drinking Water Projects Revolving Loan Fund."Federal appropriation..... 43,000,000(1.1) "IIJA - Drinking Water Projects Revolving Loan Fund."Federal appropriation..... 500,000,000(2) "Loan Program Administration."20260HB2400PN3765 - 182 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal appropriation..... 1,500,000(2.1) "IIJA - Loan Program Administration."Federal appropriation..... 15,485,000(3) "Technical Assistance to Small Systems."Federal appropriation..... 1,750,000(3.1) "IIJA - Technical Assistance to Small Systems."Federal appropriation..... 6,452,000(4) "Assistance to State Programs."Federal appropriation..... 8,000,000(4.1) "IIJA - Assistance to State Programs."Federal appropriation..... 8,400,000(5) "Local Assistance and Source Water Pollution."Federal appropriation..... 13,500,000(6) "IIJA - Local Assistance and Source Water Pollution."Federal appropriation..... 1,857,000(7) "Infrastructure Improvement Projects."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000(8) "IIJA - Emerging Contaminants in Small or Disadvantaged Communities."Federal appropriation..... 112,099,000PART XXVIII20260HB2400PN3765 - 183 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PENNVEST WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVINGFUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 2801. Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority.The following amounts are appropriated from the PENNVEST Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund to the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority for the current fiscal year: Federal StateThe following Federal amounts are appropriated to the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority:(1) "Sewage Projects Revolving Loan Fund."Federal appropriation..... 91,000,000(2) "IIJA - Sewage Projects Revolving Loan Fund."Federal appropriation..... 350,000,000(3) "Overflow and Storm Water Grants."Federal appropriation..... 6,400,000PART XXIXOPIOID SETTLEMENT RESTRICTED ACCOUNT APPROPRIATIONSSection 2901. Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.The following amounts are appropriated from the Opioid Settlement Restricted Account to the Department of Drug and 20260HB2400PN3765 - 184 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Alcohol Programs for the current fiscal year: Federal StateFor opioid settlements.State appropriation....... 23,062,000PART LIADDITIONAL APPROPRIATIONS FORPRIOR FISCAL YEARSUBPART AGENERAL PROVISIONSSection 5101. State appropriations.(a) General Fund.--The sums specified in this part, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated from the General Fund to agencies of the Executive and Legislative Departments of the Commonwealth for the payment of salaries, wages or other compensation and travel expenses of the duly elected or appointed officers and employees of the Commonwealth, for the payment of fees for contractual services rendered, for the purchase or rental of goods and services, printing, public advertising by or through any medium, equipment, land and buildings and for payment of any other expenses, as provided by law or by this act, necessary for the proper conduct of the duties, functions and activities and for the purposes specified in this part for the prior fiscal year and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year immediately preceding the prior fiscal year.(b) Special funds and accounts.--The sums specified in this part, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated from the special funds and accounts in the State Treasury to agencies of the Executive Department of the 20260HB2400PN3765 - 185 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth for the payment of salaries, wages or other compensation and travel expenses of the duly appointed officers and employees of the Commonwealth, for the payment of fees for contractual services rendered, for the purchase or rental of goods and services and for payment of any other expenses, as provided by law or by this act, necessary for the proper conduct of the duties, functions and activities and for the purposes specified in this part for the prior fiscal year and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year immediately preceding the prior fiscal year.Section 5102. Federal appropriations.The Federal appropriations specified in this part, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated to the agencies of the Executive Department of the Commonwealth specified in this part for the payment of the expenses of implementing and carrying out the programs specified in this part for the prior fiscal year and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year immediately preceding the prior fiscal year. Unless otherwise stated, the Federal appropriations include any carryovers from the fiscal year immediately preceding the prior fiscal year.SUBPART BGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONSEXECUTIVE DEPARTMENTSection 5111. (Reserved).Section 5112. (Reserved).Section 5113. (Reserved).Section 5114. (Reserved).Section 5115. (Reserved).Section 5116. Department of Education.20260HB2400PN3765 - 186 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Education for the prior fiscal year: Federal StateFor payments on account of pupil transportation.State appropriation....... 737,121,000For grants to school districts to assist in meeting Federal matching requirements for grants received under the Federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966 and to aid in providing a food program for needy children.State appropriation....... 83,498,000For payment of the Commonwealth's share of Federal Social Security taxes for certain public school employees.State appropriation....... 685,826,000Section 5117. (Reserved).Section 5118. (Reserved).Section 5119. Department of Human Services.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Human Services for the prior fiscal year: Federal StateThe following Federal amounts 20260HB2400PN3765 - 187 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Rural Health Transformation Program Restricted Account - Administration."Federal appropriation..... 10,000,000For medical assistance - capitation.State appropriation....... 3,792,846,000For medical assistance fee-for-service.State appropriation....... 702,847,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance fee-for-service plans:(1) "Medical Assistance Fee-for-Service."Federal appropriation..... 2,199,989,000(2) "Rural Health Transformation Program Restricted Account."Federal appropriation..... 184,000,000For payment to Federal Government - Medicare Drug Program.State appropriation....... 1,082,550,000For medical assistance - workers with disabilities.20260HB2400PN3765 - 188 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 113,931,000For Children's Health Insurance Program.State appropriation....... 96,643,000For medical assistance - long-term living.State appropriation....... 212,657,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for long-term living:(1) "Medical Assistance - Long-Term Living."Federal appropriation..... 216,527,000For medical assistance - Community HealthChoices.State appropriation....... 6,728,341,000The following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for medical assistance - Community HealthChoices:(1) "Medical Assistance - Community HealthChoices."Federal appropriation..... 10,090,161,000For long-term care - managed care.State appropriation....... 187,500,000For intellectual disabilities - intermediate care facilities.20260HB2400PN3765 - 189 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State appropriation....... 173,237,000Section 5120. Department of Military and Veterans Affairs.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs for the prior fiscal year: Federal StateFor education of veterans' children.State appropriation....... 375,000Section 5121. Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency for the prior fiscal year: Federal StateThe following Federal amounts are appropriated to supplement the sum appropriated for general government operations:(1) "Regional Events Security and Support."Federal appropriation..... 60,500,000SUBPART CGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONSGOVERNMENT SUPPORT AGENCIESSection 5131. (Reserved).SUBPART D(Reserved)SUBPART E20260HB2400PN3765 - 190 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (Reserved)SUBPART FTOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUND APPROPRIATIONSSection 5151. (Reserved).SUBPART HMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS FOR PRIOR FISCAL YEARSection 5161. Prior laws unaffected.This part is not intended to be inconsistent with or to repeal any provision of any act enacted at this or any prior session of the General Assembly regulating the purchase of supplies, the ordering of printing and binding, the purchase, maintenance and use of automobiles, the method of making payments from the State Treasury for any purpose or the functioning of any administrative department, board or commission.Section 5162. Compliance with other law before funds available.No appropriation made by this part to any department, board, commission or agency of the Executive Department shall be available unless and until the department, board, commission or agency has complied with sections 615 and 616 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.Section 5163. Contracts prerequisite to encumbering or committing funds.Funds for the purchase of supplies, materials and equipment shall not be deemed to be committed or encumbered until contracts covering the purchase have been entered into with the vendors.Section 5164. Minority business set-asides.(a) Duty to report.--Each department or other 20260HB2400PN3765 - 191 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 instrumentality of the Commonwealth listed in this part authorized to contract for buildings, highways, commodities, equipment, supplies or services shall report to the General Assembly all information pertinent to anticipated procurement needs at the beginning of each fiscal year and each fiscal quarter thereafter.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "minority business" means a minority business enterprise as defined in the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.598, No.206), known as the Pennsylvania Minority Business Development Authority Act.Section 5165. Appropriation of funds from miscellaneous sources.In addition to the amounts appropriated by this part:(1) Moneys received in payment for food and household supplies furnished to employees and other persons, except inmates, by an institution, and moneys received from the proceeds from the sale of any products of the soil, meats, livestock, timber or other materials sold by the department shall be paid into the General Fund and are appropriated out of the General Fund to the several respective institutions for the operation and maintenance of the institutions.(2) Moneys received from any other source, except the Federal Government, as contributions for the programs provided in this part or as payment for services or materials furnished by one institution to another, except those collections designated as revenues, shall be paid into the General Fund and are appropriated out of the General Fund for the purposes of the respective appropriations.(3) Moneys received by a department or agency of the Commonwealth from any other source, except the Federal 20260HB2400PN3765 - 192 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Government, as contributions or supplements to the department or agency for a program or administration of an act included in this part shall be paid into the General Fund and credited to the appropriation for that program or administration of that act.Section 5166. Lapsing of unused funds.Except as otherwise provided by law or by this section, that part of all appropriations in this part unexpended, uncommitted or unencumbered as of June 30, 2026, shall automatically lapse as of that date.Section 5167. Construction with prior appropriation acts.Any appropriation in this part which is the same or similar to any appropriation in the act of November 12, 2025 (P.L. , No.1A), known as the General Appropriation Act of 2025, shall replace that appropriation.Section 5168. Deduction of expended appropriations under prior law.Any money which has been appropriated and expended under the act of November 12, 2025 (P.L. , No.1A), known as the General Appropriation Act of 2025, shall be deducted from the corresponding appropriation in this part.PART LXISPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR FEDERAL FUNDSFOR CURRENT FISCAL YEARSection 6101. General Fund repository for Federal funds.Moneys received from the Federal Government as contributions or supplements to the departments or agencies of the Commonwealth or the programs provided in this act shall be paid into the General Fund.Section 6102. Limitation on encumbering or spending Federal 20260HB2400PN3765 - 193 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 funds.Federal funds shall be encumbered or spent only to the extent that the money is estimated as being available during the fiscal year of the Commonwealth.Section 6103. Appropriation of prior unspent Federal funds.(a) General rule.--Federal moneys that have been previously appropriated by the General Assembly and authorized or allocated by the Federal Government but remain unspent from the prior fiscal year or previous fiscal years and will not be renewed for the current fiscal year are appropriated.(b) Department of Human Services.--The Federal appropriations to the Department of Human Services include any prior earnings that may be received during the current fiscal year. In addition to the amounts specifically appropriated in this act to the Department of Human Services, all moneys appropriated from the Federal Government during a previous fiscal year which are expected to be received as reimbursements may be carried forward until the close of the current fiscal year to the extent that obligations are carried forward. In addition, reimbursements actually received to support the obligations may also be carried forward.Section 6104. Subgrants between Federal appropriations.Subgrants may be made between Federal appropriations without further approval of the General Assembly. The Secretary of the Budget shall submit a list of subgrants to the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives quarterly. No subgrant to a State agency, however, may be made from a restricted receipts account without a specific appropriation by the General Assembly.20260HB2400PN3765 - 194 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6105. Utilization of emergency Federal funds.(a) Natural disasters and civil disobedience.--Federal funds available for costs and damages resulting from natural disasters or civil disobedience may be added to an appropriation contained in this act or to funds otherwise appropriated or may be used for the purposes prescribed by the Federal Government.(b) Other emergencies.--In addition to the moneys appropriated by this act, moneys received from the Federal Government for the purpose of disaster assistance or relief, or other moneys received as a direct result of terrorist acts, moneys for homeland security and defense and moneys for avian flu/pandemic preparedness shall be paid into the General Fund and are appropriated out of the General Fund to the departments, boards, commissions or agencies designated by the Governor.(c) Executive authorization.--In the event of an emergency situation in which the General Assembly cannot act in sufficient time, the Governor is authorized through executive authorization to provide up to $10,000,000 in Federal funds to alleviate the emergency situation.(d) Federal funding related to COVID-19 and the impact of COVID-19.--The following apply to funds received from the Federal Government for assistance with the response to the COVID-19 pandemic and the economic impact of the COVID-19 pandemic:(1) For Federal funds which are required by Federal law to be allocated to a specific program which is in existence prior to the effective date of this section, the Federal funds are hereby appropriated to the program.(2) For Federal funds which are required by Federal law to be allocated by the Commonwealth according to a formula 20260HB2400PN3765 - 195 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mandated by Federal law, the Federal funds are hereby appropriated for allocation according to the formula.(3) All other Federal funds under this subsection shall be deposited in the COVID-19 Response Restricted Account and shall only be used upon appropriation by the General Assembly.(e) Definition.--For the purposes of this section, "emergency" is defined as a situation in which there is a chance of or which may result in substantial human suffering.Section 6105.1. Federal funding relating to infrastructure.The following apply to funds received from the Federal Government for infrastructure projects:(1) For Federal funds which are required by Federal law to be allocated to a specific program which is in existence prior to the effective date of this section, the Federal funds are appropriated to the program.(2) For Federal funds which are required by Federal law to be allocated by the Commonwealth according to a formula mandated by Federal law, the Federal funds are appropriated for allocation according to the formula.(3) All other Federal funds under this section shall be deposited in the Federal Infrastructure Project Account and shall only be used upon appropriation by the General Assembly.Section 6106. Transfer of funds from TANFBG to CCDFBG and SSBG.In accordance with Federal law which permits the transfer of funds from the TANFBG to the CCDFBG and SSBG, the Department of Human Services, upon approval of the Secretary of the Budget, may transfer funds, provided that the transfer will not result in a deficit in an appropriation from which funds are 20260HB2400PN3765 - 196 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transferred. The Secretary of the Budget shall provide 10 days' prior notification of the transfer to the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.PART LXXIMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSFOR CURRENT FISCAL YEARSection 7101. Prior laws unaffected.This act is not intended to be inconsistent with or to repeal any provision of any act enacted at this or any prior session of the General Assembly regulating the purchase of supplies, the ordering of printing and binding, the purchase, maintenance and use of motor vehicles, the method of making payments from the State Treasury for any purpose or the functioning of any administrative department, board or commission.Section 7102. Compliance with other law before funds available.No appropriation made by this act to any department, board, commission or agency of the Executive Department shall be available unless and until the department, board, commission or agency has complied with sections 615 and 616 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.Section 7103. Contracts prerequisite to encumbering or committing funds.Funds available to agencies, boards, departments, commissions or other governmental entities under this act for the procurement of supplies, services or construction shall not be available for payment of or to be committed to or encumbered for payment of the procurement unless and until the agency, board, 20260HB2400PN3765 - 197 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department or other governmental entity has complied with all of the requirements applicable to the procurement that are specified in 62 Pa.C.S. (relating to procurement) and in the policies, procedures and regulations instituted in accordance with 62 Pa.C.S.Section 7104. Minority business set-asides.(a) Duty to report.--Each department or other instrumentality of the Commonwealth listed in Subpart A of Part II authorized to contract for buildings, highways, commodities, equipment, supplies or services shall report to the General Assembly all information pertinent to anticipated procurement needs at the beginning of each quarter during a fiscal year.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "minority business" means a minority business enterprise as defined in the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.598, No.206), known as the Pennsylvania Minority Business Development Authority Act.Section 7105. Appropriation of funds from miscellaneous sources.In addition to the amounts appropriated by this act:(1) Moneys received in payment for food and household supplies furnished to employees and other persons, except inmates, by an institution and moneys received from the proceeds from the sale of products of the soil, meats, livestock, timber or other materials sold by a department or agency of the Commonwealth shall be paid into the General Fund and are appropriated out of the General Fund to the several respective institutions for the operation and maintenance of the institutions.(2) Moneys received from any other source, except the Federal Government, as contributions for the purposes 20260HB2400PN3765 - 198 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specified in the respective appropriations or as payment for services or materials furnished by one institution to another, except those collections designated as revenues, shall be paid into the General Fund and are appropriated out of the General Fund for the purposes of the respective appropriations.(3) Moneys received by a department or agency of the Commonwealth from other sources, except the Federal Government, as contributions or supplements to the department or agency for a program or administration of an act included in this act shall be paid into the General Fund and credited to the appropriation for that program or administration of the act.Section 7106. Lapsing of unused funds.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided by law or by this section, that part of all appropriations in this act unexpended, uncommitted or unencumbered as of the close of the current fiscal year shall automatically lapse as of that day.(b) Exceptions.--The following shall be continuing appropriations:(1) The appropriation in section 236 to the Health Care Cost Containment Council.(2) The appropriation in section 241 to the Supreme Court for the unified judicial system security program.(3) The appropriations in Subpart C of Part II to the General Assembly.(4) The appropriations in Subpart D of Part II to the Government Support Agencies.(5) The appropriations in section 231 to the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency for disaster relief, 20260HB2400PN3765 - 199 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hazard mitigation and State disaster assistance.(c) Nonapplicability.--This section does not apply to Part LI.Section 7107. Appellate courts appropriation contingency.The appropriations in sections 241, 242 and 243 to the Supreme, Superior and Commonwealth Courts, respectively, for justice and judge expenses are contingent upon a vouchered expense account plan being continued by the Supreme Court.Section 7108. Transfer of excess funds.The Governor may transfer moneys in funds receiving proceeds of Commonwealth of Pennsylvania general obligation bonds in excess of the amount necessary for the purposes for which the bonds were issued to the appropriate sinking fund for payment of debt service due on outstanding bonds. If the excess money, together with any available balance, exceeds the amount of debt service remaining to be paid, the money shall be transferred to the General Fund or to the appropriate special fund responsible for the debt service.Section 7109. Transfers for government support agencies.During the current fiscal year, any prior year amount unexpended on the effective date of this section may, upon the written concurrence of the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Majority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Majority Leader of the House of Representatives, be transferred between any of the following accounts:(1) Legislative Reference Bureau.(2) Legislative Budget and Finance Committee.(3) Legislative Data Processing Committee.(4) Joint State Government Commission.20260HB2400PN3765 - 200 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Local Government Commission.(6) Legislative Audit Advisory Commission.(7) Center for Rural Pennsylvania.(8) Commonwealth Mail Processing Center.(9) Joint Legislative Air and Water Pollution Control and Conservation Committee.(10) Legislative Reapportionment Commission.(11) Independent Regulatory Review Commission.(12) Capitol Preservation Committee.(13) Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing.(14) Host State Committee expenses - CSG.(15) Restricted Account for Leave Payout Expenses.Section 7110. Transfers for Legislative Reapportionment Commission.The appropriation in this act or in any other fiscal year to the Legislative Reapportionment Commission remaining unexpended and unencumbered on the effective date of this section may, upon the written concurrence of the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Majority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Majority Leader of the House of Representatives, be transferred to any other account of the Senate and the House of Representatives, as they deem necessary.Section 7111. Administration of Human Services Block Grant.The Department of Human Services shall allocate and disburse appropriations in this act for the Human Services Block Grant Program established under Article XIV-B of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, to counties participating in that program. Each participating county may adjust the expenditure of the county's Human Services Block Grant Program allocation between those appropriations in 20260HB2400PN3765 - 201 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with, and as authorized by, the applicable provision of Article XIV-B of the Human Services Code.PART LXXXIMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 8101. Effective date.This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.PART IGENERAL PROVISIONSSECTION 101. SHORT TITLE.THIS ACT SHALL BE KNOWN AND MAY BE CITED AS THE GENERAL APPROPRIATION ACT OF 2026.SECTION 102. STATE APPROPRIATIONS.THE FOLLOWING SUMS SPECIFIED IN THIS ACT, OR AS MUCH THEREOF AS MAY BE NECESSARY, ARE SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO CERTAIN AGENCIES OF THE EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH FOR THE PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES OR OTHER COMPENSATION AND TRAVEL EXPENSES OF THE DULY ELECTED OR APPOINTED OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMONWEALTH, FOR THE PAYMENT OF FEES FOR CONTRACTUAL SERVICES RENDERED, FOR THE PURCHASE OR RENTAL OF GOODS AND SERVICES, PRINTING, PUBLIC ADVERTISING BY OR THROUGH ANY MEDIUM, EQUIPMENT, LAND AND BUILDINGS AND FOR PAYMENT OF ANY OTHER EXPENSES, AS PROVIDED BY LAW OR BY THIS ACT, NECESSARY FOR THE PROPER CONDUCT OF THE DUTIES, FUNCTIONS AND ACTIVITIES AND FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED FOR THE FISCAL YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF BILLS INCURRED AND REMAINING UNPAID AT THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR ENDING JUNE 30, 2026.PART IIGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS20260HB2400PN3765 - 202 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBPART AEXECUTIVE DEPARTMENTSECTION 201. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FOR THE FISCAL YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026: FEDERAL STATEFOR RAPE CRISIS PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 24,171,000PART LXXXIMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSECTION 8101. LAPSING OF UNUSED FUNDS.EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW OR BY THIS SECTION, THAT PART OF ALL APPROPRIATIONS IN PART II UNEXPENDED, UNCOMMITTED OR UNENCUMBERED AS OF JUNE 30, 2027, SHALL AUTOMATICALLY LAPSE AS OF THAT DATE.SECTION 8102. EFFECTIVE DATE.THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT JULY 1, 2026, OR IMMEDIATELY, WHICHEVER IS LATER.PART IGENERAL PROVISIONSSECTION 101. SHORT TITLE.THIS ACT SHALL BE KNOWN AND MAY BE CITED AS THE GENERAL APPROPRIATION ACT OF 2026.SECTION 102. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"COVID" OR "COVID-19." THE CORONAVIRUS DISEASE 2019, AN 20260HB2400PN3765 - 203 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INFECTIOUS DISEASE CAUSED BY SEVERE ACUTE RESPIRATORY SYNDROME CORONAVIRUS 2 THAT WAS FIRST IDENTIFIED DURING DECEMBER 2019 IN WUHAN, CHINA."CURRENT FISCAL YEAR." THE FISCAL YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, AND ENDING JUNE 30, 2027."EMPLOYEES." INCLUDES ALL DIRECTORS, SUPERINTENDENTS, BUREAU OR DIVISION CHIEFS, ASSISTANT DIRECTORS, ASSISTANT SUPERINTENDENTS, ASSISTANT CHIEFS, EXPERTS, SCIENTISTS, ENGINEERS, SURVEYORS, DRAFTSMEN, ACCOUNTANTS, SECRETARIES, AUDITORS, INSPECTORS, EXAMINERS, ANALYSTS, STATISTICIANS, MARSHALS, CLERKS, STENOGRAPHERS, BOOKKEEPERS, MESSENGERS AND OTHER ASSISTANTS IN A DEPARTMENT, BOARD OR COMMISSION."EXPENSES" AND "MAINTENANCE." INCLUDES ALL PRINTING, BINDING AND STATIONERY, FOOD AND FORAGE, MATERIALS AND SUPPLIES, TRAVELING EXPENSES, TRAINING, MOTOR VEHICLE SUPPLIES AND REPAIRS, FREIGHT, EXPRESS AND CARTAGE, POSTAGE, TELECOMMUNICATION DEVICES AND TELECOMMUNICATION RENTALS AND TOLL CHARGES, NEWSPAPER ADVERTISING AND NOTICES, PUBLIC ADVERTISING BY OR THROUGH ANY MEDIUM, FUEL, LIGHT, HEAT, POWER AND WATER, MINOR CONSTRUCTION AND RENOVATION, REPAIRS OR RECONSTRUCTION OF EQUIPMENT, BUILDINGS AND FACILITIES, RENT OF REAL ESTATE AND EQUIPMENT, PREMIUMS ON WORKERS' COMPENSATION, INSURANCE PREMIUMS ON POLICIES OF LIABILITY INSURANCE, INSURANCE PREMIUMS ON MEDICAL PAYMENT INSURANCE AND SURETY BONDS FOR VOLUNTEER WORKERS, PREMIUMS ON EMPLOYEE GROUP LIFE INSURANCE AND EMPLOYEE AND RETIRED EMPLOYEE GROUP HOSPITAL AND MEDICAL INSURANCE, PAYMENT OF COMMONWEALTH SHARE OF SOCIAL SECURITY TAXES AND UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION COSTS FOR STATE EMPLOYEES, THE PURCHASE OF REPLACEMENT OR ADDITIONAL EQUIPMENT AND MACHINERY AND ALL OTHER INCIDENTAL COSTS AND EXPENSES, INCLUDING PAYMENT 20260HB2400PN3765 - 204 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TO THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES OF MILEAGE AND OTHER CHARGES FOR THE USE OF MOTOR VEHICLES AND RENTAL PAYMENTS FOR PERMANENTLY ASSIGNED MOTOR VEHICLES AND OF EXPENSES OR COSTS OF SERVICES INCURRED THROUGH THE PURCHASING FUND. THE TERM "EXPENSES" ALSO SHALL INCLUDE THE MEDICAL COSTS FOR THE TREATMENT OF INMATES OF STATE INSTITUTIONS WHEN THE INMATE MUST BE TRANSFERRED TO AN OUTSIDE HOSPITAL, PROVIDED THAT IN NO CASE SHALL THE STATE INSTITUTION PAY MORE FOR PATIENT CARE THAN THAT PROVIDED UNDER THE STATE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM."PRIOR FISCAL YEAR." THE FISCAL YEAR BEGINNING JULY 1 OF THE FISCAL YEAR IMMEDIATELY PRIOR TO THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR.SECTION 103. ABBREVIATIONS.THE FOLLOWING ABBREVIATIONS WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"AIDS." ACQUIRED IMMUNE DEFICIENCY SYNDROME."ARC." APPALACHIAN REGIONAL COMMISSION."ARPA." AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021 (PUBLIC LAW 117-2, 135 STAT. 4)."ARRA." AMERICAN RECOVERY AND REINVESTMENT ACT OF 2009 (PUBLIC LAW 111-5, 123 STAT. 115)."CCDFBG." CHILD CARE AND DEVELOPMENT FUND BLOCK GRANT."CHIP." CHILDREN'S HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM."CSBG." COMMUNITY SERVICES BLOCK GRANT."DOE." DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY."EDA." ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ADMINISTRATION."EEOC." EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY COMMISSION."EMG." EMERGENCY."EPA." ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY."ESEA." ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION ACT OF 1965 20260HB2400PN3765 - 205 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (PUBLIC LAW 89-10, 20 U.S.C. § 6301 ET SEQ.)."FEMA." FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY."FTA." FEDERAL TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION."HIV." HUMAN IMMUNODEFICIENCY VIRUS."HUD." DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT."ICF." INTERMEDIATE CARE FACILITIES."ID." INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES."IIJA." INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT AND JOBS ACT OF 2021 (PUBLIC LAW 117-58, 135 STAT. 429)."IMLS." INSTITUTE OF MUSEUM AND LIBRARY SERVICES."IRA." INFLATION REDUCTION ACT OF 2022 (PUBLIC LAW 117-169, 136 STAT. 1818)."LIHEABG." LOW-INCOME HOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE BLOCK GRANT."LIHEAP." LOW-INCOME HOME ENERGY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM."LIHWAP." LOW-INCOME HOUSEHOLD WATER ASSISTANCE PROGRAM."LSTA." LIBRARY SERVICES AND TECHNOLOGY ACT (PUBLIC LAW 104-208, 20 U.S.C. § 9101 ET SEQ.)."MCH." MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH."MCHSBG." MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT."MHSBG." MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT."NSTIC." NATIONAL STRATEGY FOR TRUSTED IDENTITIES IN CYBERSPACE."PA SITES." PENNSYLVANIA STRATEGIC INVESTMENTS TO ENHANCE SITES."PHHSBG." PREVENTIVE HEALTH AND HEALTH SERVICES BLOCK GRANT."PREA." PRISON RAPE ELIMINATION ACT OF 2003 (PUBLIC LAW 108-79, 117 STAT. 972)."PRO HOUSING." PATHWAYS TO REMOVING OBSTACLES TO HOUSING."SCDBG." SMALL COMMUNITIES DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANT."SNAP." SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROJECT.20260HB2400PN3765 - 206 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "SSBG." SOCIAL SERVICES BLOCK GRANT."STEP." STATE TRADE AND EXPORT PROMOTION."SUPTRSBG." SUBSTANCE USE PREVENTION, TREATMENT AND RECOVERY SERVICES BLOCK GRANT."TANFBG." TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES BLOCK GRANT."TB." TUBERCULOSIS."TEA-21." TRANSPORTATION EQUITY ACT FOR THE 21ST CENTURY (PUBLIC LAW 105-178, 112 STAT. 107)."TEFAP." TEMPORARY EMERGENCY FOOD ASSISTANCE PROGRAM."VA." VETERANS' ADMINISTRATION."VOCA." VICTIMS OF CRIME ACT OF 1984 (PUBLIC LAW 98-473, 42 U.S.C. § 10601 ET SEQ.)."WIC." WOMEN, INFANTS AND CHILDREN PROGRAM."WIOA." WORKFORCE INNOVATION AND OPPORTUNITY ACT (PUBLIC LAW 113-128, 128 STAT. 1425).SECTION 104. STATE APPROPRIATIONS.(A) GENERAL FUND.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PART LI, THE SUMS SPECIFIED IN THIS ACT, OR AS MUCH THEREOF AS MAY BE NECESSARY, ARE SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO AGENCIES OF THE EXECUTIVE, LEGISLATIVE AND JUDICIAL DEPARTMENTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH FOR THE PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES OR OTHER COMPENSATION AND TRAVEL EXPENSES OF THE DULY ELECTED OR APPOINTED OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMONWEALTH, FOR THE PAYMENT OF FEES FOR CONTRACTUAL SERVICES RENDERED, FOR THE PURCHASE OR RENTAL OF GOODS AND SERVICES, PRINTING, PUBLIC ADVERTISING BY OR THROUGH ANY MEDIUM, EQUIPMENT, LAND AND BUILDINGS AND FOR PAYMENT OF ANY OTHER EXPENSES, AS PROVIDED BY LAW OR BY THIS ACT, NECESSARY FOR THE PROPER CONDUCT OF THE DUTIES, FUNCTIONS AND ACTIVITIES AND FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED 20260HB2400PN3765 - 207 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IN THIS ACT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF BILLS INCURRED AND REMAINING UNPAID AT THE CLOSE OF THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.(B) SPECIAL FUNDS AND ACCOUNTS.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PART LI, THE SUMS SPECIFIED IN THIS ACT, OR AS MUCH THEREOF AS MAY BE NECESSARY, ARE SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED FROM THE SPECIAL FUNDS AND ACCOUNTS IN THE STATE TREASURY TO AGENCIES OF THE EXECUTIVE AND JUDICIAL DEPARTMENTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH FOR THE PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES OR OTHER COMPENSATION AND TRAVEL EXPENSES OF THE DULY APPOINTED OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMONWEALTH, FOR THE PAYMENT OF FEES FOR CONTRACTUAL SERVICES RENDERED, FOR THE PURCHASE OR RENTAL OF GOODS AND SERVICES AND FOR PAYMENT OF ANY OTHER EXPENSES, AS PROVIDED BY LAW OR BY THIS ACT, NECESSARY FOR THE PROPER CONDUCT OF THE DUTIES, FUNCTIONS AND ACTIVITIES AND FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS ACT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF BILLS INCURRED AND REMAINING UNPAID AT THE CLOSE OF THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.SECTION 105. FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS.EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN PART LI, THE FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS SPECIFIED IN THIS ACT, OR AS MUCH THEREOF AS MAY BE NECESSARY, ARE SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED TO THE AGENCIES OF THE EXECUTIVE, LEGISLATIVE AND JUDICIAL DEPARTMENTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH SPECIFIED IN THIS ACT FOR THE PAYMENT OF THE EXPENSES OF IMPLEMENTING AND CARRYING OUT THE PROGRAMS SPECIFIED IN THIS ACT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF BILLS INCURRED AND REMAINING UNPAID AT THE CLOSE OF THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR. UNLESS OTHERWISE STATED, THE FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS INCLUDE ANY CARRYOVERS FROM THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.SECTION 106. REFERENCES TO DEPARTMENT OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE.FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ACT, A REFERENCE TO THE DEPARTMENT 20260HB2400PN3765 - 208 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE A REFERENCE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS OR THE PENNSYLVANIA PAROLE BOARD, OR BOTH, AS APPLICABLE.SECTION 107. REFERENCES TO COMMISSION FOR FAIRNESS AND JUSTICE.FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ACT, A REFERENCE TO THE INTERBRANCH COMMISSION SHALL BE DEEMED A REFERENCE TO THE COMMISSION FOR FAIRNESS AND JUSTICE, OR BOTH, AS APPLICABLE.PART IIGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONSFOR CURRENT FISCAL YEARSUBPART AEXECUTIVE DEPARTMENTSECTION 201. GOVERNOR.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE GOVERNOR FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR: INCLUDING THE MAINTENANCE OF THE GOVERNOR'S HOME, THE EXPENSE OF ENTERTAINMENT OF OFFICIAL GUESTS AND MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE JUDICIARY, PARTICIPATION IN THE GOVERNOR'S CONFERENCE, THE EXPENSES OF THE EXECUTIVE BOARD AND THE PAYMENT OF TRAVELING EXPENSES OF PERSONS OTHER THAN EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMONWEALTH APPOINTED BY THE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 209 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GOVERNOR TO REPRESENT OR OTHERWISE SERVE THE COMMONWEALTH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 12,096,000SECTION 202. EXECUTIVE OFFICES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE EXECUTIVE OFFICES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 18,473,000FOR COMMONWEALTH OFFICE OF DIGITAL EXPERIENCE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,813,000FOR THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,605,000FOR INVESTIGATION OF WELFARE FRAUD ACTIVITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 9,865,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR INVESTIGATION OF WELFARE FRAUD ACTIVITIES:(1) "TANFBG - PROGRAM ACCOUNTABILITY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,500,000(2) "SNAP - PROGRAM ACCOUNTABILITY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 210 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - PROGRAM ACCOUNTABILITY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 9,250,000(4) "CCDFBG SUBSIDIZED DAY CARE - FRAUD INVESTIGATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000FOR THE OFFICE OF THE BUDGET.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 26,750,000FOR AUDIT OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 99,000FOR THE OFFICE OF GENERAL COUNSEL.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 9,807,000FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA HUMAN RELATIONS COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 14,434,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA HUMAN RELATIONS COMMISSION:(1) "EEOC - SPECIAL PROJECT GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,100,000(2) "HUD - SPECIAL PROJECT GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 500,000FOR THE COUNCIL ON THE ARTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,102,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 211 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE COUNCIL ON THE ARTS:(1) "NATIONAL ENDOWMENT FOR THE ARTS - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,295,000FOR THE JUVENILE COURT JUDGES' COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,862,000FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON CRIME AND DELINQUENCY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 28,859,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON CRIME AND DELINQUENCY:(1) "PLAN FOR JUVENILE JUSTICE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 170,000(2) "JUSTICE ASSISTANCE GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 11,500,000(3) "JUSTICE ASSISTANCE GRANTS - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000(4) "STATISTICAL ANALYSIS CENTER."20260HB2400PN3765 - 212 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 400,000(5) "CRIMINAL IDENTIFICATION TECHNOLOGY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,000,000(6) "CRIME VICTIMS' COMPENSATION SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,500,000(7) "CRIME VICTIMS' ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 80,000,000(8) "VIOLENCE AGAINST WOMEN FORMULA GRANT PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 7,000,000(9) "VIOLENCE AGAINST WOMEN FORMULA GRANT PROGRAM - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 600,000(9.1) "COMMUNITY-BASED VIOLENCE INTERVENTION AND PREVENTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(10) "RESIDENTIAL SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(11) "CRIME VICTIMS' ASSISTANCE (VOCA) - ADMINISTRATION/OPERATIONS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,000,000(12) "JUVENILE JUSTICE AND DELINQUENCY PREVENTION."20260HB2400PN3765 - 213 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,000,000(13) "ASSAULT SERVICES PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(14) "SAFER COMMUNITIES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,000(15) "PROJECT SAFE NEIGHBORHOODS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 500,000(16) "FORENSIC SCIENCE PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,500,000(17) "ADAM WALSH IMPLEMENTATION SUPPORT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000(18) (RESERVED).(19) "BYRNE COMPETITIVE PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 450,000(20) "COMPREHENSIVE OPIOID ABUSE SITE-BASED PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,000,000(21) (RESERVED).(22) "PROSECUTOR AND DEFENDER INCENTIVES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 400,000(23) "NICS ACT RECORD IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM (NARIP)."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000(24) "BUILDING LOCAL 20260HB2400PN3765 - 214 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONTINUUMS - YOUTH SUCCESS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 825,000(25) "NATIONAL SEXUAL ASSAULT KIT INITIATIVE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,500,000FOR OFFICE OF SAFE SCHOOLS ADVOCATE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 378,000FOR IMPROVEMENT OF ADULT PROBATION SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 16,222,000FOR VICTIMS OF JUVENILE OFFENDERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,300,000FOR VIOLENCE AND DELINQUENCY PREVENTION PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,333,000FOR VIOLENCE INTERVENTION AND PREVENTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 62,150,000FOR CRIMINAL INDIGENT DEFENSE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,500,000FOR COUNTY INTERMEDIATE PUNISHMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 18,167,000FOR JUVENILE PROBATION SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 18,945,000FOR GRANTS TO THE ARTS, INCLUDING COSTS TO ADMINISTER THE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 215 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GRANT PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,590,000FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,000,000FOR TRANSFER TO SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY FUND - TARGETED GRANTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 20,700,000FOR TRANSFER TO THE NONPROFIT SECURITY GRANT FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,000,000SECTION 203. LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,923,000SECTION 204. ATTORNEY GENERAL.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE OFFICE OF ATTORNEY GENERAL.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 58,856,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS 20260HB2400PN3765 - 216 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "STATE MEDICAID FRAUD CONTROL UNITS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 13,325,000(2) "SAFE NEIGHBORHOODS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,502,000FOR DRUG LAW ENFORCEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 62,657,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR DRUG LAW ENFORCEMENT:(1) "HIGH INTENSITY DRUG TRAFFICKING AREAS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,300,000(2) "COPS LIFT PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 250,000FOR SUPPLEMENTAL LAW ENFORCEMENT SUPPORT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 15,233,000FOR JOINT LOCAL-STATE FIREARM TASK FORCES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 14,367,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR JOINT LOCAL-STATE FIREARM TASK FORCES:(1) "RAPID DNA COVERDELL 20260HB2400PN3765 - 217 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DOJ."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 250,000FOR WITNESS RELOCATION PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,315,000FOR CHILD PREDATOR INTERCEPTION UNIT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,887,000FOR TOBACCO LAW ENFORCEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,162,000FOR TRIALS RESULTING FROM INDICTMENTS BY MULTICOUNTY GRAND JURIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 200,000FOR SCHOOL SAFETY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,639,000FOR HUMAN TRAFFICKING ENFORCEMENT AND PREVENTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,377,000FOR ORGANIZED RETAIL THEFT PREVENTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,108,000SECTION 205. AUDITOR GENERAL.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE AUDITOR GENERAL FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE DEPARTMENT OF THE AUDITOR GENERAL FOR POSTAUDITING, ANNUALLY, PERIODICALLY OR 20260HB2400PN3765 - 218 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SPECIALLY, THE AFFAIRS OF ANY DEPARTMENT, BOARD OR COMMISSION WHICH IS SUPPORTED OUT OF THE GENERAL FUND, MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGES, OTHER FINING OFFICES, VOLUNTEER FIREMEN'S RELIEF ASSOCIATION FUNDS AND THE OFFICES OF STATEWIDE ELECTED OFFICIALS AND FOR THE PROPER AUDITING OF APPROPRIATIONS FOR OR RELATING TO PUBLIC ASSISTANCE, INCLUDING ANY FEDERAL SUMS SUPPLEMENTING SUCH APPROPRIATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 45,566,000FOR THE BOARD OF CLAIMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,978,000SECTION 206. TREASURY DEPARTMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT INCLUDING THE ADMINISTRATION OF ARTICLE XIII.1 OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS THE FISCAL CODE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 47,151,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 219 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR THE BOARD OF FINANCE AND REVENUE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,394,000FOR DIVESTITURE REIMBURSEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 150,000FOR THE PAYMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH'S PORTION OF THE EXPENSES OF VARIOUS COUNCILS, COMMISSIONS, CONFERENCES, BOARDS, ASSOCIATIONS, COALITIONS AND INSTITUTES WHICH ARE MULTISTATE ORGANIZATIONS OF WHICH THE COMMONWEALTH HAS BEEN A MEMBER FOR AT LEAST ONE YEAR AND WHICH MEMBERSHIP ENABLES THE COMMONWEALTH GOVERNMENT TO REPRESENT THE CITIZENS OF PENNSYLVANIA, SUCH ORGANIZATIONS BEING DESIGNED TO PROMOTE OR PROTECT THE MEMBER STATES' INTERESTS, OR WHICH PROMOTE GOVERNMENTAL FINANCIAL EXCELLENCE OR ACCOUNTABILITY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,327,000FOR TRANSFER TO THE ABLE SAVINGS PROGRAM FUND, FOR ADMINISTRATION OF THE PENNSYLVANIA ABLE SAVINGS PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,500,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 220 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY CYBER SECURITY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,350,000FOR PAYMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE PERSONNEL DEATH BENEFITS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,330,000FOR COMPENSATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH'S LOAN AND TRANSFER AGENT FOR SERVICES AND EXPENSES IN CONNECTION WITH THE REGISTRATION, TRANSFER AND PAYMENT OF INTEREST ON BONDS OF THE COMMONWEALTH AND OTHER SERVICES REQUIRED TO BE PERFORMED BY THE LOAN AND TRANSFER AGENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 40,000FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT SERVICE OR TO PAY ALL ARBITRAGE REBATES TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 148 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986 (PUBLIC LAW 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 148).STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,418,610,000SECTION 207. DEPARTMENT OF AGING.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATE20260HB2400PN3765 - 221 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR AGING SERVICES:(1) "PROGRAMS FOR THE AGING - TITLE III - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,781,000(2) "PROGRAMS FOR THE AGING - TITLE V - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 127,000(3) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 888,000(4) "PROGRAMS FOR THE AGING - TITLE VII - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,166,000(5) "PROGRAMS FOR THE AGING - TITLE III."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 60,271,000(6) "PROGRAMS FOR THE AGING - NUTRITION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,000(7) "PROGRAMS FOR THE AGING - TITLE V - EMPLOYMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 12,269,000(8) "PROGRAMS FOR THE AGING - TITLE VII - ELDER RIGHTS PROTECTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 9,621,000(9) (RESERVED).20260HB2400PN3765 - 222 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - SUPPORT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 9,000,000(11) "PROGRAMS FOR THE AGING - TITLE III - CAREGIVER SUPPORT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,000(12) "PRE-ADMISSION ASSESSMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(13) "CHRONIC DISEASE SELF-MANAGEMENT EDUCATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 271,000SECTION 208. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 50,000,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "PENNSYLVANIA PLANT PEST DETECTION SYSTEM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,300,000(2) (RESERVED).20260HB2400PN3765 - 223 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) "MEDICATED FEED MILL INSPECTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 71,000(4) "NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(5) "EMERGENCY FOOD ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 9,000,000IN ADDITION TO THE SPECIFIC AMOUNTS APPROPRIATED IN THIS ACT, ALL OTHER MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR EMERGENCY FOOD ASSISTANCE ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUCH PROGRAM.(6) (RESERVED).(7) "PESTICIDE ENFORCEMENT, CERTIFICATION, TRAINING AND CONTROL PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 754,000(8) "AGRICULTURAL RISK PROTECTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000(9) "COMMODITY SUPPLEMENTAL FOOD."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000IN ADDITION TO THE SPECIFIC AMOUNTS APPROPRIATED IN THIS ACT, ALL OTHER MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR COMMODITY 20260HB2400PN3765 - 224 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUPPLEMENTAL FOOD ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUCH PROGRAM.(10) "ORGANIC COST DISTRIBUTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 650,000(11) "ANIMAL DISEASE CONTROL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(12) "FOOD ESTABLISHMENT INSPECTIONS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,646,000(13) "INTEGRATED PEST MANAGEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 250,000(14) (RESERVED).(15) "AVIAN INFLUENZA SURVEILLANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 25,000,000(16) (RESERVED).(17) (RESERVED).(18) "SCRAPIE DISEASE CONTROL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 60,000(19) "FOOT AND MOUTH DISEASE MONITORING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 150,000(20) (RESERVED).(21) "INNOVATIVE NUTRIENT AND SEDIMENT REDUCTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,500,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 225 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (22) "ANIMAL IDENTIFICATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000(23) "SPECIALTY CROPS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,500,000(24) "EMERALD ASH BORER MITIGATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 30,000(25) (RESERVED).(26) "FARMLAND PROTECTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,000,000(27) "CROP INSURANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(28) "SPOTTED LANTERNFLY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,000,000(29) "ANIMAL FEED REGULATORY PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 225,000(30) "CONSERVATION PARTNERSHIP FARMLAND PRESERVATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,500,000FOR AGRICULTURAL PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 9,000,000FOR AGRICULTURAL EXCELLENCE PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,100,000FOR AGRICULTURAL BUSINESS AND WORKFORCE INVESTMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,800,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 226 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR FARMERS MARKET FOOD COUPONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 9,579,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR FARMERS MARKET FOOD COUPONS:(1) "FARMERS MARKET FOOD COUPONS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(2) "SENIOR FARMERS MARKET NUTRITION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,200,000IN ADDITION TO THE SPECIFIC AMOUNTS APPROPRIATED IN THIS ACT, ALL OTHER MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR FARMERS MARKET FOOD COUPONS AND SENIOR FARMERS MARKET NUTRITION ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUCH PROGRAM.FOR AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,187,000FOR AGRICULTURAL PROMOTION, EDUCATION AND EXPORTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 303,000FOR AGRICULTURAL INNOVATION DEVELOPMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,000,000FOR HARDWOODS RESEARCH AND PROMOTION.20260HB2400PN3765 - 227 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 725,000FOR LIVESTOCK AND CONSUMER HEALTH PROTECTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,000,000FOR DEVELOPMENT AND OPERATION OF AN OPEN LIVESTOCK SHOW, INCLUDING CATTLE, SWINE, SHEEP AND HORSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 215,000FOR PLANNING AND STAGING OF AN OPEN DAIRY SHOW.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 215,000FOR YOUTH SHOWS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 169,000FOR GRANTS TO COUNTIES FOR THE PURCHASE OF FOOD TO BE PROVIDED TO NEEDY PERSONS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH. THIS AMOUNT INCLUDES UP TO $6,500,000 FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA AGRICULTURAL SURPLUS SYSTEM PROGRAM, UP TO $1,000,000 FOR THE EMERGENCY FOOD ASSISTANCE DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM, UP TO $500,000 FOR THE COST OF DISTRIBUTING TEFAP COMMODITIES TO COUNTIES, AND UP TO $1,000,000 FOR THE SENIOR FOOD BOX PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 30,688,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FOR PRODUCT 20260HB2400PN3765 - 228 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROMOTION AND MARKETING:(1) "MARKET IMPROVEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 250,000FOR FOOD MARKETING AND RESEARCH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 494,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE NUTRIENT MANAGEMENT FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,200,000FOR FRESH FOOD FINANCING INITIATIVE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,000,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE CONSERVATION DISTRICT FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,669,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE AGRICULTURAL COLLEGE LAND SCRIP FUND RESTRICTED ACCOUNT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 57,710,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA PREFERRED TRADEMARK LICENSING FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,905,000SECTION 209. DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL 20260HB2400PN3765 - 229 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 36,043,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "ARC - STATE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000(2) "DOE WEATHERIZATION - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,000,000(3) "IIJA - DOE - WEATHERIZATION ADMINISTRATION.FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 12,000,000(4) "SCDBG - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(4.1) "SCDBG - NEIGHBORHOOD STABILIZATION - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 800,000(4.2) "SCDBG - DISASTER RECOVERY ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,500,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 230 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) "CSBG - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(6) "LIHEABG - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(7) "ECONOMIC ADJUSTMENT ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(8) "SCDBG - HUD SPECIAL PROJECTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(9) "CONTINUUM OF CARE (COC) PLANNING GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(10) "EMG SOLUTIONS ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000(11) "FEDERAL GRANT INITIATIVES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 30,000,000(12) "ARC AREA DEVELOPMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 15,000,000(13) "RECOVERY HOUSING ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000FOR THE CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,569,000FOR THE OFFICE OF OPEN RECORDS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 231 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,984,000FOR BUSINESSPA.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 9,051,000FOR THE OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,525,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT:(1) "SBA STATE TRADE AND EXPORT PROMOTION (STEP)."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000FOR THE PURPOSE OF MARKETING TO ATTRACT TOURISTS TO THIS COMMONWEALTH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 26,572,000FOR THE PURPOSE OF MARKETING TO ATTRACT BUSINESS TO THIS COMMONWEALTH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,320,000FOR PENNSYLVANIA MILITARY COMMUNITY ENHANCEMENT COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 567,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE MUNICIPALITIES FINANCIAL RECOVERY REVOLVING AID FUND.20260HB2400PN3765 - 232 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,500,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE BEN FRANKLIN TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY FUND. NOT LESS THAN 80% OF THIS AMOUNT SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE BEN FRANKLIN TECHNOLOGY PARTNERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 17,000,000FOR INVENT PENN STATE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,350,000FOR INTERGOVERNMENTAL COOPERATION AUTHORITY - THIRD CLASS CITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 100,000FOR PENNSYLVANIA FIRST.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 40,000,000FOR MUNICIPAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,000,000FOR KEYSTONE COMMUNITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 32,343,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR KEYSTONE COMMUNITIES:(1) "DOE WEATHERIZATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 30,000,000(1.1) "IIJA - DOE - WEATHERIZATION PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 150,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 233 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) "LIHEABG - WEATHERIZATION PROGRAM." IN ADDITION TO THE SPECIFIC AMOUNTS APPROPRIATED IN THIS ACT, ALL OTHER MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE WEATHERIZATION PORTION OF THE LIHEAP PROGRAM, EITHER THROUGH AN INCREASE IN THE REGULAR PROGRAM OR PURSUANT TO A PRESIDENTIAL RELEASE OF CONTINGENCY FUNDS, ARE APPROPRIATED TO THIS PROGRAM.FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 60,000,000(3) "SCDBG - DISASTER RECOVERY GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 70,000,000(4) "SCDBG - NEIGHBORHOOD STABILIZATION PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,000,000(5) "EMG SOLUTIONS PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 12,000,000(6) "CSBG - PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 50,000,000(7) "SCDBG PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,000,000(8) "ARC CONSTRUCTION - RSBA PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 40,000,000(9) "RECOVERY HOUSING PROGRAM."20260HB2400PN3765 - 234 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,000,000(10) "IIJA - BROADBAND EQUITY, ACCESS AND DEVELOPMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000,000(11) "IIJA - EPA BROWNFIELDS REVOLVING LOAN FUND."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,000FOR MAIN STREET MATTERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 20,000,000FOR HISTORICALLY DISADVANTAGED BUSINESSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 23,750,000FOR PARTNERSHIPS FOR REGIONAL ECONOMIC PERFORMANCE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,880,000FOR FOUNDATIONS IN INDUSTRY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,000,000FOR APPALACHIAN REGIONAL COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 325,000FOR MANUFACTURING PA.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 13,000,000FOR STRATEGIC MANAGEMENT PLANNING PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,617,000FOR TOURISM PROMOTION RELATED TO ACCREDITED ZOOS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,500,000FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA INFRASTRUCTURE TECHNOLOGY 20260HB2400PN3765 - 235 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,500,000FOR SUPER COMPUTER CENTER PROJECTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 500,000FOR POWDERED METALS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 100,000FOR A RURAL LEADERSHIP TRAINING PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 100,000FOR FOOD ACCESS INITIATIVE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,000,000FOR LOCAL MUNICIPAL RELIEF.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 59,995,000FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT EMERGENCY HOUSING SUPPORT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,500,000FOR WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 15,000,000FOR COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC ASSISTANCE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 119,650,000FOR HOSPITAL AND HEALTH SYSTEM EMERGENCY RELIEF.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 13,500,000FOR BIO-TECHNOLOGY RESEARCH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 12,350,000FOR PA SITES DEBT SERVICE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 35,735,000SECTION 210. (RESERVED).20260HB2400PN3765 - 236 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 211. DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 21,157,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "TOPOGRAPHIC AND GEOLOGIC SURVEY GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,250,000(2) "FEDERAL SENTINEL LANDSCAPE PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 300,000(3) "LAND AND WATER CONSERVATION FUND." IN ADDITION TO THE AMOUNT UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, ANY CONTINGENCY FUNDS MADE AVAILABLE TO THE COMMONWEALTH UNDER THE FEDERAL LAND AND WATER CONSERVATION FUND ACT ARE APPROPRIATED.20260HB2400PN3765 - 237 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 20,000,000(4) (RESERVED).(5) "HIGHLANDS CONSERVATION PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 23,670,000(6) "CHESAPEAKE BAY GATEWAY NETWORK."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 600,000FOR STATE PARKS OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 47,628,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR STATE PARKS:(1) "FEDERAL LANDS ACCESS PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 400,000(2) "APPALACHIAN REGIONAL COMMISSION CONSTRUCTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 603,000FOR STATE FORESTS OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 32,573,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR STATE FORESTS:(1) "FOREST FIRE PROTECTION AND CONTROL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,200,000(2) "IIJA - FOREST FIRE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 238 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROTECTION AND CONTROL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,086,000(3) "IIJA - COMMUNITY WILDFIRE DEFENSE GRANT PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 900,000(4) "FOREST MANAGEMENT AND PROCESSING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 21,600,000(5) "IIJA - FOREST MANAGEMENT AND PROCESSING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 34,000,000(6) "AID TO VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANIES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 542,000(7) "IIJA - AID TO VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANIES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,800,000(8) "WETLAND PROTECTION FUND."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 400,000(9) "NATIONAL FISH AND WILDLIFE FOUNDATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(10) "EPA CHESAPEAKE BAY GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,500,000(11) "USDA GOOD NEIGHBOR AGREEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 800,000(12) "COOPERATIVE ENDANGERED 20260HB2400PN3765 - 239 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SPECIES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 60,000FOR FOREST PEST MANAGEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,500,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR FOREST PEST MANAGEMENT:(1) "FOREST INSECT AND DISEASE CONTROL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,300,000(2) "IIJA - FOREST INSECT AND DISEASE CONTROL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,410,000FOR HERITAGE PARKS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,000,000FOR PARKS, FORESTS AND RECREATION PROJECTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 900,000SECTION 212. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 42,625,000FOR MEDICAL CARE.20260HB2400PN3765 - 240 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 426,565,000FOR CORRECTIONAL EDUCATION AND TRAINING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 52,040,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR CORRECTIONAL EDUCATION AND TRAINING:(1) "CORRECTIONAL EDUCATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 859,000FOR THE STATE CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,532,409,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE STATE CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTIONS:(1) "REIMBURSEMENT FOR INCARCERATED ALIENS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,500,000(2) "CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND MENTAL HEALTH COLLABORATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 600,000(3) "ADULT REENTRY EDUCATION, EMPLOYMENT AND TREATMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 700,000(4) "PAY FOR SUCCESS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 844,000(5) "PREA PROGRAM: STRATEGIC 20260HB2400PN3765 - 241 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUPPORT FOR PREA IMPLEMENTATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 52,000FOR STATE FIELD SUPERVISION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 186,610,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE STATE FIELD SUPERVISION:(1) "SMART SUPERVISION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,420,000(2) "BODY-WORN CAMERAS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000FOR PENNSYLVANIA PAROLE BOARD.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 14,393,000FOR THE STATE SEXUAL OFFENDERS ASSESSMENT BOARD.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,357,000FOR THE BOARD OF PARDONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,807,000FOR OFFICE OF VICTIM ADVOCATE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,238,000SECTION 213. (RESERVED).SECTION 214. DEPARTMENT OF DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF 20260HB2400PN3765 - 242 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,585,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "SUPTRSBG - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 12,964,000(2) "SUBSTANCE USE SPECIAL PROJECTS - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,750,000(3) "STATE OPIOID RESPONSE ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,677,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR ASSISTANCE TO DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS:(1) "SUPTRSBG - DRUG AND ALCOHOL SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 77,811,000(2) "SUBSTANCE USE SPECIAL PROJECTS GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 21,250,000(3) "STATE OPIOID RESPONSE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 109,371,000SECTION 215. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.20260HB2400PN3765 - 243 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 45,780,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "ADULT BASIC EDUCATION - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,400,000(2) "EDUCATION OF EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 13,000,000(3) "SPECIAL EDUCATION - STATE PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,900,000(4) "ESEA - TITLE I - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,000(5) "STATE APPROVING AGENCY (VETERANS AFFAIRS)."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,100,000(6) "FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICE."20260HB2400PN3765 - 244 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 21,000,000(7) "MIGRANT EDUCATION - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 750,000(8) "CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,300,000(9) "TITLE II - IMPROVING TEACHER QUALITY - ADMINISTRATION/STATE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 7,400,000(10) "JACOB K. JAVITS GIFTED AND TALENTED STUDENTS EDUCATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,300,000(11) "HOMELESS ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,500,000(12) "PRESCHOOL GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 960,000(13) "SCHOOL HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 200,000(14) "PRESCHOOL DEVELOPMENT GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 26,000,000(15) (RESERVED).(16) (RESERVED).(17) (RESERVED).(18) (RESERVED).(19) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - NURSES AIDE TRAINING."20260HB2400PN3765 - 245 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 335,000(20) "STATE AND COMMUNITY HIGHWAY SAFETY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,750,000(21) (RESERVED).(22) "TITLE IV - 21ST CENTURY COMMUNITY LEARNING CENTERS - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(23) "NATIONAL ASSESSMENT OF EDUCATIONAL PROGRESS (NAEP)."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 300,000(24) "MIGRANT EDUCATION COORDINATION PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 130,000(25) (RESERVED).(26) (RESERVED).(27) "STUDENT SUPPORT AND ACADEMIC ENRICHMENT - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,750,000(28) "COMMERCIAL DRIVER'S LICENSE PROGRAM IMPLEMENTATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(29) (RESERVED).(30) (RESERVED).(31) (RESERVED).FOR THE DRUG AND ALCOHOL RECOVERY HIGH SCHOOL PROGRAM STATE SHARE OF TUITION PAYMENTS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 246 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 509,000FOR INFORMATION AND TECHNOLOGY IMPROVEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,710,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR INFORMATION AND TECHNOLOGY IMPROVEMENT:(1) "STATEWIDE LONGITUDINAL DATA SYSTEMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 500,000FOR PA ASSESSMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 50,844,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR PA ASSESSMENT:(1) "TITLE VI - PART A STATE ASSESSMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 13,500,000FOR THE STATE LIBRARY, PROVIDING REFERENCE SERVICES AND ADMINISTERING AID TO PUBLIC LIBRARIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,739,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE STATE LIBRARY:20260HB2400PN3765 - 247 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) "LSTA - LIBRARY DEVELOPMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,500,000FOR PROGRAMS OF EDUCATION AND TRAINING AT YOUTH DEVELOPMENT CENTERS AND THE MONITORING OF PROGRAMS OF EDUCATION AND TRAINING PROVIDED TO INCARCERATED JUVENILES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 14,775,000FOR PAYMENT OF BASIC EDUCATION FUNDING TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,320,444,000FOR DUAL ENROLLMENT PAYMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,000,000FOR TRANSFER TO PUBLIC SCHOOL FACILITY IMPROVEMENT GRANT PROGRAM IN THE COMMONWEALTH FINANCING AUTHORITY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 125,000,000FOR THE READY-TO-LEARN BLOCK GRANT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,948,481,000FOR TRANSFER TO SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY FUND FOR PHYSICAL SAFETY AND MENTAL HEALTH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 100,000,000FOR THE PRE-K COUNTS PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 330,563,000FOR HEAD START SUPPLEMENTAL 20260HB2400PN3765 - 248 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 91,921,000FOR MOBILE SCIENCE, MATHEMATICS AND LITERACY EDUCATION PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 12,175,000FOR TEACHER PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,044,000FOR ADULT AND FAMILY LITERACY PROGRAMS, SUMMER READING PROGRAMS AND THE ADULT HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMAS PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 16,728,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR ADULT AND FAMILY LITERACY PROGRAMS:(1) "ADULT BASIC EDUCATION - LOCAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 24,200,000FOR CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION.STATE APPROPRIATION..... 154,138,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION:(1) "CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION ACT - LOCAL."20260HB2400PN3765 - 249 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 53,000,000FOR CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION EQUIPMENT GRANTS.STATE APPROPRIATION..... 20,000,000FOR AUTHORITY RENTALS AND SINKING FUND REQUIREMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 174,423,000FOR PAYMENTS ON ACCOUNT OF PUPIL TRANSPORTATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 732,813,000FOR PAYMENTS ON ACCOUNT OF NONPUBLIC AND CHARTER SCHOOL TRANSPORTATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 64,468,000FOR PAYMENTS ON ACCOUNT OF SPECIAL EDUCATION OF EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,581,815,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION:(1) "INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION - LOCAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 600,000,000FOR PAYMENTS FOR EARLY INTERVENTION SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 494,505,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT 20260HB2400PN3765 - 250 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR PAYMENTS FOR EARLY INTERVENTION SERVICES:(1) "INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 20,000,000FOR PAYMENT FOR TUITION TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS PROVIDING EDUCATION TO NONRESIDENT ORPHANED CHILDREN PLACED IN PRIVATE HOMES BY THE COURT AND NONRESIDENT INMATES OF CHILDREN'S INSTITUTIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 38,452,000FOR PAYMENTS OF ANNUAL FIXED CHARGES TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS IN LIEU OF TAXES FOR LAND ACQUIRED BY THE COMMONWEALTH FOR WATER CONSERVATION OR FLOOD PREVENTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 179,000FOR PAYMENT FOR MAINTENANCE OF SUMMER SCHOOLS FOR SCHOOL-AGE CHILDREN OF MIGRANT LABORERS, INCLUDING CHILD-CARE SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,107,000FOR PAYMENTS TO PENNSYLVANIA CHARTERED SCHOOLS FOR DEAF AND BLIND CHILDREN.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 82,580,000FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION - APPROVED PRIVATE SCHOOLS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 251 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 167,721,000FOR GRANTS TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS TO ASSIST IN MEETING FEDERAL MATCHING REQUIREMENTS FOR GRANTS RECEIVED UNDER THE FEDERAL CHILD NUTRITION ACT OF 1966 AND TO AID IN PROVIDING A FOOD PROGRAM FOR NEEDY CHILDREN.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 97,802,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICES:(1) "FOOD AND NUTRITION - LOCAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,725,820,000FOR PAYMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH'S SHARE OF FEDERAL SOCIAL SECURITY TAXES FOR CERTAIN PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 713,558,000FOR PAYMENT OF REQUIRED CONTRIBUTION FOR PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,361,000,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FOR BASIC EDUCATION:(1) "ESEA - TITLE I - LOCAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,250,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 252 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) "TITLE II - IMPROVING TEACHER QUALITY - LOCAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 85,000,000(3) "TITLE IV - 21ST CENTURY COMMUNITY LEARNING CENTERS - LOCAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 91,000,000(4) "TITLE III - LANGUAGE INSTRUCTION FOR LEP AND IMMIGRANT STUDENTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 35,000,000(5) "TITLE VI - RURAL AND LOW INCOME SCHOOLS - LOCAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,200,000(6) "STUDENT SUPPORT AND ACADEMIC ENRICHMENT - LOCAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 110,000,000(7) "AMERICA'S SCHOOL INFRASTRUCTURE GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,750,000(8) "SCHOOL-BASED MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,988,000FOR SERVICES TO NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 101,839,000FOR TEXTBOOKS, INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIAL AND INSTRUCTIONAL EQUIPMENT FOR NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 30,979,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 253 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR A SUBSIDY TO PUBLIC LIBRARIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 75,470,000FOR AID TO THE FREE LIBRARY OF PHILADELPHIA AND THE CARNEGIE LIBRARY OF PITTSBURGH TO MEET THE COSTS INCURRED IN SERVING AS REGIONAL LIBRARIES IN THE DISTRIBUTION OF BRAILLE READING MATERIALS, TALKING BOOK MACHINES AND OTHER READING MATERIALS TO PERSONS WHO ARE BLIND OR OTHERWISE DISABLED.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,000,000FOR LIBRARY ACCESS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,071,000FOR JOB TRAINING AND EDUCATION PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 46,164,000FOR SAFE SCHOOLS INITIATIVE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,614,000FOR TRAUMA-INFORMED EDUCATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 750,000FOR SAFE DRIVING COURSE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 219,000FOR COMMUNITY COLLEGES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 277,338,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE COMMUNITY COLLEGE CAPITAL FUND.20260HB2400PN3765 - 254 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 54,161,000FOR REGIONAL COMMUNITY COLLEGE SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,221,000FOR NORTHERN PENNSYLVANIA REGIONAL COLLEGE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,717,000FOR COMMUNITY EDUCATION COUNCILS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,489,000FOR HUNGER-FREE CAMPUS INITIATIVE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,250,000FOR PARENT PATHWAYS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,661,000FOR SEXUAL ASSAULT PREVENTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,500,000FOR TRANSFER TO STATE-RELATED UNIVERSITY PERFORMANCE FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,000,000SECTION 216. STATE SYSTEM OF HIGHER EDUCATION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE STATE SYSTEM OF HIGHER EDUCATION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE STATE SYSTEM OF HIGHER EDUCATION, INCLUDING THE CHANCELLOR'S OFFICE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 625,755,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 255 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 217. THADDEUS STEVENS COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE THADDEUS STEVENS COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE THADDEUS STEVENS COLLEGE OF TECHNOLOGY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 23,600,000SECTION 218. PENNSYLVANIA HIGHER EDUCATION ASSISTANCE AGENCY.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA HIGHER EDUCATION ASSISTANCE AGENCY FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR PAYMENT OF EDUCATION ASSISTANCE GRANTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 419,236,000FOR PENNSYLVANIA INTERNSHIP PROGRAM GRANTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 468,000FOR READY TO SUCCEED SCHOLARSHIPS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 59,939,000FOR MATCHING PAYMENTS FOR STUDENT AID FUNDS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 19,146,000FOR INSTITUTIONAL ASSISTANCE GRANTS TO BE ALLOTTED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA HIGHER EDUCATION 20260HB2400PN3765 - 256 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASSISTANCE AGENCY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 26,521,000FOR HIGHER EDUCATION FOR THE DISADVANTAGED.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,000,000FOR HIGHER EDUCATION FOR BLIND AND DEAF STUDENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 51,000FOR THE HORACE MANN BOND-LESLIE PINCKNEY HILL SCHOLARSHIP AND FOR OUTREACH AND RECRUITMENT ACTIVITIES AT LINCOLN AND CHEYNEY UNIVERSITIES RELATED TO THE SCHOLARSHIP. THIS APPROPRIATION ALSO CONTAINS FUNDS FOR THE CONTINUATION OF SUPPORT TO STUDENTS CURRENTLY RECEIVING EQUAL OPPORTUNITY PROFESSIONAL EDUCATION AWARDS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,832,000FOR THE CHEYNEY UNIVERSITY HONORS ACADEMY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,980,000FOR TARGETED INDUSTRY CLUSTER SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 11,652,000FOR STUDENT TEACHER STIPEND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 40,000,000FOR GROW PA SCHOLARSHIPS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 42,500,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 257 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 219. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 32,530,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION:(1) "IIJA - DOE - ENERGY PROGRAMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 22,300,000(2) "IIJA - ORPHAN WELL PLUGGING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 195,000,000(3) IIJA - ENERGY EFFICIENCY AND CONSERVATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000(4) "IIJA - ASSISTANCE FOR SMALL AND DISADVANTAGED COMMUNITIES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 103,189,000(5) "IIJA - ELECTRIC GRID 20260HB2400PN3765 - 258 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RESILIENCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 269,250,000(6) "IIJA - METHANE EMISSIONS REDUCTION GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 20,000,000(7) "AIR QUALITY - RAZOR."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 50,000FOR ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAM MANAGEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 47,566,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAM MANAGEMENT:(1) "COASTAL ZONE MANAGEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,700,000(1.1) "IIJA - COASTAL ZONE MANAGEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,454,000(1.2) "IRA - COASTAL ZONE MANAGEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 376,000(2) "CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE GRANTS - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,400,000(3) "STORM WATER PERMITTING INITIATIVE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,300,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 259 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) "SAFE DRINKING WATER ACT - MANAGEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 11,000,000(5) "WATER POLLUTION CONTROL GRANTS - MANAGEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,500,000(6) "AIR POLLUTION CONTROL GRANTS - MANAGEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,200,000(7) "SURFACE MINE CONSERVATION - MANAGEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,500,000(8) "WETLAND PROTECTION FUND."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 840,000(9) "DIAGNOSTIC X-RAY EQUIPMENT TESTING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,300,000(10) (RESERVED).(11) "WATER QUALITY MANAGEMENT PLANNING GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,715,000(11.1) "IIJA - WATER QUALITY MANAGEMENT PLANNING GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(12) "SMALL OPERATORS ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 300,000(13) (RESERVED).(14) "INDOOR RADON 20260HB2400PN3765 - 260 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ABATEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 950,000(15) "NON-POINT SOURCE IMPLEMENTATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 15,300,000(16) "SURVEY STUDIES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,000,000(17) (RESERVED).(18) "NATIONAL DAM SAFETY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,500,000(19) "IIJA - NATIONAL DAM SAFETY PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 550,000(20) "STATE ENERGY PROGRAM (SEP)."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 15,000,000(21) "SURFACE MINE CONSERVATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 680,000(22) "MULTIPURPOSE GRANTS TO STATES AND TRIBES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 600,000(22.1) "COAL COMBUSTION RESIDUALS GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 500,000(23) "IIJA - ENERGY EFFICIENCY REVOLVING LOAN FUND."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,700,000(24) "IIJA - RESILIENT AND EFFICIENT CODES IMPLEMENTATION."20260HB2400PN3765 - 261 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,000,000(25) "IIJA - ENERGY AUDITOR TRAINING GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000(26) "IIJA - SOLID WASTE INFRASTRUCTURE FOR RECYCLING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,101,000(27) "IRA - ENERGY PERFORMANCE - HOMES PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 135,000,000(28) "IRA - ENERGY PERFORMANCE - ELECTRIC APPLIANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 140,000,000(29) (RESERVED).(30) (RESERVED).(31) "IIJA - DOE CLEAN ENERGY DEMONSTRATION PROJECTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 150,000,000(32) "IIJA - ADVANCED ENERGY MANUFACTURING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 50,000,000(33) "IIJA - HYDROELECTRICITY DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 25,000,000(34) "IRA - CLEAN AIR ACT GRANT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 30,300,000(35) "IRA - DOE - PLANNING GRANTS/OTHER CAPACITY BUILDING 20260HB2400PN3765 - 262 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FUNDING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 71,000,000(36) "IRA - EPA - PLANNING GRANTS/OTHER CAPACITY BUILDING FUNDING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 520,000,000(37) "IRA - EPA - GREEN BANK AND ENERGY FINANCING INITIATIVES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 100,000,000(38) "IRA - DOE - CLEAN ENERGY DEMONSTRATION PROJECTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 150,000,000(39) "IRA - TRANSMISSION SITING AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 50,000,000(40) "IRA - ASSISTANCE FOR LATEST AND ZERO BUILDING ENERGY CODE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 16,000,000(41) "IRA - SOLAR FOR ALL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 166,120,000FOR CHESAPEAKE BAY AGRICULTURAL ABATEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,208,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNT IS APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR CHESAPEAKE BAY POLLUTION AGRICULTURAL 20260HB2400PN3765 - 263 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ABATEMENT:(1) "CHESAPEAKE BAY POLLUTION ABATEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 23,000,000(2) "IIJA - CHESAPEAKE BAY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 15,933,000FOR ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 136,806,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION OPERATIONS:(1) "EPA - PLANNING GRANT - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,400,000(2) "WATER POLLUTION CONTROL GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,900,000(3) "AIR POLLUTION CONTROL GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,800,000(4) "SURFACE MINE CONTROL AND RECLAMATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 15,000,000(5) "TRAINING AND EDUCATION OF UNDERGROUND COAL MINERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,700,000(6) (RESERVED).20260HB2400PN3765 - 264 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) "SAFE DRINKING WATER."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,700,000(8) "OIL POLLUTION SPILLS REMOVAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000(9) "USDA GOOD NEIGHBOR AUTHORITY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 200,000(10) "IIJA - USDA GOOD NEIGHBOR AUTHORITY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 18,500,000(11) "IIJA - BROWNFIELDS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,000,000FOR BLACK FLY CONTROL AND RESEARCH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 9,416,000FOR VECTOR BORNE DISEASE MANAGEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,597,000FOR DELAWARE RIVER MASTER.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 38,000FOR SUSQUEHANNA RIVER BASIN COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 740,000FOR INTERSTATE COMMISSION ON THE POTOMAC RIVER.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 23,000FOR DELAWARE RIVER BASIN COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 217,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 265 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR OHIO RIVER VALLEY WATER SANITATION COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 68,000FOR CHESAPEAKE BAY COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 370,000FOR TRANSFER TO THE CONSERVATION DISTRICT FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,516,000FOR INTERSTATE MINING COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 15,000SECTION 220. DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 78,068,000FOR ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION OF THE CAPITOL POLICE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 19,446,000FOR RENTAL, RELOCATION AND MUNICIPAL CHARGES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 21,688,000FOR UTILITY COSTS, INCLUDING IMPLEMENTATION OF THIRD-PARTY SHARED SAVINGS PROGRAMS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 266 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 27,000,000FOR EXCESS INSURANCE COVERAGE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,500,000FOR TRANSFER TO STATE INSURANCE FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,500,000FOR FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES FOR THE CAPITOL COMPLEX IN HARRISBURG.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,000,000SECTION 221. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 32,057,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "WIC - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 43,268,000(2) "HEALTH ASSESSMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,002,000(3) "PHHSBG - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION."20260HB2400PN3765 - 267 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,150,000(4) "MCHSBG - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 16,659,000(5) (RESERVED).(6) "EMS FOR CHILDREN."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 331,000(7) "TB - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,592,000(8) "LEAD - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,100,000(9) "AIDS HEALTH EDUCATION - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,098,000(10) "PRIMARY CARE COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 510,000(11) "HIV/AIDS SURVEILLANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 687,000(12) "HIV CARE ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 645,000(13) "CANCER PREVENTION AND CONTROL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 7,879,000(14) "ENVIRONMENTAL PUBLIC HEALTH TRACKING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,504,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 268 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (15) "SPECIAL PREPAREDNESS INITIATIVES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 400,000(16) "STATE LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,320,000FOR HEALTH PROMOTION AND DISEASE PREVENTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,238,000FOR QUALITY ASSURANCE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 32,194,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR QUALITY ASSURANCE:(1) "MEDICARE - HEALTH SERVICE AGENCY CERTIFICATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 14,100,000(2) "MEDICAID CERTIFICATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 11,300,000FOR HEALTH INNOVATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 808,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR VITAL STATISTICS:(1) "COOPERATIVE HEALTH STATISTICS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,439,000(2) "HEALTH STATISTICS."20260HB2400PN3765 - 269 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 104,000(3) "BEHAVIORAL RISK FACTOR SURVEILLANCE SYSTEM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,300,000FOR THE STATE LABORATORY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,230,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE STATE LABORATORY:(1) "CLINICAL LABORATORY IMPROVEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 816,000(2) "EPIDEMIOLOGY AND LABORATORY SURVEILLANCE AND RESPONSE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,653,000FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE CENTERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 34,607,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE CENTERS:(1) "DISEASE CONTROL IMMUNIZATION PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 12,150,000(2) "PHHSBG - BLOCK PROGRAM SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,055,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 270 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) "PREVENTIVE HEALTH SPECIAL PROJECTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,202,000(4) "COLLABORATIVE CHRONIC DISEASE PROGRAMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,647,000(5) "SEXUAL VIOLENCE PREVENTION AND EDUCATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,857,000(6) "LIVE HEALTHY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,953,000FOR SEXUALLY TRANSMITTED DISEASE SCREENING AND TREATMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,822,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR SEXUALLY TRANSMITTED DISEASE SCREENING AND TREATMENT:(1) "SURVEY AND FOLLOW-UP - SEXUALLY TRANSMITTED DISEASES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,243,000FOR THE ACHIEVING BETTER CARE BY MONITORING ALL PRESCRIPTIONS PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,117,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE ACHIEVING BETTER CARE BY 20260HB2400PN3765 - 271 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MONITORING ALL PRESCRIPTIONS PROGRAM:(1) "PRESCRIPTION DRUG MONITORING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 13,866,000FOR DIABETES PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 112,000FOR PRIMARY HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,350,000FOR COMMUNITY-BASED HEALTH CARE SUBSIDY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,000,000FOR SCREENING OF NEWBORNS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,329,000FOR CANCER SCREENING SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,563,000FOR AIDS PROGRAMS AND SPECIAL PHARMACEUTICAL SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,436,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR AIDS PROGRAMS AND SPECIAL PHARMACEUTICAL SERVICES:(1) "AIDS HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,375,000(2) "AIDS - RYAN WHITE AND HIV CARE."20260HB2400PN3765 - 272 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 48,355,000(3) "HOUSING FOR PERSONS WITH AIDS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,018,000FOR REGIONAL CANCER INSTITUTES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,000,000FOR REIMBURSEMENT TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS ON ACCOUNT OF HEALTH SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 37,620,000FOR MAINTENANCE OF LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 36,265,000FOR LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENTS FOR ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,697,000FOR MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,447,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH SERVICES:(1) "MCH LEAD POISONING PREVENTION AND ABATEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,400,000(2) (RESERVED).(3) "MCHSBG - PROGRAM 20260HB2400PN3765 - 273 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 20,833,000(4) "SPECIAL SUPPLEMENTAL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAM FOR WOMEN, INFANTS AND CHILDREN (WIC)." IN ADDITION TO THE SPECIFIC AMOUNTS APPROPRIATED IN THIS ACT, ALL OTHER MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE SPECIAL SUPPLEMENTAL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAM FOR WOMEN, INFANTS AND CHILDREN ARE APPROPRIATED TO THE PROGRAM.FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 277,910,000(5) "ABSTINENCE EDUCATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,731,000(6) "TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 485,000(7) "FAMILY HEALTH SPECIAL PROJECTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,207,000(8) "SCREENING NEWBORNS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,798,000(9) "NEWBORN HEARING SCREENING AND INTERVENTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 337,000(10) "TEENAGE PREGNANCY PREVENTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,677,000FOR TUBERCULOSIS SCREENING AND 20260HB2400PN3765 - 274 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TREATMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,047,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR TUBERCULOSIS SCREENING AND TREATMENT:(1) "TUBERCULOSIS CONTROL PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 98,000FOR RENAL DIALYSIS SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,928,000FOR SERVICES TO CHILDREN WITH SPECIAL NEEDS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,728,000FOR ADULT CYSTIC FIBROSIS AND OTHER CHRONIC RESPIRATORY ILLNESSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 795,000FOR DIAGNOSIS AND TREATMENT FOR COOLEY'S ANEMIA.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 106,000FOR HEMOPHILIA SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,017,000FOR LUPUS PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 106,000FOR SICKLE CELL ANEMIA SERVICES, INCLUDING CAMPS FOR CHILDREN WITH SICKLE CELL ANEMIA. STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,335,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 275 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR LYME DISEASE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,380,000FOR REGIONAL POISON CONTROL CENTERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 742,000FOR TRAUMA PREVENTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 488,000FOR EPILEPSY SUPPORT SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 583,000FOR TOURETTE'S SYNDROME.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 159,000FOR AMYOTROPHIC LATERAL SCLEROSIS SUPPORT SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,501,000FOR NEURODEGENERATIVE DISEASE RESEARCH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,000,000SECTION 222. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 163,088,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL 20260HB2400PN3765 - 276 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 41,327,000(2) (RESERVED).(3) "SNAP - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 7,321,000(4) "TANFBG - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 12,864,000(5) "CCDFBG - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 39,128,000(6) "CHILD WELFARE - TITLE IV-E - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 13,009,000(7) "CHILD WELFARE SERVICES - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 999,000(8) (RESERVED).(9) "DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES - BASIC SUPPORT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,813,000(10) "DISABLED EDUCATION - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,140,000(11) "EARLY HEAD START EXPANSION PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,500,000(12) "MCH - ADMINISTRATION."20260HB2400PN3765 - 277 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 265,000(13) "MHSBG - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,465,000(14) "REFUGEES AND PERSONS SEEKING ASYLUM - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,085,000(15) "RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION PROGRAM RESTRICTED ACCOUNT - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,000FOR INFORMATION SYSTEMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 109,130,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR INFORMATION SYSTEMS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - INFORMATION SYSTEMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 159,675,000(2) (RESERVED).(3) "SNAP - INFORMATION SYSTEMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 36,194,000(4) "TANFBG - INFORMATION SYSTEMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 19,531,000(5) "CHILD WELFARE - TITLE IV-E - INFORMATION SYSTEMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 21,580,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 278 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) "CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT - INFORMATION SYSTEMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 9,917,000(7) "CHIP - INFORMATION SYSTEMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 16,869,000FOR STATEWIDE OPERATIONS RELATED TO COUNTY ADMINISTRATION OF THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 78,677,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR STATEWIDE OPERATIONS RELATED TO COUNTY ADMINISTRATION OF THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - STATEWIDE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 77,555,000(2) "SNAP - STATEWIDE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 49,894,000(3) "TANFBG - STATEWIDE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,072,000(4) "CHILDREN'S HEALTH INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,444,000FOR COUNTY ASSISTANCE OFFICE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 279 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OPERATIONS RELATED TO ADMINISTRATION OF THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 449,367,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR COUNTY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OPERATIONS RELATED TO ADMINISTRATION OF THE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - COUNTY ASSISTANCE OFFICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 218,435,000(2) "TANFBG - COUNTY ASSISTANCE OFFICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 39,825,000(3) "CHIP - COUNTY ASSISTANCE OFFICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 17,269,000(4) "SNAP - COUNTY ASSISTANCE OFFICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 139,357,000(5) "SSBG - COUNTY ASSISTANCE OFFICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,000,000(6) "LIHEABG - ADMINISTRATION AND AUDIT COSTS." IN ADDITION TO THE SPECIFIC AMOUNTS APPROPRIATED 20260HB2400PN3765 - 280 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IN THIS ACT, ALL OTHER MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE LIHEAP PROGRAM, EITHER THROUGH AN INCREASE IN THE REGULAR PROGRAM OR PURSUANT TO A PRESIDENTIAL RELEASE OF CONTINGENCY FUNDS, ARE APPROPRIATED TO THE LIHEAP PROGRAM.FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 36,368,000FOR CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 19,425,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT:(1) "CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM - TITLE IV-D."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 282,128,000FOR NEW DIRECTIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 26,450,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR NEW DIRECTIONS:(1) "TANFBG - NEW DIRECTIONS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 142,150,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 281 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - NEW DIRECTIONS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 15,485,000(3) "SNAP - NEW DIRECTIONS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 23,033,000(4) "CHIP - NEW DIRECTIONS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,091,000FOR YOUTH DEVELOPMENT INSTITUTIONS AND FORESTRY CAMPS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 142,698,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR YOUTH DEVELOPMENT INSTITUTIONS:(1) "SSBG - BASIC INSTITUTIONAL PROGRAMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,000(2) "FOOD NUTRITION SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000FOR MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES, INCLUDING GRANTS TO COUNTIES OR OTHER COUNTY-BASED HUMAN SERVICES INCLUDED UNDER THE HUMAN SERVICES BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM, EXCLUSIVE OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 979,764,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MENTAL 20260HB2400PN3765 - 282 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HEALTH SERVICES:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - MENTAL HEALTH."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 251,588,000(2) (RESERVED).(3) "MEDICARE SERVICES - STATE HOSPITALS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 14,500,000(4) "HOMELESS MENTALLY ILL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,310,000(5) "MHSBG - COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 55,829,000(6) "SSBG - COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,366,000(7) "MENTAL HEALTH DATA INFRASTRUCTURE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 250,000(8) (RESERVED).(9) (RESERVED).(10) "COLLABORATIVE CARE MODEL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,500,000(11) "SYSTEMS OF CARE EXPANSION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,000,000(12) "YOUTH SUICIDE PREVENTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 283 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) "ADOLESCENTS AND YOUNG ADULTS AT HIGH RISK FOR PSYCHOSIS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 700,000(14) "TRANSFORMING THE CRISIS MENTAL HEALTH SYSTEM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 20,000,000FOR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES - STATE CENTERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 107,027,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES - STATE CENTERS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - STATE CENTERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 146,574,000(2) "MEDICARE SERVICES - STATE CENTERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 247,000FOR CASH ASSISTANCE GRANTS, INCLUDING EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING AND SUPPORTIVE SERVICES FOR CASH ASSISTANCE RECIPIENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 24,600,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR CASH ASSISTANCE:20260HB2400PN3765 - 284 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) "TANFBG - CASH GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 142,407,000(2) "OTHER FEDERAL SUPPORT - CASH GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 15,514,000(3) "SUMMER EBT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 255,000,000(4) "LIHEABG - PROGRAM." IN ADDITION TO THE SPECIFIC AMOUNTS APPROPRIATED IN THIS ACT, ALL OTHER MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE LIHEAP PROGRAM, EITHER THROUGH AN INCREASE IN THE REGULAR PROGRAM OR PURSUANT TO A PRESIDENTIAL RELEASE OF CONTINGENCY FUNDS, ARE APPROPRIATED TO THE LIHEAP PROGRAM.FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 231,550,000(5) "REFUGEES AND PERSONS SEEKING ASYLUM - SOCIAL SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 60,303,000FOR SUPPLEMENTAL GRANTS TO AGED, BLIND AND DISABLED PERSONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 111,397,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS - CAPITATION PLANS. FOR PROVISION OF OUTPATIENT SERVICES AND INPATIENT HOSPITAL SERVICES 20260HB2400PN3765 - 285 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TO ELIGIBLE PERSONS ENROLLED IN AN APPROVED CAPITATION PLAN.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,502,653,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - CAPITATION PLANS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - CAPITATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 16,015,248,000FOR PRIMARY HEALTH CARE AND PREVENTIVE SERVICES FOR ELIGIBLE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE RECIPIENTS IN THE FEE-FOR-SERVICE DELIVERY SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 790,219,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR ELIGIBLE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE RECIPIENTS IN THE FEE-FOR-SERVICE DELIVERY SYSTEM:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - FEE-FOR-SERVICE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,381,904,000(2) "RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 200,000,000FOR PAYMENT TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE MEDICARE DRUG 20260HB2400PN3765 - 286 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,143,581,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - WORKERS WITH DISABILITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 120,385,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - WORKERS WITH DISABILITIES.(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - WORKERS WITH DISABILITIES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 140,007,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS TO QUALIFYING UNIVERSITY-AFFILIATED PHYSICIAN PRACTICE PLANS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,000,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS TO QUALIFYING UNIVERSITY-AFFILIATED PHYSICIAN PRACTICE PLANS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - PHYSICIAN PRACTICE PLANS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,392,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS - HOSPITAL-BASED BURN CENTERS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 287 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,438,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS - HOSPITAL-BASED BURN CENTERS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - HOSPITAL-BASED BURN CENTERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,983,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS - OBSTETRICS AND NEONATAL SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,682,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS - OBSTETRICS AND NEONATAL SERVICES:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - OBSTETRICS AND NEONATAL SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 18,443,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS - TRAUMA CENTERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,657,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS - TRAUMA CENTERS:20260HB2400PN3765 - 288 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - TRAUMA CENTERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 11,670,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS TO ACADEMIC MEDICAL CENTERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 24,681,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS TO ACADEMIC MEDICAL CENTERS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - ACADEMIC MEDICAL CENTERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 33,270,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - TRANSPORTATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 68,346,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - TRANSPORTATION:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - TRANSPORTATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 93,546,000FOR WOMEN'S SERVICE PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,263,000FOR CHILDREN'S HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 98,586,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 289 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR CHILDREN'S HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM:(1) "CHILDREN'S HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 352,241,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - LONG-TERM LIVING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 228,708,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR LONG-TERM LIVING:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - LONG-TERM LIVING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 242,560,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - COMMUNITY HEALTHCHOICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,915,522,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR COMMUNITY HEALTHCHOICES:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - COMMUNITY HEALTHCHOICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 11,333,265,000FOR LONG-TERM CARE - MANAGED CARE.20260HB2400PN3765 - 290 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 183,520,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR LONG-TERM CARE - MANAGED CARE.(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - LONG-TERM CARE - MANAGED CARE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 251,092,000FOR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES - COMMUNITY-BASED PROGRAM, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE GRANTS TO COUNTIES FOR NONINSTITUTIONAL PROGRAMS, OR OTHER COUNTY-BASED HUMAN SERVICES INCLUDED UNDER THE HUMAN SERVICES BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM, EXCLUSIVE OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 174,981,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES - COMMUNITY-BASED PROGRAM:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - COMMUNITY ID SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 101,683,000(2) "AUTISM SPECTRUM DISORDER SURVEILLANCE PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 824,000(3) "SSBG - COMMUNITY ID SERVICES."20260HB2400PN3765 - 291 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,651,000FOR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES - INTERMEDIATE CARE FACILITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 179,951,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR ID/ICF:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - ID/ICF."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 291,659,000FOR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES - COMMUNITY WAIVER PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,783,366,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES - COMMUNITY WAIVER PROGRAM:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - COMMUNITY ID WAIVER PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,415,795,000FOR SERVICES TO PERSONS WITH AUTISM SPECTRUM DISORDERS, INCLUDING OVERSIGHT, SUPPORTIVE SERVICES AND PROVIDER TRAINING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 37,311,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR SERVICES TO PERSONS WITH AUTISM SPECTRUM 20260HB2400PN3765 - 292 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DISORDERS:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - AUTISM INTERVENTION SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 50,652,000FOR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES OR OTHER COUNTY-BASED HUMAN SERVICES INCLUDED UNDER THE HUMAN SERVICES BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 57,149,000FOR SPECIAL PHARMACEUTICAL SERVICES FOR ATYPICAL ANTIPSYCHOTIC DRUG THERAPY FOR PERSONS RESIDING IN THE COMMUNITY WHO SUFFER FROM SCHIZOPHRENIA.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 400,000FOR PAYMENTS AND SERVICES TO COUNTIES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH PROGRAMS AND FOR THE CARE OF DELINQUENT AND DEPENDENT CHILDREN. THIS APPROPRIATION FUNDING LEVEL IS SUFFICIENT FOR AN AGGREGATE CHILD WELFARE NEEDS-BASED BUDGET ALLOCATION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR AT $2,612,669,688. THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE UP TO $40,544,450 OF THIS APPROPRIATION TO FUND CONTRACTS FOR ADOPTION SERVICES. THE DEPARTMENT MAY ALSO USE FUNDS FROM THIS APPROPRIATION FOR 20260HB2400PN3765 - 293 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASSISTANCE TO COUNTIES IN MEETING FEDERAL REIMBURSEMENT DOCUMENTATION REQUIREMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,544,733,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR PAYMENTS AND SERVICES TO COUNTIES FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH PROGRAMS AND CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT PREVENTION:(1) "CHILD WELFARE SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 41,611,000(2) "CHILD WELFARE - TITLE IV-E."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 468,984,000(3) (RESERVED).(4) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - CHILD WELFARE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,828,000(5) "TANFBG - CHILD WELFARE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 58,508,000(6) "SSBG - CHILD WELFARE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 12,021,000(7) "CHILD WELFARE TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 23,534,000(8) "COMMUNITY-BASED FAMILY RESOURCE AND SUPPORT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 344,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 294 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) "CHILD ABUSE PREVENTION AND TREATMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 12,515,000(10) "TITLE IV-B - CASEWORKER VISITS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000(11) "CHILDREN'S JUSTICE ACT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,555,000FOR COMMUNITY-BASED FAMILY CENTERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 34,558,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR COMMUNITY-BASED FAMILY CENTERS:(1) "FAMILY PRESERVATION - FAMILY CENTERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,691,000(2) "FAMILY RESOURCE AND SUPPORT - FAMILY CENTERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,269,000(3) "TITLE IV-B - FAMILY CENTERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,871,000(4) "MCH - EARLY CHILDHOOD HOME VISITING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 18,358,000(5) "EARLY CHILDHOOD COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEMS."20260HB2400PN3765 - 295 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 330,000FOR CHILD-CARE SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 298,080,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR CHILD-CARE SERVICES:(1) "TANFBG - CHILD-CARE SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 358,647,000(2) "CCDFBG - CHILD-CARE SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 483,685,000(3) "SSBG - CHILD-CARE SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 30,977,000(4) "HEAD START COLLABORATION PROJECT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 505,000FOR CHILD CARE RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 30,000,000FOR CHILD-CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 124,384,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE CHILD-CARE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM:(1) "TANFBG - CHILD-CARE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 296 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 108,835,000(2) "CCDFBG - CHILD-CARE ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 82,102,000(3) "SNAP - CHILD-CARE ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,080,000FOR THE NURSE FAMILY PARTNERSHIP PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 13,889,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE NURSE FAMILY PARTNERSHIP PROGRAM:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - NURSE FAMILY PARTNERSHIP."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,916,000FOR EARLY INTERVENTION SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 193,217,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR EARLY INTERVENTION SERVICES:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - EARLY INTERVENTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 101,069,000(2) "EDUCATION FOR CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES - EARLY 20260HB2400PN3765 - 297 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INTERVENTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 17,305,000FOR DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 23,063,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROGRAMS:(1) "FAMILY VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,000,000(2) "SSBG - DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROGRAMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,705,000FOR RAPE CRISIS PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 24,171,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR RAPE CRISIS PROGRAMS:(1) "SSBG - RAPE CRISIS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,721,000FOR BREAST CANCER SCREENING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,828,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR BREAST CANCER SCREENING:(1) "SSBG - FAMILY PLANNING."20260HB2400PN3765 - 298 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,000,000FOR THE HUMAN SERVICES DEVELOPMENT FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 13,460,000FOR LEGAL SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,661,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR LEGAL SERVICES:(1) "SSBG - LEGAL SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,049,000FOR PROVISION OF SERVICES TO THE HOMELESS OR OTHER COUNTY-BASED HUMAN SERVICES INCLUDED UNDER THE HUMAN SERVICES BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 23,496,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR SERVICES TO THE HOMELESS:(1) "SSBG - HOMELESS SERVICES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,183,000FOR 211 COMMUNICATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 750,000FOR HEALTH PROGRAM ASSISTANCE AND SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 33,887,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 299 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR SERVICES FOR THE VISUALLY IMPAIRED.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,152,000SECTION 223. (RESERVED).SECTION 224. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 16,688,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "WORKFORCE INNOVATION AND OPPORTUNITY ACT - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 11,000,000(2) (RESERVED).(3) (RESERVED).(4) "COMMUNITY SERVICE AND CORPS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 22,165,000(5) "DISABILITY DETERMINATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 164,838,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 300 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) "NEW HIRES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,701,000FOR OCCUPATIONAL AND INDUSTRIAL SAFETY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,603,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR OCCUPATIONAL AND INDUSTRIAL SAFETY:(1) "LEAD CERTIFICATION AND ACCREDITATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 494,000FOR OCCUPATIONAL DISEASE PAYMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 106,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION FUND FOR WORK OF THE STATE BOARD OF VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 48,718,000FOR SUPPORTED EMPLOYMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 397,000FOR CENTERS FOR INDEPENDENT LIVING, INCLUDING INDEPENDENT LIVING SERVICES PURCHASED BY OFFICE OF VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION DISTRICT OFFICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,634,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 301 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 306(H) OF THE ACT OF JUNE 2, 1915 (P.L.736, NO.338), KNOWN AS THE WORKERS' COMPENSATION ACT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 131,000FOR ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY FINANCING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,000,000FOR ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY DEMONSTRATION AND TRAINING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 850,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FOR EMPLOYMENT SERVICES:(1) "REED ACT - UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE." FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF THE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM.FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,500,000(2) "REED ACT - EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE."(A) FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT OFFICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM, INCLUDING STAFF AND RELATED COSTS TO PROVIDE REEMPLOYMENT SERVICES TO UNEMPLOYMENT CLAIMANTS TO ENHANCE THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT SERVICE AND 20260HB2400PN3765 - 302 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PA CAREERLINK SERVICE DELIVERY SYSTEMS AND TO TRAIN AND GIVE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT TO STAFF WHO DELIVER EMPLOYMENT AND WORKFORCE SERVICES.(B) FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES OF UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM, INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS TO THE UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM'S INFORMATION PROCESSING AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS AND APPLICATIONS; STAFFING; SERVICE CONTRACTS AND TECHNOLOGY TO ADDRESS THE UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION PROGRAM APPEALS WORKLOAD; AND INTEREST PAYMENTS ON LOANS.FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,500,000(3) (RESERVED).(4) "WIOA - ADULT EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 50,000,000(5) (RESERVED).(6) "WIOA - YOUTH EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 84,000,000(7) (RESERVED).(8) "WIOA - STATEWIDE ACTIVITIES."20260HB2400PN3765 - 303 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 30,000,000(9) (RESERVED).(10) "WIOA - DISLOCATEDWORKERS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 109,000,000(11) "TANFBG - YOUTH EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 25,000,000FOR NEW CHOICES/NEW OPTIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,000,000FOR INDUSTRY PARTNERSHIPS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,813,000FOR SCHOOLS-TO-WORK.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,500,000FOR APPRENTICESHIP TRAINING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,000,000SECTION 225. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS.THE FOLLOWING SUMS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 40,432,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:20260HB2400PN3765 - 304 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) "FACILITIES MAINTENANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 120,000,000(2) "FEDERAL CONSTRUCTION GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 80,000,000(3) "NATIONAL FISH AND WILDLIFE FOUNDATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 75,000FOR KEYSTONE STATE CHALLENGE ACADEMY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,615,000FOR ARMORY MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,245,000FOR HONOR GUARDS FOR BURIALS OF VETERANS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 187,000FOR AMERICAN BATTLE MONUMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 50,000FOR SPECIAL STATE DUTY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 70,000FOR THE OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF THE VETERANS HOMES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 129,607,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE VETERANS HOMES:(1) "OPERATIONS AND 20260HB2400PN3765 - 305 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MAINTENANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 124,000,000(2) "MEDICAL REIMBURSEMENTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 250,000(3) "ENHANCED VETERANS REIMBURSEMENT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 38,000,000FOR PAYMENT OF GRATUITIES FOR THE EDUCATION OF CHILDREN OF CERTAIN VETERANS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 425,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE EDUCATIONAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 14,525,000FOR PENSIONS FOR VETERANS BLINDED THROUGH SERVICE-CONNECTED INJURIES OR DISEASE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 222,000TO PROVIDE FOR PENSIONS FOR AMPUTEE AND PARALYZED VETERANS AS REQUIRED BY 51 PA.C.S. § 7702 (RELATING TO AMPUTEE AND PARALYZED VETERAN'S PENSION).STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,040,000FOR PAYMENT OF PENSIONS TO DEPENDENTS OF SOLDIERS OF THE PENNSYLVANIA NATIONAL GUARD KILLED IN THE LINE OF DUTY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 306 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR SUPPLEMENTAL LIFE INSURANCE PREMIUMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 164,000FOR GRANTS FOR DISABLED AMERICAN VETERANS' TRANSPORTATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 336,000FOR VETERANS OUTREACH SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,802,000FOR THE CIVIL AIR PATROL.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 100,000SECTION 226. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 161,800,000FOR TECHNOLOGY AND PROCESS MODERNIZATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,435,000FOR THE DISTRIBUTION OF PUBLIC UTILITY REALTY TAX.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 32,870,000SECTION 227. DEPARTMENT OF STATE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL 20260HB2400PN3765 - 307 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,220,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "FEDERAL ELECTION REFORM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,300,000(2) "OCCUPATIONAL LICENSING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000FOR THE STATEWIDE UNIFORM REGISTRY OF ELECTORS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 20,572,000FOR VOTER REGISTRATION AND EDUCATION PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 596,000FOR LOBBYING DISCLOSURE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 618,000FOR ELECTION CODE DEBT SERVICE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 9,236,000FOR COSTS RELATED TO ABSENTEE VOTING BY PERSONS IN MILITARY SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 20,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 308 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 228. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATETHE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FOR RAIL FREIGHT AND INTERMODAL COORDINATION:(1) (RESERVED).(2) "FEDERAL TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION - CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 39,000,000(3) (RESERVED).(4) "SURFACE TRANSPORTATION - OPERATING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 32,500,000(5) "SURFACE TRANSPORTATION - ASSISTANCE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 975,000(6) "SURFACE TRANSPORTATION ASSISTANCE CAPITAL."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 52,000,000(7) "FTA - KEYSTONE CORRIDOR EQUIPMENT AND PURCHASES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 70,000,000(8) "FTA - SAFETY OVERSIGHT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,000,000(9) "FTA - HYBRID MASS 20260HB2400PN3765 - 309 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TRANSIT VEHICLES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 30,000,000(10) "FTA - URBANIZED FORMULA."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 635,000(11) "FRA - STATE OF GOOD REPAIR."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 30,000,000FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE COLLECTION OF VEHICLE SALES TAX.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 441,000FOR COSTS RELATED TO VOTER REGISTRATION WITH DRIVER LICENSING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,268,000FOR TRANSFER TO AVIATION RESTRICTED ACCOUNT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,600,000SECTION 229. PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,090,647,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT 20260HB2400PN3765 - 310 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "AREA COMPUTER CRIME."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 16,455,000(2) "CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 50,000FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 31,005,000FOR THE STATEWIDE PUBLIC SAFETY RADIO NETWORK.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 28,488,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR STATEWIDE PUBLIC SAFETY RADIO NETWORK:(1) "BROADBAND NETWORK PLANNING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,050,000FOR THE MUNICIPAL POLICE OFFICERS' EDUCATION AND TRAINING COMMISSION, INCLUDING IN-SERVICE TRAINING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,547,000FOR MUNICIPAL POLICE TRAINING GRANTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,000,000FOR COMMERCIAL VEHICLE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 311 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INSPECTIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 15,212,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY:(1) "MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,269,000(2) "IIJA - MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 9,500,000FOR PATROL VEHICLES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 13,000,000FOR MULTI-BIOMETRIC IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 885,000FOR GUN CHECKS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,582,000SECTION 230. (RESERVED).SECTION 231. PENNSYLVANIA EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE PENNSYLVANIA EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 16,274,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS 20260HB2400PN3765 - 312 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "IIJA - STATE AND LOCAL CYBERSECURITY."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 16,000,000(2) "CIVIL PREPAREDNESS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 100,000,000(3) "HAZARDOUS MATERIALS PLANNING AND TRAINING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,500,000(4) "REGIONAL EVENTS SECURITY AND SUPPORT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 30,000,000FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE FIRE COMMISSIONER.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,790,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STATE FIRE COMMISSIONER:(1) "FIRE PREVENTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 20,000FOR SEARCH AND RESCUE PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 250,000FOR FIREFIGHTERS' MEMORIAL FLAGS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 313 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR RED CROSS EXTENDED CARE PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 500,000FOR URBAN SEARCH AND RESCUE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,000,000FOR STATE DISASTER ASSISTANCE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,000,000SECTION 232. PENNSYLVANIA HISTORICAL AND MUSEUM COMMISSION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA HISTORICAL AND MUSEUM COMMISSION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE PENNSYLVANIA HISTORICAL AND MUSEUM COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 25,722,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "HISTORIC PRESERVATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 3,150,000(2) "SURFACE MINING REVIEW."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 180,000(3) "ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 428,000(4) "AMERICAN BATTLEFIELD PROTECTION PROGRAM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 314 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) "NATIONAL ENDOWMENT FOR THE HUMANITIES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 49,000FOR CULTURAL AND HISTORICAL SUPPORT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,000,000SECTION 233. (RESERVED).SECTION 234. ENVIRONMENTAL HEARING BOARD.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARING BOARD FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARING BOARD.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,046,000SECTION 235. (RESERVED).SECTION 236. HEALTH CARE COST CONTAINMENT COUNCIL.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE HEALTH CARE COST CONTAINMENT COUNCIL FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE HEALTH CARE COST CONTAINMENT COUNCIL.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,467,000SECTION 237. STATE ETHICS COMMISSION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE STATE ETHICS 20260HB2400PN3765 - 315 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMMISSION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION AS ALLOCATED BY RESOLUTION ADOPTED BY A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS APPOINTED TO THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,118,000SUBPART BJUDICIAL DEPARTMENTSECTION 241. SUPREME COURT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE SUPREME COURT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SUPREME COURT: INCLUDING THE SALARIES OF THE SUPREME COURT JUSTICES, FOR THE OFFICE OF PROTHONOTARY AND FOR THE LIBRARY IN THE EASTERN DISTRICT AND WESTERN DISTRICT, FOR THE OFFICE OF PROTHONOTARY IN THE MIDDLE DISTRICT, FOR CRIERS, TIPSTAVES, OFFICIAL STENOGRAPHERS, COURT OFFICERS AND THE LAW SECRETARY OF THE CHIEF JUSTICE IN EASTERN, MIDDLE AND WESTERN DISTRICTS AND WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE PREMIUMS 20260HB2400PN3765 - 316 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR ALL SUPREME COURT EMPLOYEES NOT FUNDED BY OTHER APPROPRIATIONS, FOR THE OFFICE OF STATE REPORTERS, INCLUDING THE SALARIES AND COMPENSATION OF EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING THE FEES FOR PROTHONOTARIES OF THE SUPREME COURT OF THE EASTERN, MIDDLE AND WESTERN DISTRICTS ON ASSIGNMENT TO JUDGES TO COUNTIES OTHER THAN THEIR OWN, AND FURTHER INCLUDING ASSESSMENTS FOR THE NATIONAL CENTER OF STATE COURTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 24,320,000FOR VOUCHERED EXPENSES FOR JUSTICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 118,000FOR JUDICIAL CENTER OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,298,000FOR THE JUDICIAL COUNCIL FOR THE UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 141,000FOR UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM CYBERSECURITY AND DISASTER RECOVERY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,490,000FOR DISTRICT COURT ADMINISTRATORS FOR THE UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 32,673,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 317 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR COMMISSION FOR FAIRNESS AND JUSTICE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 509,000FOR COURT MANAGEMENT EDUCATION FOR THE UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 78,000FOR RULES COMMITTEES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,945,000FOR THE COURT ADMINISTRATOR OF PENNSYLVANIA, INCLUDING THE EXPENSES OF THE JUDICIAL COUNCIL OF PENNSYLVANIA AND THE DISTRICT JUSTICE ADMINISTRATOR.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 17,760,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE COURT ADMINISTRATOR:(1) "COURT IMPROVEMENT PROJECT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,400,000FOR THE INTEGRATED CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,521,000FOR THE UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM SECURITY PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,783,000FOR THE OFFICE OF ELDER JUSTICE IN THE COURTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 531,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 318 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE OFFICE OF ELDER JUSTICE IN THE COURTS:(1) "ELDER JUSTICE INNOVATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,000,000SECTION 242. SUPERIOR COURT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE SUPERIOR COURT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF THE SUPERIOR COURT: INCLUDING THE SALARY OF THE SUPERIOR COURT JUDGES, FOR PANELIZATION OF JUDGES PROGRAM, FOR CRIERS, TIPSTAVES, OFFICIAL STENOGRAPHERS, COURT OFFICERS AND LAW SECRETARY OF THE PRESIDENT JUDGE AND WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE PREMIUMS FOR ALL EMPLOYEES OF THE SUPERIOR COURT, FOR THE PROTHONOTARY'S OFFICE IN THE PHILADELPHIA DISTRICT, INCLUDING SALARIES AND COMPENSATION FOR EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING THE EXPENSES OF DOCKETS, STATIONERY, SUPPLIES, BOOKS FOR THE LIBRARY AND OTHER COSTS OF THE SUPERIOR COURT AND ITS OFFICES.20260HB2400PN3765 - 319 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 45,339,000FOR VOUCHERED EXPENSES FOR ACTIVE JUDGES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 183,000SECTION 243. COMMONWEALTH COURT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO COMMONWEALTH COURT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES OF JUDGES, FOR THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF EMPLOYEES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 29,264,000FOR VOUCHERED EXPENSES FOR ACTIVE JUDGES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 132,000SECTION 244. COURTS OF COMMON PLEAS.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE COURTS OF COMMON PLEAS FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE COURTS OF COMMON PLEAS: INCLUDING THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF JUDGES, INCLUDING THE EXPENSES OF TRAVELING JUDGES, INCLUDING THE MILEAGE IN DIVIDED JUDICIAL DISTRICTS, AND THE PAYMENT OF A PER DIEM SALARY, MILEAGE AND MISCELLANEOUS EXPENSES TO ACTIVE VISITING JUDGES FOR THE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 320 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PERFORMANCE OF THEIR OFFICIAL DUTIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 165,126,000FOR SENIOR JUDGES OF THE COURTS OF COMMON PLEAS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,480,000FOR COMMON PLEAS JUDICIAL EDUCATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,593,000FOR TREATMENT COURTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,425,000SECTION 245. COMMUNITY COURTS - MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE COMMUNITY COURTS AND MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF COMMUNITY COURT JUDGES AND MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 119,179,000FOR MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGES' EDUCATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,161,000SECTION 246. (RESERVED).SECTION 247. PHILADELPHIA MUNICIPAL COURT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE PHILADELPHIA MUNICIPAL COURT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATE20260HB2400PN3765 - 321 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF JUDGES AND HEARING OFFICERS, INCLUDING THE TRAFFIC DIVISION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 11,027,000SECTION 248. JUDICIAL CONDUCT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR JUDICIAL CONDUCT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF THE JUDICIAL CONDUCT BOARD.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,970,000FOR SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF THE JUDICIAL ETHICS ADVISORY BOARD.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 369,000FOR SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF THE COURT OF JUDICIAL DISCIPLINE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 618,000SECTION 249. JUROR COST REIMBURSEMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR JUROR COST REIMBURSEMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR JUROR COST REIMBURSEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,118,000SECTION 250. COUNTY COURT REIMBURSEMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR COURT COSTS FOR THE CURRENT 20260HB2400PN3765 - 322 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR PAYMENT TO COUNTIES AS REIMBURSEMENT FOR COSTS INCURRED BY COUNTIES IN THE ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION OF COURTS OF COMMON PLEAS DURING THE CALENDAR YEAR WHICH IMMEDIATELY PRECEDES THE BEGINNING OF THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 23,136,000FOR SENIOR JUDGE OPERATIONAL SUPPORT GRANTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,375,000FOR PAYMENT TO COUNTIES AS REIMBURSEMENT FOR COSTS INCURRED BY COUNTIES FOR COURT INTERPRETER SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,629,000SUBPART CGENERAL ASSEMBLYSECTION 261. SENATE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE SENATE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:SALARIES OF SENATORS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 9,493,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 323 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SALARIES, WAGES AND OTHER PERSONNEL EXPENSES OF EMPLOYEES OF THE CHIEF CLERK AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENDITURES TO BE ALLOCATED AND DISBURSED AT THE DIRECTION OF THE PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,686,000SALARIES, WAGES AND OTHER PERSONNEL EXPENSES OF EMPLOYEES OF THE SENATE AND EXPENSES OF THE OFFICE OF THE PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE, INCLUDING MEMBER LODGING RENTAL, TO BE DISBURSED AT THE DIRECTION OF THE PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 17,005,000INCIDENTAL EXPENSES FOR PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES, OTHER PERSONNEL EXPENSES, MAINTENANCE AND OTHER EXPENSES OF THE SENATE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,851,000THE ABOVE APPROPRIATIONS FOR INCIDENTAL EXPENSES SHALL BE PAID PRIOR TO THE PAYMENT OF SUCH EXPENSES ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER IN FAVOR OF THE CHIEF CLERK UPON THE PRESENTATION OF REQUISITIONS FOR THE SAME PROVIDED THAT THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF REQUISITIONS FOR ADVANCEMENTS, 20260HB2400PN3765 - 324 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LESS THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF EXPENDITURES MADE AS CERTIFIED BY SUCH OFFICER TO THE STATE TREASURER, SHALL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF THE BOND OF THE OFFICER HAVING CONTROL OF THE DISBURSEMENT FROM THE FUNDS ADVANCED.MISCELLANEOUS EXPENSES: MILEAGE AND EXPENSES, SENATORS: IN ADDITION TO THE ANNUAL ALLOCATION FOR EXPENSES AUTHORIZED BY LAW FOR EACH MEMBER OF THE SENATE, EACH MEMBER SHALL RECEIVE AN ANNUAL ALLOCATION IN AN AMOUNT ESTABLISHED BY THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON MANAGEMENT OPERATIONS FOR ACTUAL EXPENSES INCURRED FOR LODGING AND MEALS WHILE AWAY FROM HOME ON OFFICIAL LEGISLATIVE BUSINESS, OFFICIAL POSTAGE AND ALL OTHER EXPENSES INCIDENTAL TO LEGISLATIVE DUTIES AS PROVIDED FOR IN THE FINANCIAL OPERATING RULES OF THE SENATE. UPON PRESENTATION OF REQUISITIONS BY THE CHIEF CLERK FOR SUCH EXPENSES, SUCH REQUISITIONS SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER DIRECTLY TO AND IN FAVOR OF THE PERSONS DESIGNATED IN SUCH 20260HB2400PN3765 - 325 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REQUISITIONS AS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SUCH PAYMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,517,000LEGISLATIVE PURCHASING AND EXPENSES: FOR FURNITURE, TECHNOLOGY IMPROVEMENTS, RESTORATIONS, SECURITY ENHANCEMENTS, NORTH OFFICE BUILDING MODERNIZATION, EQUIPMENT, RENOVATIONS, PERSONNEL EXPENSES AND OTHER EXPENSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,619,000UPON PRESENTATION OF REQUISITIONS BY THE CHIEF CLERK AGAINST THE APPROPRIATIONS FOR LEGISLATIVE PURCHASING AND EXPENSES, SUCH SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER DIRECTLY TO AND IN FAVOR OF THE PERSONS DESIGNATED IN SUCH REQUISITIONS AS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SUCH PAYMENTS.EXPENSES OF THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (R) AND THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (D): FOR INVESTIGATING SCHOOLS, COLLEGES, UNIVERSITIES, CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTIONS, MENTAL HOSPITALS, MEDICAL AND SURGICAL HOSPITALS, HOMES AND OTHER 20260HB2400PN3765 - 326 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 INSTITUTIONS AND AGENCIES SUPPORTED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY APPROPRIATIONS FROM THE STATE TREASURY IN ANALYZING REPORTS, EXPENDITURES AND THE GENERAL OPERATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE INSTITUTIONS AND AGENCIES, IN EXAMINING AND ANALYZING REQUESTS OF THE SAME AND OF THE VARIOUS DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS OF THE COMMONWEALTH, AND FOR THE COLLECTION OF DATA FROM OTHER STATES, ATTENDING SEMINARS AND CONFERENCES AND IN COOPERATING AND EXCHANGING INFORMATION WITH LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCIAL COMMITTEES OF OTHER STATES, AND FOR THE NECESSARY TRAVEL EXPENSES, AND ALL OTHER EXPENSES DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE CHAIR (R) OR THE CHAIR (D), AS APPROPRIATE, OR FOR SALARY, WAGES AND OTHER PERSONNEL EXPENSES DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE RESPECTIVE CAUCUS STAFF ADMINISTRATOR IN COMPILING DATA AND INFORMATION CONNECTED WITH THE WORK OF THE SENATE IN COMPILING COMPARATIVE COSTS AND OTHER FISCAL DATA AND INFORMATION FOR THE USE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 327 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF THE COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE DURING LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS TO THE DISCHARGE OF SUCH DUTIES. THE COMMITTEE, UPON AUTHORIZATION OF THE MAJORITY CHAIR, SHALL HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO EXAMINE AND INSPECT ALL PROPERTIES, EQUIPMENT, FACILITIES, FILES, RECORDS AND ACCOUNTS OF ANY STATE OFFICE, DEPARTMENT, INSTITUTION, BOARD, COMMITTEE, COMMISSION OR AGENCY OR ANY INSTITUTION OR AGENCY SUPPORTED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY APPROPRIATION FROM THE STATE TREASURY AND TO ADMINISTER OATHS. THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS MAY ISSUE SUBPOENAS UNDER THE HAND AND SEAL OF THE MAJORITY CHAIR TO COMPEL THE ATTENDANCE OF WITNESSES AND THE PRODUCTION OF ANY PAPERS, BOOKS, ACCOUNTS, DOCUMENTS AND TESTIMONY TOUCHING MATTERS PROPERLY BEING INQUIRED INTO BY THE COMMITTEE AND TO CAUSE THE DEPOSITION OF WITNESSES EITHER RESIDING WITHIN OR WITHOUT THE STATE TO BE TAKEN IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY LAW FOR TAKING 20260HB2400PN3765 - 328 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEPOSITIONS IN CIVIL ACTIONS. UPON PRESENTATION OF REQUISITIONS BY THE CHIEF CLERK FOR SUCH EXPENSES, SUCH SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER DIRECTLY TO AND IN FAVOR OF THE PERSONS DESIGNATED IN SUCH REQUISITION AS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SUCH COMPENSATION OR EXPENSES. THE SUM APPROPRIATED SHALL BE DIVIDED EQUALLY BY THE STATE TREASURER AND SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN SEPARATE ACCOUNTS FOR THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (R) AND THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (D).STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,229,000CAUCUS OPERATIONS ACCOUNT (R) AND THE CAUCUS OPERATIONS ACCOUNT (D): FOR PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL OTHER INCIDENTAL EXPENSES INCURRED IN HIRING PERSONNEL AND STAFF FOR SERVICES WHICH, IN THE OPINION OF THE FLOOR LEADER (R) OR THE FLOOR LEADER (D) AS MAY BE APPROPRIATE, MAY BE REQUIRED OR ARISE DURING LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF ALL OTHER EXPENSES, INCLUDING 20260HB2400PN3765 - 329 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MEMBER LODGING RENTAL, RELATED TO THE PERFORMANCE OF SENATE DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES. UPON PRESENTATION OF REQUISITIONS BY THE CHIEF CLERK, SUCH SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER DIRECTLY TO AND IN FAVOR OF THE PERSONS DESIGNATED IN SUCH REQUISITION AS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SUCH COMPENSATION OR EXPENSES. THE ENTIRE SUM APPROPRIATED SHALL BE DIVIDED BY THE STATE TREASURER IN AMOUNTS TO BE DETERMINED BY A UNANIMOUS VOTE OF THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON MANAGEMENT OPERATIONS OR IN THE ABSENCE OF A UNANIMOUS VOTE OF THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE THEN BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON MANAGEMENT OPERATIONS AND SUCH AMOUNTS SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE CAUCUS OPERATIONS (R) AND CAUCUS OPERATIONS (D) ACCOUNTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 98,610,000ALL APPROPRIATIONS MADE IN THIS ACT OR IN ANY OTHER FISCAL YEAR TO ANY ACCOUNT OF THE MINORITY CAUCUS OF THE SENATE REMAINING UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED ON THE EFFECTIVE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 330 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DATE OF THIS PART MAY BE TRANSFERRED BY THE COMMITTEE ON MANAGEMENT OPERATIONS, BY A VOTE OF TWO-THIRDS OF ITS MEMBERS, IN ITS DISCRETION TO SUCH SENATE ACCOUNTS AS THE COMMITTEE DEEMS NECESSARY. ALL OTHER APPROPRIATIONS MADE IN THIS ACT OR ANY OTHER FISCAL YEAR TO ANY OTHER ACCOUNT OF THE SENATE REMAINING UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PART MAY BE TRANSFERRED BY THE COMMITTEE ON MANAGEMENTS OPERATIONS, BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF ITS MEMBERS. SUCH POWER TO TRANSFER APPROPRIATIONS SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR.SECTION 262. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:REPRESENTATIVES' COMPENSATION, EXTRA COMPENSATION TO THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND LEADERS OF THE HOUSE OF 20260HB2400PN3765 - 331 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REPRESENTATIVES AND OTHER NECESSARY EXPENSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 42,230,000FOR CAUCUS OPERATIONS. FOR ALLOCATION IN SUCH AMOUNTS AS MAY BE DESIGNATED BY THE LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT COMMITTEE (R) AND THE LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT COMMITTEE (D) FOR PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL OTHER COMPENSATION AND NECESSARY EXPENSES INCURRED IN HIRING PERSONNEL AND STAFF FOR SERVICES IN THE FURTHERANCE OF THE OPERATIONS OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AS MAY BE APPROPRIATE, REQUIRED OR ARISE DURING LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS. OF THE SUM APPROPRIATED, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL DEPOSIT $80,622,880 IN THE CAUCUS OPERATIONS ACCOUNT (D) AND $74,421,120 IN THE CAUCUS OPERATIONS ACCOUNT (R). UPON PRESENTATION OF REQUISITIONS BY THE CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE FOR SUCH COMPENSATION OR EXPENSES, SUCH SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER DIRECTLY TO AND IN FAVOR OF THE PERSONS 20260HB2400PN3765 - 332 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DESIGNATED IN SUCH REQUISITIONS AS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SUCH COMPENSATION OR EXPENSES. AN ACCOUNTING, TOGETHER WITH SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS WHENEVER POSSIBLE, SHALL BE FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE CHIEF CLERK OF SUCH EXPENSES SINCE THE FILING OF THE PRIOR ACCOUNT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 155,044,000FOR THE OPERATION OF THE SPEAKER'S OFFICE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,910,000FOR BIPARTISAN MANAGEMENT COMMITTEE, CHIEF CLERK, COMPTROLLER AND THE COMMONWEALTH EMERGENCY MEDICAL SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 18,880,000MILEAGE: REPRESENTATIVES, OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 672,000FOR POSTAGE: CHIEF CLERK AND LEGISLATIVE JOURNAL.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,816,000FOR CONTINGENT EXPENSES (R) AND (D). THE SUM APPROPRIATED SHALL BE ALLOCATED TO THE OFFICERS AND MEMBERS IN THE SAME MANNER AND PROPORTION AS APPROPRIATIONS FOR CONTINGENT EXPENSES CONTAINED IN 20260HB2400PN3765 - 333 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 252 OF THE ACT OF JULY 4, 2004 (P.L.1837, NO.7A), KNOWN AS THE GENERAL APPROPRIATION ACT OF 2004.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,118,000THE ABOVE APPROPRIATIONS FOR POSTAGE AND FOR CONTINGENT EXPENSES SHALL BE PAID PRIOR TO THE PAYMENT OF SUCH EXPENSES ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER IN FAVOR OF THE OFFICERS ABOVE NAMED UPON THE PRESENTATION OF THEIR REQUISITIONS FOR THE SAME, PROVIDED THAT THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF REQUISITIONS FOR ADVANCEMENTS, LESS THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF EXPENDITURES MADE AS CERTIFIED BY SUCH OFFICERS TO THE STATE TREASURER, SHALL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF THE BOND OF THE OFFICER HAVING CONTROL OF THE DISBURSEMENT FROM THE FUNDS ADVANCED.MISCELLANEOUS EXPENSES: INCIDENTAL EXPENSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,569,000EXPENSES - REPRESENTATIVES: IN ADDITION TO ANNUAL REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES HERETOFORE AUTHORIZED BY LAW FOR EACH MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, EACH 20260HB2400PN3765 - 334 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MEMBER SHALL BE ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR ACTUAL EXPENSES, NOT EXCEEDING THE SUM OF $12,500 ANNUALLY, INCURRED FOR LODGING AND MEALS WHILE AWAY FROM HOME ON OFFICIAL LEGISLATIVE BUSINESS, HOME OFFICE EXPENSES, OFFICIAL POSTAGE, STAFF AND ALL OTHER EXPENSES INCIDENTAL TO LEGISLATIVE DUTIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,251,000LEGISLATIVE PRINTING AND EXPENSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 14,413,000FOR THE PAYMENT OF THE EXPENSES OF THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (R) OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES IN INVESTIGATING SCHOOLS, COLLEGES, UNIVERSITIES, CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTIONS, MENTAL HOSPITALS, MEDICAL AND SURGICAL HOSPITALS, HOMES AND OTHER INSTITUTIONS AND AGENCIES SUPPORTED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY APPROPRIATIONS FROM THE STATE TREASURY IN ANALYZING REPORTS, EXPENDITURES AND THE GENERAL OPERATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE INSTITUTIONS AND AGENCIES IN EXAMINING AND ANALYZING REQUESTS 20260HB2400PN3765 - 335 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF THE SAME AND OF THE VARIOUS DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS OF THE COMMONWEALTH, AND FOR THE COLLECTION OF DATA FROM OTHER STATES, ATTENDING SEMINARS AND CONFERENCES, AND IN COOPERATING AND EXCHANGING INFORMATION WITH LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCIAL COMMITTEES OF OTHER STATES, AND ANY OFFICE EXPENSES NECESSARY TO SERVE THE COMMITTEE AND ITS CHAIR, AND FOR THE NECESSARY CLERICAL ASSISTANCE AND OTHER ASSISTANCE, TRAVEL EXPENSES AND ALL OTHER EXPENSES DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE CHAIR IN COMPILING DATA AND INFORMATION CONNECTED WITH THE WORK OF THE COMMITTEE IN COMPILING COMPARATIVE COST AND OTHER FISCAL DATA AND INFORMATION FOR THE USE OF THE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES DURING LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS TO THE DISCHARGE OF SUCH DUTIES. THE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO EXAMINE AND INSPECT ALL PROPERTIES, EQUIPMENT, FACILITIES, FILES, RECORDS AND ACCOUNTS OF ANY 20260HB2400PN3765 - 336 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE OFFICE, DEPARTMENT, INSTITUTION, BOARD, COMMITTEE, COMMISSION OR AGENCY OR ANY INSTITUTION OR AGENCY SUPPORTED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY APPROPRIATION FROM THE STATE TREASURY AND TO ADMINISTER OATHS. THE SUM APPROPRIATED SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER IN FAVOR OF THE CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE ON THE PRESENTATION OF HIS REQUISITION FOR THE SAME. THE CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (R) SHALL, NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE TERMINATION OF HIS TERM OF OFFICE OR UNTIL HIS SUCCESSOR IS ELECTED AND ALSO WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ADJOURNMENT OF ANY REGULAR OR SPECIAL SESSION, FILE AN ACCOUNT, TOGETHER WITH SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS WHENEVER POSSIBLE, IN THE OFFICE OF THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (R), OF THE COMMITTEE'S EXPENSES SINCE THE FILING OF THE PRIOR ACCOUNT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,616,000FOR THE PAYMENT OF THE EXPENSES OF THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (D) OF THE HOUSE OF 20260HB2400PN3765 - 337 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REPRESENTATIVES IN INVESTIGATING SCHOOLS, COLLEGES, UNIVERSITIES, CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTIONS, MENTAL HOSPITALS, MEDICAL AND SURGICAL HOSPITALS, HOMES AND OTHER INSTITUTIONS AND AGENCIES SUPPORTED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY APPROPRIATIONS FROM THE STATE TREASURY IN ANALYZING REPORTS, EXPENDITURES, AND THE GENERAL OPERATION AND ADMINISTRATION OF THE INSTITUTIONS AND AGENCIES IN EXAMINING AND ANALYZING REQUESTS OF THE SAME AND OF THE VARIOUS DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS OF THE COMMONWEALTH AND FOR THE COLLECTION OF DATA FROM OTHER STATES, ATTENDING SEMINARS AND CONFERENCES, AND IN COOPERATING AND EXCHANGING INFORMATION WITH LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCIAL COMMITTEES OF OTHER STATES, AND ANY OFFICE EXPENSES NECESSARY TO SERVE THE COMMITTEE AND ITS CHAIR, AND FOR THE NECESSARY CLERICAL ASSISTANCE, AND OTHER ASSISTANCE, TRAVEL EXPENSES AND ALL OTHER EXPENSES DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE CHAIR IN COMPILING DATA AND INFORMATION 20260HB2400PN3765 - 338 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CONNECTED WITH THE WORK OF THE COMMITTEE IN COMPILING COMPARATIVE COST AND OTHER FISCAL DATA AND INFORMATION FOR THE USE OF THE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES DURING LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS TO THE DISCHARGE OF SUCH DUTIES. THE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO EXAMINE AND INSPECT ALL PROPERTIES, EQUIPMENT, FACILITIES, FILES, RECORDS AND ACCOUNTS OF ANY STATE OFFICE, DEPARTMENT, INSTITUTION, BOARD, COMMITTEE, COMMISSION OR AGENCY OR ANY INSTITUTION OR AGENCY SUPPORTED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY APPROPRIATION FROM THE STATE TREASURY AND TO ADMINISTER OATHS. THE SUM APPROPRIATED SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER IN FAVOR OF THE CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (D) ON THE PRESENTATION OF HIS REQUISITION FOR THE SAME. THE CHAIR OF THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (D) SHALL, NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE TERMINATION OF HIS TERM OF OFFICE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 339 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OR UNTIL HIS SUCCESSOR IS ELECTED AND ALSO WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ADJOURNMENT OF ANY REGULAR OR SPECIAL SESSION, FILE AN ACCOUNT, TOGETHER WITH SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS WHENEVER POSSIBLE, IN THE OFFICE OF THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS (D) OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, OF HIS EXPENSES SINCE THE FILING OF THE PRIOR ACCOUNT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,616,000THE COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS MAY ISSUE SUBPOENAS UNDER THE HAND AND SEAL OF THE MAJORITY CHAIR TO COMPEL THE ATTENDANCE OF WITNESSES AND THE PRODUCTION OF ANY PAPERS, BOOKS, ACCOUNTS, DOCUMENTS AND TESTIMONY TOUCHING MATTERS PROPERLY BEING INQUIRED INTO BY THE COMMITTEE AND TO CAUSE THE DEPOSITION OF WITNESSES EITHER RESIDING WITHIN OR WITHOUT THE STATE TO BE TAKEN IN THE MANNER PRESCRIBED BY LAW FOR TAKING DEPOSITIONS IN CIVIL ACTIONS.FOR THE PAYMENT TO THE SPECIAL LEADERSHIP ACCOUNT (R) FOR PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL OTHER INCIDENTAL EXPENSES INCURRED IN 20260HB2400PN3765 - 340 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HIRING PERSONNEL AND STAFF OR FOR SERVICES, WHICH, IN THE OPINION OF THE FLOOR LEADER, MAY BE REQUIRED OR ARISE DURING LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF ALL OTHER EXPENSES RELATED TO THE PERFORMANCE OF HIS DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES. THE SUM APPROPRIATED SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER IN FAVOR OF THE FLOOR LEADER ON THE PRESENTATION OF HIS REQUISITION FOR THE SAME. THE FLOOR LEADER SHALL, NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE TERMINATION OF HIS TERM OF OFFICE OR UNTIL HIS SUCCESSOR IS ELECTED AND ALSO WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ADJOURNMENT OF ANY REGULAR OR SPECIAL SESSION, FILE AN ACCOUNT, TOGETHER WITH SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS WHENEVER POSSIBLE, IN THE OFFICE OF THE FLOOR LEADER, OF SUCH EXPENSES SINCE THE FILING OF THE PRIOR ACCOUNT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,186,000FOR THE PAYMENT TO THE SPECIAL LEADERSHIP ACCOUNT (D) FOR PAYMENT 20260HB2400PN3765 - 341 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL OTHER INCIDENTAL EXPENSES INCURRED IN HIRING PERSONNEL AND STAFF OR FOR SERVICES WHICH, IN THE OPINION OF THE FLOOR LEADER, MAY BE REQUIRED OR ARISE DURING LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF ALL OTHER EXPENSES RELATED TO THE PERFORMANCE OF HIS DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES. THE SUM APPROPRIATED SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER IN FAVOR OF THE FLOOR LEADER ON THE PRESENTATION OF HIS REQUISITION FOR THE SAME. THE FLOOR LEADER SHALL, NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE TERMINATION OF HIS TERM OF OFFICE OR UNTIL HIS SUCCESSOR IS ELECTED AND ALSO WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ADJOURNMENT OF ANY REGULAR OR SPECIAL SESSION, FILE AN ACCOUNT, TOGETHER WITH SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS WHENEVER POSSIBLE, IN THE OFFICE OF THE FLOOR LEADER, OF SUCH EXPENSE SINCE THE FILING OF THE PRIOR ACCOUNT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,186,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 342 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ALL APPROPRIATIONS MADE IN THIS ACT OR IN ANY OTHER FISCAL YEAR TO ANY ACCOUNT OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES REMAINING UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PART, MAY BE TRANSFERRED BY THE AUTHORITY RESPONSIBLE FOR ADMINISTERING THE ACCOUNT, IN ITS DISCRETION, TO SUCH HOUSE ACCOUNTS AS THAT RESPONSIBLE AUTHORITY DEEMS NECESSARY. SUCH POWER TO TRANSFER APPROPRIATIONS SHALL BE LIMITED TO THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR.SUBPART DGOVERNMENT SUPPORT AGENCIESSECTION 271. LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE WORK OF THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU, INCLUDING THE CODE AND BULLETIN SECTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 11,000,000FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN AND PENNSYLVANIA CODE AND RELATED EXPENSES.20260HB2400PN3765 - 343 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,100,000FOR CONTINGENT EXPENSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 25,000SECTION 272. LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCE COMMITTEE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCE COMMITTEE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE WORK OF THE LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCE COMMITTEE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,270,000SECTION 273. LEGISLATIVE DATA PROCESSING COMMITTEE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE LEGISLATIVE DATA PROCESSING COMMITTEE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR SALARIES, WAGES, OTHER PERSONNEL EXPENSES, OPERATING COSTS, CONTRACTS, EQUIPMENT, SOFTWARE, OTHER INCIDENTAL EXPENSES AND COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE OPERATION OF THE LEGISLATIVE DATA PROCESSING CENTER, INCLUDING AN ALLOCATION OF $2,309,000 TO EACH OF THE SENATE REPUBLICAN AND DEMOCRATIC CAUCUS COMPUTER SERVICES 20260HB2400PN3765 - 344 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEPARTMENTS FOR THE PAYMENT OF OPERATING COSTS, CONTRACTS, EQUIPMENT, SOFTWARE, OTHER INCIDENTAL EXPENSES AND COSTS AT THE DIRECTION OF THE RESPECTIVE CAUCUS STAFF ADMINISTRATOR, AND AN ALLOCATION OF $9,500,000 TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES DEMOCRATIC CAUCUS COMPUTER SERVICES ACCOUNT, AND AN ALLOCATION OF $9,500,000 TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES REPUBLICAN CAUCUS COMPUTER SERVICES ACCOUNT FOR THE PAYMENT OF OPERATING COSTS, CONTRACTS, EQUIPMENT, SOFTWARE, OTHER INCIDENTAL EXPENSES AND COSTS AND AN ALLOCATION OF $400,000 TO EACH OF THE SENATE REPUBLICAN AND DEMOCRATIC CAUCUSES FOR COMMITTEE AND CONTINGENT EXPENSES TO BE ALLOCATED IN AMOUNTS DETERMINED BY UNANIMOUS AGREEMENT OF THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON MANAGEMENT OPERATIONS, AND AN ALLOCATION OF $400,000 TO EACH OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES DEMOCRATIC AND REPUBLICAN CAUCUSES FOR COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH CAUCUS OPERATIONS AND AN ALLOCATION OF $4,460,000 TO 20260HB2400PN3765 - 345 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES DEMOCRATIC CAUCUS FOR DISBURSEMENT BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 37,755,000SECTION 274. JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE WORK OF THE JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,951,000SECTION 275. LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMMISSION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMMISSION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL EXPENSES NECESSARY FOR THE WORK OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,283,000FOR THE COMPILATION AND DISTRIBUTION OF VARIOUS MUNICIPAL CODES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 24,000SECTION 276. (RESERVED).20260HB2400PN3765 - 346 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 277. LEGISLATIVE AUDIT ADVISORY COMMISSION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT ADVISORY COMMISSION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL EXPENSES NECESSARY FOR THE WORK OF THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT ADVISORY COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 285,000SECTION 278. INDEPENDENT REGULATORY REVIEW COMMISSION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE INDEPENDENT REGULATORY REVIEW COMMISSION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE WORK OF THE INDEPENDENT REGULATORY REVIEW COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,398,000SECTION 279. CAPITOL PRESERVATION COMMITTEE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE CAPITOL PRESERVATION COMMITTEE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE OPERATION OF THE CAPITOL PRESERVATION COMMITTEE.20260HB2400PN3765 - 347 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,827,000FOR THE RESTORATION OF THE CAPITOL AND ITS ARTIFACTS, INCLUDING SUPPORT FACILITIES AND SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,157,000SECTION 280. PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,053,000SECTION 281. CENTER FOR RURAL PENNSYLVANIA.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE CENTER FOR RURAL PENNSYLVANIA FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE CENTER FOR RURAL PENNSYLVANIA.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,250,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR THE CENTER FOR RURAL PENNSYLVANIA.(1) "RESEARCH FOR RURAL ISSUES."20260HB2400PN3765 - 348 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION....... 250,000SECTION 282. COMMONWEALTH MAIL PROCESSING CENTER.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE COMMONWEALTH MAIL PROCESSING CENTER FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR SALARIES, WAGES, OTHER PERSONNEL EXPENSES, OPERATING COSTS, CONTRACTS, EQUIPMENT, SOFTWARE, OTHER INCIDENTAL EXPENSES AND COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE OPERATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH MAIL PROCESSING CENTER, INCLUDING AN ALLOCATION OF $1,040,000 TO THE CHIEF CLERK OF THE SENATE FOR PAYMENT OF POSTAGE AND COMMUNICATION EXPENSES AS DETERMINED BY THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON MANAGEMENT OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,583,000SECTION 283. INDEPENDENT FISCAL OFFICE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE INDEPENDENT FISCAL OFFICE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL EXPENSES NECESSARY FOR THE WORK OF THE INDEPENDENT FISCAL OFFICE, INCLUDING UP TO $200,000 FOR PENSION ACTUARIAL ANALYSIS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 349 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,343,000PART IIISTATE LOTTERY FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 301. DEPARTMENT OF AGING.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE STATE LOTTERY FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 19,930,000FOR PENNCARE FOR OLDER PENNSYLVANIANS FOR THE PURPOSE OF DEVELOPING, OPERATING AND PURCHASING SERVICES FOR THE AGED AND OTHER ADULTS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, MODEL PROJECTS, COMMUNITY CARE SERVICES, AUDITS OF AREA AGENCIES ON AGING, PROTECTIVE SERVICES AND COUNSELING SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 299,262,000FOR PREADMISSION ASSESSMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,750,000FOR CAREGIVER SUPPORT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 12,103,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE STATE LOTTERY FUND TO THE PHARMACEUTICAL ASSISTANCE FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 155,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 350 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR ALZHEIMER'S OUTREACH.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 250,000FOR GRANTS TO SENIOR CENTERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,000,000FOR AGING OUR WAY, PA.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,950,000SECTION 302. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE STATE LOTTERY FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - TRANSPORTATION SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,000,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - COMMUNITY HEALTHCHOICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 521,766,000PART IVTOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 401. DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR LIFE SCIENCES GREENHOUSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,000,000SECTION 402. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.20260HB2400PN3765 - 351 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - COMMUNITY HEALTHCHOICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 168,905,000PART VJUDICIAL COMPUTER SYSTEM AUGMENTATION ACCOUNTAPPROPRIATIONSSECTION 501. SUPREME COURT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE JUDICIAL COMPUTER SYSTEM AUGMENTATION ACCOUNT TO THE SUPREME COURT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE STATEWIDE JUDICIAL COMPUTER SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 46,181,000PART VIEMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES OPERATING FUNDAPPROPRIATIONSSECTION 601. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES OPERATING FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES.20260HB2400PN3765 - 352 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 18,123,000FOR CATASTROPHIC MEDICAL AND REHABILITATION PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,800,000PART VIISTATE STORES FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 701. PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE STATE STORES FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR LIQUOR CONTROL ENFORCEMENT OPERATIONAL EXPENSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 40,241,000PART VIIIMOTOR LICENSE FUND APPROPRIATIONSSUBPART AMOTOR LICENSE FUNDSECTION 801. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE PROPER ADMINISTRATION OF THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, INCLUDING THE STATE TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION AND THE STATE TRANSPORTATION ADVISORY 20260HB2400PN3765 - 353 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMMITTEE AND THE STATEWIDE COORDINATION OF MUNICIPAL SERVICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 95,049,000FOR OPERATION OF WELCOME CENTERS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,971,000FOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE OPERATION OF THE HIGHWAY AND SAFETY IMPROVEMENT PROGRAMS, INCLUDING PLANNING AND RESEARCH, DESIGN, ENGINEERING, RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION AND THE OPERATION OF THE ENGINEERING DISTRICT FACILITIES AND LIAISON SERVICES WITH COMMUNITIES ON LOCAL ROAD ENGINEERING AND CONSTRUCTION ACTIVITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 950,000,000FOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION OF THE MAINTENANCE PROGRAM FOR STATE ROADS, BRIDGES, TUNNELS AND STRUCTURES, INCLUDING THE OPERATION OF THE COUNTY MAINTENANCE DISTRICT FACILITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,069,588,000FOR HIGHWAY SYSTEMS TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION.20260HB2400PN3765 - 354 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 25,000,000FOR REINVESTMENT IN DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 16,500,000FOR THE SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE TRAFFIC SAFETY PROGRAM AND THE ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION OF THE OPERATOR AND VEHICLE REGISTRATION PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 281,791,000FOR PAYMENTS TO MUNICIPALITIES PURSUANT TO THE ACT OF JUNE 1, 1956 (1955 P.L.1944, NO.655), REFERRED TO AS THE LIQUID FUELS TAX MUNICIPAL ALLOCATION LAW.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 30,000,000FOR PAYMENTS TO MUNICIPALITIES TO ASSIST IN MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION COSTS OF ROADS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 238,407,000FOR SUPPLEMENTAL PAYMENTS TO MUNICIPALITIES TO ASSIST IN MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION COSTS OF ROADS IN ACCORDANCE WITH 75 PA.C.S. CH. 93 (RELATING TO SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDING FOR MUNICIPAL HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE).STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 355 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FOR MAINTENANCE AND CONSTRUCTION OF COUNTY BRIDGES. AN ALLOCATION TO A COUNTY UNDER THIS APPROPRIATION MAY BE USED IN WHOLE OR IN PART BY THE COUNTY FOR GRANTS TO MUNICIPALITIES FOR DISTRIBUTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH 75 PA.C.S. § 9010(C) (RELATING TO DISPOSITION AND USE OF TAX).STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,000,000FOR MUNICIPAL TRAFFIC SIGNALS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 40,000,000SECTION 802. (RESERVED).SECTION 803. TREASURY DEPARTMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND TO THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL NECESSARY EXPENSES IN THE PROPER ADMINISTRATION OF THE PROGRAM TO REFUND LIQUID FUELS TAXES TO WHICH THE COMMONWEALTH IS NOT ENTITLED.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 615,000FOR THE PAYMENT OF PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST REQUIREMENTS ON GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS ISSUED FOR TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 356 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 37,388,000FOR PAYMENT OF PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST REQUIREMENTS ON GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS ISSUED FOR PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 21,190,000FOR PAYMENT OF THE COMPENSATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH'S LOAN AND TRANSFER AGENT FOR SERVICES AND EXPENSES IN CONNECTION WITH THE REGISTRATION, TRANSFER AND PAYMENT OF INTEREST ON BONDS OF THE COMMONWEALTH AND OTHER SERVICES REQUIRED TO BE PERFORMED BY THE LOAN AND TRANSFER AGENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 40,000SECTION 804. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR ADMINISTRATION OF THE WEIGHTS AND MEASURES PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,908,000FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION FOR THE MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENT OF DIRT AND GRAVEL ROADS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 28,000,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 357 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 805. (RESERVED).SECTION 806. DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE MAINTENANCE AND MITIGATION OF DUST AND SEDIMENT POLLUTION FROM FORESTRY ROADS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 7,000,000SECTION 807. (RESERVED).SECTION 808. (RESERVED).SECTION 809. DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR PAYMENT OF TORT CLAIMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 9,000,000SECTION 810. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF VARIOUS MOTOR LICENSE FUND TAX REGULATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 19,648,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 358 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 811. PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE MOTOR LICENSE FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 375,000,000SUBPART BAVIATION RESTRICTED ACCOUNTSECTION 821. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE AVIATION RESTRICTED ACCOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR PAYMENT FOR AVIATION OPERATIONS, INCLUDING THE OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF STATE-OWNED AIRCRAFT, PAYMENT OF GENERAL EXPENSES, SUPPLIES, PRINTING AND EQUIPMENT; FOR THE DEVELOPMENT AND MAINTENANCE OF STATE AIRPORTS AND THE MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR OF LANDING FIELDS, INTERMEDIATE LANDING FIELDS, LANDING FIELD EQUIPMENT, BEACON SITES AND OTHER NAVIGATION FACILITIES; AND FOR THE ENCOURAGEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT OF CIVIL AERONAUTICS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 359 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,989,000FOR AIRPORT DEVELOPMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,000,000FOR REAL ESTATE TAX REBATE PAYMENTS TO PRIVATELY OWNED PUBLIC USE AIRPORTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 250,000PART IXHAZARDOUS MATERIAL RESPONSE FUNDAPPROPRIATIONSSECTION 901. PENNSYLVANIA EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE HAZARDOUS MATERIAL RESPONSE FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATIONAL EXPENSES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 75,000FOR TRAINING PROGRAMS FOR HAZARDOUS MATERIAL RESPONSE TEAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 75,000FOR GRANTS TO SUPPORT COUNTIES' ACTIVITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 900,000FOR PUBLIC AND FACILITY OWNER EDUCATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 50,000PART XMILK MARKETING FUND APPROPRIATIONS20260HB2400PN3765 - 360 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 1001. MILK BOARD.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE MILK MARKETING FUND TO THE MILK BOARD FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE OPERATION OF THE MILK BOARD.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,947,000PART XIHOME INVESTMENT TRUST FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 1101. DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE HOME INVESTMENT TRUST FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATETHE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE AFFORDABLE HOUSING ACT:(1) "AFFORDABLE HOUSING ACT - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 4,000,000PART XIITUITION ACCOUNT GUARANTEED SAVINGSPROGRAM FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 1201. TREASURY DEPARTMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE TUITION 20260HB2400PN3765 - 361 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ACCOUNT GUARANTEED SAVINGS PROGRAM FUND TO THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE OPERATION OF THE TUITION ACCOUNT PROGRAM BUREAU.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,339,000PART XIIIBANKING FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 1301. DEPARTMENT OF BANKING AND SECURITIES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE BANKING FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF BANKING AND SECURITIES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF BANKING AND SECURITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 26,250,000PART XIVFIREARM RECORDS CHECK FUNDAPPROPRIATIONSSECTION 1401. PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE FIREARM RECORDS CHECK FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR ACTIVITIES ASSOCIATED WITH THE PURCHASE OF FIREARMS BY INDIVIDUALS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 362 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,623,000PART XVBEN FRANKLIN TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENTAUTHORITY FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 1501. DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE BEN FRANKLIN TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE BEN FRANKLIN TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 17,500,000PART XVIOIL AND GAS LEASE FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 1601. DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE OIL AND GAS LEASE FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 38,000,000FOR STATE PARKS OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 57,000,000FOR STATE FORESTS OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 50,000,000PART XVII20260HB2400PN3765 - 363 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HOME IMPROVEMENT ACCOUNT APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 1701. ATTORNEY GENERAL.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE HOME IMPROVEMENT ACCOUNT TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR:FEDERAL STATEFOR HOME IMPROVEMENT CONSUMER PROTECTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,901,000PART XVIIICIGARETTE FIRE SAFETY ANDFIREFIGHTER PROTECTION ACTENFORCEMENT FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 1801. ATTORNEY GENERAL.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE CIGARETTE FIRE SAFETY AND FIREFIGHTER PROTECTION ACT ENFORCEMENT FUND TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR CIGARETTE FIRE SAFETY AND FIREFIGHTER PROTECTION ENFORCEMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 50,000PART XIXINSURANCE REGULATION ANDOVERSIGHT FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 1901. INSURANCE DEPARTMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE INSURANCE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 364 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REGULATION AND OVERSIGHT FUND TO THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 44,281,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT:(1) "FOR INSURANCE MARKET REFORM."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 5,000,000PART XX(RESERVED)PART XXI(RESERVED)PART XXIIMULTIMODAL TRANSPORTATION FUND APPROPRIATIONS(RESERVED)PART XXIIISTATE RACING FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 2301. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE STATE RACING FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE STATE HORSE RACING COMMISSION.20260HB2400PN3765 - 365 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 8,371,000FOR THE PENNSYLVANIA EQUINE TOXICOLOGY AND RESEARCH LABORATORY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 15,649,000FOR HORSE RACING PROMOTION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,857,000SECTION 2302. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE STATE RACING FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR ADMINISTRATION OF RACING REVENUE COLLECTIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 281,000PART XXIVABLE SAVINGS PROGRAM FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 2401. TREASURY DEPARTMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE ABLE SAVINGS PROGRAM FUND TO THE TREASURY DEPARTMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE OPERATION OF THE PENNSYLVANIA ABLE SAVINGS PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,426,000PART XXVTOURISM PROMOTION FUND RESTRICTED ACCOUNT APPROPRIATIONS20260HB2400PN3765 - 366 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 2501. DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE TOURISM PROMOTION FUND RESTRICTED ACCOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR MARKETING TO ATTRACT TOURISTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 11,000,000PART XXVIENHANCED REVENUE COLLECTION ACCOUNTAPPROPRIATIONS(RESERVED)PART XXVIIPENNVEST DRINKING WATER REVOLVING FUNDAPPROPRIATIONSSECTION 2701. PENNSYLVANIA INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT AUTHORITY.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE PENNVEST DRINKING WATER REVOLVING FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT AUTHORITY FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATETHE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO THE PENNSYLVANIA INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT AUTHORITY:(1) "DRINKING WATER PROJECTS REVOLVING LOAN FUND."20260HB2400PN3765 - 367 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 43,000,000(1.1) "IIJA - DRINKING WATER PROJECTS REVOLVING LOAN FUND."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 500,000,000(2) "LOAN PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,500,000(2.1) "IIJA - LOAN PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 15,485,000(3) "TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO SMALL SYSTEMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,750,000(3.1) "IIJA - TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO SMALL SYSTEMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,452,000(4) "ASSISTANCE TO STATE PROGRAMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,000,000(4.1) "IIJA - ASSISTANCE TO STATE PROGRAMS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 8,400,000(5) "LOCAL ASSISTANCE AND SOURCE WATER POLLUTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 13,500,000(6) "IIJA - LOCAL ASSISTANCE AND SOURCE WATER POLLUTION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 1,857,000(7) "INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS."20260HB2400PN3765 - 368 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,000(8) "IIJA - EMERGING CONTAMINANTS IN SMALL OR DISADVANTAGED COMMUNITIES."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 112,099,000PART XXVIIIPENNVEST WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVINGFUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 2801. PENNSYLVANIA INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT AUTHORITY.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE PENNVEST WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT AUTHORITY FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATETHE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO THE PENNSYLVANIA INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT AUTHORITY:(1) "SEWAGE PROJECTS REVOLVING LOAN FUND."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 91,000,000(2) "IIJA - SEWAGE PROJECTS REVOLVING LOAN FUND."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 350,000,000(3) "OVERFLOW AND STORM WATER GRANTS."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 6,400,000PART XXIX20260HB2400PN3765 - 369 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OPIOID SETTLEMENT RESTRICTED ACCOUNT APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 2901. DEPARTMENT OF DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE OPIOID SETTLEMENT RESTRICTED ACCOUNT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEOPIOID SETTLEMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 31,825,000PART XXXSTATE GAMING FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 3001. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE STATE GAMING FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE ANIMAL HEALTH AND DIAGNOSTIC COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 13,350,000FOR TRANSFER FROM THE STATE GAMING FUND TO THE STATE FARM PRODUCTS SHOW FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,000,000FOR PAYMENTS TO PENNSYLVANIA FAIRS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,000,000FOR PENNSYLVANIA VETERINARY LAB.20260HB2400PN3765 - 370 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,309,000SECTION 3002. DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE STATE GAMING FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR STATEWIDE MARKETING AND ADMINISTRATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 19,559,000FOR AMERICA250PA.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,250,000SECTION 3003. DEPARTMENT OF DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE STATE GAMING FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR ASSISTANCE TO DRUG AND ALCOHOL PROGRAMS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 44,732,000PART LIADDITIONAL APPROPRIATIONS FORPRIOR FISCAL YEARSUBPART AGENERAL PROVISIONSSECTION 5101. STATE APPROPRIATIONS.(A) GENERAL FUND.--THE SUMS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART, OR AS MUCH THEREOF AS MAY BE NECESSARY, ARE SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED 20260HB2400PN3765 - 371 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO AGENCIES OF THE EXECUTIVE AND LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH FOR THE PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES OR OTHER COMPENSATION AND TRAVEL EXPENSES OF THE DULY ELECTED OR APPOINTED OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMONWEALTH, FOR THE PAYMENT OF FEES FOR CONTRACTUAL SERVICES RENDERED, FOR THE PURCHASE OR RENTAL OF GOODS AND SERVICES, PRINTING, PUBLIC ADVERTISING BY OR THROUGH ANY MEDIUM, EQUIPMENT, LAND AND BUILDINGS AND FOR PAYMENT OF ANY OTHER EXPENSES, AS PROVIDED BY LAW OR BY THIS ACT, NECESSARY FOR THE PROPER CONDUCT OF THE DUTIES, FUNCTIONS AND ACTIVITIES AND FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS PART FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF BILLS INCURRED AND REMAINING UNPAID AT THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.(B) SPECIAL FUNDS AND ACCOUNTS.--THE SUMS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART, OR AS MUCH THEREOF AS MAY BE NECESSARY, ARE SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED FROM THE SPECIAL FUNDS AND ACCOUNTS IN THE STATE TREASURY TO AGENCIES OF THE EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH FOR THE PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES OR OTHER COMPENSATION AND TRAVEL EXPENSES OF THE DULY APPOINTED OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMONWEALTH, FOR THE PAYMENT OF FEES FOR CONTRACTUAL SERVICES RENDERED, FOR THE PURCHASE OR RENTAL OF GOODS AND SERVICES AND FOR PAYMENT OF ANY OTHER EXPENSES, AS PROVIDED BY LAW OR BY THIS ACT, NECESSARY FOR THE PROPER CONDUCT OF THE DUTIES, FUNCTIONS AND ACTIVITIES AND FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS PART FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF BILLS INCURRED AND REMAINING UNPAID AT THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.SECTION 5102. FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS.THE FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART, OR AS MUCH 20260HB2400PN3765 - 372 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THEREOF AS MAY BE NECESSARY, ARE SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED TO THE AGENCIES OF THE EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH SPECIFIED IN THIS PART FOR THE PAYMENT OF THE EXPENSES OF IMPLEMENTING AND CARRYING OUT THE PROGRAMS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR AND FOR THE PAYMENT OF BILLS INCURRED AND REMAINING UNPAID AT THE CLOSE OF THE FISCAL YEAR IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR. UNLESS OTHERWISE STATED, THE FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS INCLUDE ANY CARRYOVERS FROM THE FISCAL YEAR IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.SUBPART BGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONSEXECUTIVE DEPARTMENTSECTION 5111. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR FRUIT GROWER DISASTER SUPPORT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,000,000SECTION 5112. DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT EMERGENCY HOUSING SUPPORT.20260HB2400PN3765 - 373 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 22,500,000FOR COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC ASSISTANCE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 161,725,000SECTION 5113. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR PAYMENTS ON ACCOUNT OF PUPIL TRANSPORTATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 720,957,000FOR GRANTS TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS TO ASSIST IN MEETING FEDERAL MATCHING REQUIREMENTS FOR GRANTS RECEIVED UNDER THE FEDERAL CHILD NUTRITION ACT OF 1966 AND TO AID IN PROVIDING A FOOD PROGRAM FOR NEEDY CHILDREN.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 83,498,000FOR PAYMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH'S SHARE OF FEDERAL SOCIAL SECURITY TAXES FOR CERTAIN PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 691,533,000SECTION 5114. STATE SYSTEM OF HIGHER EDUCATION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE STATE SYSTEM OF 20260HB2400PN3765 - 374 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HIGHER EDUCATION FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR STATE FACILITIES TRANSITION AND IMPROVEMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 78,102,000SECTION 5115. PENNSYLVANIA HIGHER EDUCATION ASSISTANCE AGENCY.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE PENNSYLVANIA HIGHER EDUCATION ASSISTANCE AGENCY FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR MATCHING PAYMENTS FOR STUDENT AID FUNDS..STATE APPROPRIATION....... 16,146,000SECTION 5116. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR TRANSFER TO THE HAZARDOUS SITES CLEANUP FUND.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 20,000,000SECTION 5117. (RESERVED).SECTION 5118. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATE20260HB2400PN3765 - 375 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS:(1) "RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION PROGRAM RESTRICTED ACCOUNT - ADMINISTRATION."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 10,000,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR CASH ASSISTANCE:(1) "SUMMER EBT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 255,000,000FOR SUPPLEMENTAL GRANTS TO AGED, BLIND AND DISABLED PERSONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 112,101,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS - CAPITATION PLANS. FOR PROVISION OF OUTPATIENT SERVICES AND INPATIENT HOSPITAL SERVICES TO ELIGIBLE PERSONS ENROLLED IN AN APPROVED CAPITATION PLAN.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 3,017,959,000FOR PRIMARY HEALTH CARE AND PREVENTIVE SERVICES FOR ELIGIBLE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE RECIPIENTS IN THE FEE-FOR-SERVICE DELIVERY SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 711,984,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 376 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR ELIGIBLE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE RECIPIENTS IN THE FEE-FOR-SERVICE DELIVERY SYSTEM:(1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - FEE-FOR-SERVICE."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 2,217,037,000(2) "RURAL HEALTH TRANSFORMATION PROGRAM RESTRICTED ACCOUNT."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 184,000,000FOR PAYMENT TO THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE MEDICARE DRUG PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,080,029,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - WORKERS WITH DISABILITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 115,427,000FOR CHILDREN'S HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 92,953,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - LONG-TERM LIVING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 246,132,000THE FOLLOWING FEDERAL AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED TO SUPPLEMENT THE SUM APPROPRIATED FOR LONG-TERM LIVING:20260HB2400PN3765 - 377 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) "MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - LONG-TERM LIVING."FEDERAL APPROPRIATION..... 221,925,000FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - COMMUNITY HEALTHCHOICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 5,784,975,000FOR LONG-TERM CARE - MANAGED CARE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 183,627,000FOR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES - COMMUNITY-BASED PROGRAM, WHICH SHALL INCLUDE GRANTS TO COUNTIES FOR NONINSTITUTIONAL PROGRAMS, OR OTHER COUNTY-BASED HUMAN SERVICES INCLUDED UNDER THE HUMAN SERVICES BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM, EXCLUSIVE OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 163,181,000FOR INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES - INTERMEDIATE CARE FACILITIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 164,337,000FOR SERVICES TO PERSONS WITH AUTISM SPECTRUM DISORDERS, INCLUDING OVERSIGHT, SUPPORTIVE SERVICES AND PROVIDER TRAINING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 35,271,000SECTION 5119. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR 20260HB2400PN3765 - 378 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND INDUSTRY FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR GENERAL GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 16,688,000FOR OCCUPATIONAL AND INDUSTRIAL SAFETY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 6,353,000FOR APPRENTICESHIP TRAINING.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,000,000SECTION 5120. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR PAYMENT OF GRATUITIES FOR THE EDUCATION OF CHILDREN OF CERTAIN VETERANS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 400,000SUBPART CGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONSGENERAL ASSEMBLYSECTION 5131. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR CAUCUS OPERATIONS. FOR 20260HB2400PN3765 - 379 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ALLOCATION IN SUCH AMOUNTS AS MAY BE DESIGNATED BY THE LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT COMMITTEE (R) AND THE LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT COMMITTEE (D) FOR PAYMENT OF SALARIES, WAGES AND ALL OTHER COMPENSATION AND NECESSARY EXPENSES INCURRED IN HIRING PERSONNEL AND STAFF FOR SERVICES IN THE FURTHERANCE OF THE OPERATIONS OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AS MAY BE APPROPRIATE, REQUIRED OR ARISE DURING LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS AND DURING THE INTERIM BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS. OF THE SUM APPROPRIATED, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL DEPOSIT $80,622,880 IN THE CAUCUS OPERATIONS ACCOUNT (D) AND $74,421,120 IN THE CAUCUS OPERATIONS ACCOUNT (R). UPON PRESENTATION OF REQUISITIONS BY THE CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE FOR SUCH COMPENSATION OR EXPENSES, SUCH SHALL BE PAID ON WARRANT OF THE STATE TREASURER DIRECTLY TO AND IN FAVOR OF THE PERSONS DESIGNATED IN SUCH REQUISITIONS AS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SUCH COMPENSATION OR EXPENSES. AN ACCOUNTING, TOGETHER WITH 20260HB2400PN3765 - 380 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUPPORTING DOCUMENTS WHENEVER POSSIBLE, SHALL BE FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE CHIEF CLERK OF SUCH EXPENSES SINCE THE FILING OF THE PRIOR ACCOUNT.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 155,044,000FOR THE OPERATION OF THE SPEAKER'S OFFICE.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 2,910,000SUBPART DGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONSJUDICIAL DEPARTMENTSECTION 5141. SUPREME COURT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE SUPREME COURT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SUPREME COURT: INCLUDING THE SALARIES OF THE SUPREME COURT JUSTICES, FOR THE OFFICE OF PROTHONOTARY AND FOR THE LIBRARY IN THE EASTERN DISTRICT AND WESTERN DISTRICT, FOR THE OFFICE OF PROTHONOTARY IN THE MIDDLE DISTRICT, FOR CRIERS, TIPSTAVES, OFFICIAL STENOGRAPHERS, COURT OFFICERS AND THE LAW SECRETARY OF THE CHIEF JUSTICE IN EASTERN, MIDDLE AND WESTERN DISTRICTS AND WORKERS' 20260HB2400PN3765 - 381 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMPENSATION INSURANCE PREMIUMS FOR ALL SUPREME COURT EMPLOYEES NOT FUNDED BY OTHER APPROPRIATIONS, FOR THE OFFICE OF STATE REPORTERS, INCLUDING THE SALARIES AND COMPENSATION OF EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING THE FEES FOR PROTHONOTARIES OF THE SUPREME COURT OF THE EASTERN, MIDDLE AND WESTERN DISTRICTS ON ASSIGNMENT TO JUDGES TO COUNTIES OTHER THAN THEIR OWN, AND FURTHER INCLUDING ASSESSMENTS FOR THE NATIONAL CENTER OF STATE COURTS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 21,621,000FOR JUDICIAL CENTER OPERATIONS.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,253,000FOR UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM CYBERSECURITY AND DISASTER RECOVERY.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 4,599,000FOR DISTRICT COURT ADMINISTRATORS FOR THE UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 28,248,000FOR THE INTERBRANCH COMMISSION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 368,000FOR THE COURT ADMINISTRATOR OF 20260HB2400PN3765 - 382 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PENNSYLVANIA, INCLUDING THE EXPENSES OF THE JUDICIAL COUNCIL OF PENNSYLVANIA AND THE DISTRICT JUSTICE ADMINISTRATOR.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 15,919,000SECTION 5142. SUPERIOR COURT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE SUPERIOR COURT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF THE SUPERIOR COURT: INCLUDING THE SALARY OF THE SUPERIOR COURT JUDGES, FOR PANELIZATION OF JUDGES PROGRAM, FOR CRIERS, TIPSTAVES, OFFICIAL STENOGRAPHERS, COURT OFFICERS AND LAW SECRETARY OF THE PRESIDENT JUDGE AND WORKERS' COMPENSATION INSURANCE PREMIUMS FOR ALL EMPLOYEES OF THE SUPERIOR COURT, FOR THE PROTHONOTARY'S OFFICE IN THE PHILADELPHIA DISTRICT, INCLUDING SALARIES AND COMPENSATION FOR EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING THE EXPENSES OF DOCKETS, STATIONERY, SUPPLIES, BOOKS FOR THE LIBRARY AND OTHER COSTS OF THE SUPERIOR COURT AND ITS OFFICES.20260HB2400PN3765 - 383 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATE APPROPRIATION....... 41,405,000SECTION 5143. COMMONWEALTH COURT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO COMMONWEALTH COURT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES OF JUDGES AND FOR THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF EMPLOYEES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 26,123,000SECTION 5144. COURTS OF COMMON PLEAS.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE COURTS OF COMMON PLEAS FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE COURTS OF COMMON PLEAS: INCLUDING THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF JUDGES, INCLUDING THE EXPENSES OF TRAVELING JUDGES, INCLUDING THE MILEAGE IN DIVIDED JUDICIAL DISTRICTS, AND THE PAYMENT OF A PER DIEM SALARY, MILEAGE AND MISCELLANEOUS EXPENSES TO ACTIVE VISITING JUDGES FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR OFFICIAL DUTIES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 156,886,000FOR COMMON PLEAS JUDICIAL EDUCATION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 1,545,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 384 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 5145. COMMUNITY COURTS - MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE COMMUNITY COURTS AND MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGES FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF COMMUNITY COURT JUDGES AND MAGISTERIAL DISTRICT JUDGES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 107,956,000SECTION 5146. (RESERVED).SECTION 5147. PHILADELPHIA MUNICIPAL COURT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE PHILADELPHIA MUNICIPAL COURT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR THE SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF JUDGES AND HEARING OFFICERS, INCLUDING THE TRAFFIC DIVISION.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 10,255,000SECTION 5148. JUDICIAL CONDUCT.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR JUDICIAL CONDUCT FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR SALARIES AND EXPENSES OF THE JUDICIAL ETHICS ADVISORY BOARD.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 269,00020260HB2400PN3765 - 385 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBPART E(RESERVED)SUBPART FTOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUND APPROPRIATIONSSECTION 5151. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS ARE APPROPRIATED FROM THE TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR: FEDERAL STATEFOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE - COMMUNITY HEALTHCHOICES.STATE APPROPRIATION....... 130,754,000SUBPART HMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS FOR PRIOR FISCAL YEARSECTION 5161. PRIOR LAWS UNAFFECTED.THIS PART IS NOT INTENDED TO BE INCONSISTENT WITH OR TO REPEAL ANY PROVISION OF ANY ACT ENACTED AT THIS OR ANY PRIOR SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REGULATING THE PURCHASE OF SUPPLIES, THE ORDERING OF PRINTING AND BINDING, THE PURCHASE, MAINTENANCE AND USE OF AUTOMOBILES, THE METHOD OF MAKING PAYMENTS FROM THE STATE TREASURY FOR ANY PURPOSE OR THE FUNCTIONING OF ANY ADMINISTRATIVE DEPARTMENT, BOARD OR COMMISSION.SECTION 5162. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAW BEFORE FUNDS AVAILABLE.NO APPROPRIATION MADE BY THIS PART TO ANY DEPARTMENT, BOARD, COMMISSION OR AGENCY OF THE EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT SHALL BE AVAILABLE UNLESS AND UNTIL THE DEPARTMENT, BOARD, COMMISSION OR AGENCY HAS COMPLIED WITH SECTIONS 615 AND 616 OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 386 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CODE OF 1929.SECTION 5163. CONTRACTS PREREQUISITE TO ENCUMBERING OR COMMITTING FUNDS.FUNDS FOR THE PURCHASE OF SUPPLIES, MATERIALS AND EQUIPMENT SHALL NOT BE DEEMED TO BE COMMITTED OR ENCUMBERED UNTIL CONTRACTS COVERING THE PURCHASE HAVE BEEN ENTERED INTO WITH THE VENDORS.SECTION 5164. MINORITY BUSINESS SET-ASIDES.(A) DUTY TO REPORT.--EACH DEPARTMENT OR OTHER INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE COMMONWEALTH LISTED IN THIS PART AUTHORIZED TO CONTRACT FOR BUILDINGS, HIGHWAYS, COMMODITIES, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES OR SERVICES SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ALL INFORMATION PERTINENT TO ANTICIPATED PROCUREMENT NEEDS AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH FISCAL YEAR AND EACH FISCAL QUARTER THEREAFTER.(B) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "MINORITY BUSINESS" MEANS A MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE AS DEFINED IN THE ACT OF JULY 22, 1974 (P.L.598, NO.206), KNOWN AS THE PENNSYLVANIA MINORITY BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ACT.SECTION 5165. APPROPRIATION OF FUNDS FROM MISCELLANEOUS SOURCES.IN ADDITION TO THE AMOUNTS APPROPRIATED BY THIS PART:(1) MONEYS RECEIVED IN PAYMENT FOR FOOD AND HOUSEHOLD SUPPLIES FURNISHED TO EMPLOYEES AND OTHER PERSONS, EXCEPT INMATES, BY AN INSTITUTION, AND MONEYS RECEIVED FROM THE PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF ANY PRODUCTS OF THE SOIL, MEATS, LIVESTOCK, TIMBER OR OTHER MATERIALS SOLD BY THE DEPARTMENT SHALL BE PAID INTO THE GENERAL FUND AND ARE APPROPRIATED OUT OF THE GENERAL FUND TO THE SEVERAL RESPECTIVE INSTITUTIONS FOR THE OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF THE INSTITUTIONS.20260HB2400PN3765 - 387 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) MONEYS RECEIVED FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE, EXCEPT THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, AS CONTRIBUTIONS FOR THE PROGRAMS PROVIDED IN THIS PART OR AS PAYMENT FOR SERVICES OR MATERIALS FURNISHED BY ONE INSTITUTION TO ANOTHER, EXCEPT THOSE COLLECTIONS DESIGNATED AS REVENUES, SHALL BE PAID INTO THE GENERAL FUND AND ARE APPROPRIATED OUT OF THE GENERAL FUND FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE RESPECTIVE APPROPRIATIONS.(3) MONEYS RECEIVED BY A DEPARTMENT OR AGENCY OF THE COMMONWEALTH FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE, EXCEPT THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, AS CONTRIBUTIONS OR SUPPLEMENTS TO THE DEPARTMENT OR AGENCY FOR A PROGRAM OR ADMINISTRATION OF AN ACT INCLUDED IN THIS PART SHALL BE PAID INTO THE GENERAL FUND AND CREDITED TO THE APPROPRIATION FOR THAT PROGRAM OR ADMINISTRATION OF THAT ACT.SECTION 5166. LAPSING OF UNUSED FUNDS.EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW OR BY THIS SECTION, THAT PART OF ALL APPROPRIATIONS IN THIS PART UNEXPENDED, UNCOMMITTED OR UNENCUMBERED AS OF JUNE 30, 2026, SHALL AUTOMATICALLY LAPSE AS OF THAT DATE.SECTION 5167. CONSTRUCTION WITH PRIOR APPROPRIATION ACTS.ANY APPROPRIATION IN THIS PART WHICH IS THE SAME OR SIMILAR TO ANY APPROPRIATION IN THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L. , NO.1A), KNOWN AS THE GENERAL APPROPRIATION ACT OF 2025, SHALL REPLACE THAT APPROPRIATION.SECTION 5168. DEDUCTION OF EXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS UNDER PRIOR LAW.ANY MONEY WHICH HAS BEEN APPROPRIATED AND EXPENDED UNDER THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L. , NO.1A), KNOWN AS THE GENERAL APPROPRIATION ACT OF 2025, SHALL BE DEDUCTED FROM THE CORRESPONDING APPROPRIATION IN THIS PART.20260HB2400PN3765 - 388 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PART LXISPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR FEDERAL FUNDSFOR CURRENT FISCAL YEARSECTION 6101. GENERAL FUND REPOSITORY FOR FEDERAL FUNDS.MONEYS RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT AS CONTRIBUTIONS OR SUPPLEMENTS TO THE DEPARTMENTS OR AGENCIES OF THE COMMONWEALTH OR THE PROGRAMS PROVIDED IN THIS ACT SHALL BE PAID INTO THE GENERAL FUND.SECTION 6102. LIMITATION ON ENCUMBERING OR SPENDING FEDERAL FUNDS.FEDERAL FUNDS SHALL BE ENCUMBERED OR SPENT ONLY TO THE EXTENT THAT THE MONEY IS ESTIMATED AS BEING AVAILABLE DURING THE FISCAL YEAR OF THE COMMONWEALTH.SECTION 6103. APPROPRIATION OF PRIOR UNSPENT FEDERAL FUNDS.(A) GENERAL RULE.--FEDERAL MONEYS THAT HAVE BEEN PREVIOUSLY APPROPRIATED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND AUTHORIZED OR ALLOCATED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT BUT REMAIN UNSPENT FROM THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR OR PREVIOUS FISCAL YEARS AND WILL NOT BE RENEWED FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR ARE APPROPRIATED.(B) DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES.--THE FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES INCLUDE ANY PRIOR EARNINGS THAT MAY BE RECEIVED DURING THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR. IN ADDITION TO THE AMOUNTS SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED IN THIS ACT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, ALL MONEYS APPROPRIATED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT DURING A PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR WHICH ARE EXPECTED TO BE RECEIVED AS REIMBURSEMENTS MAY BE CARRIED FORWARD UNTIL THE CLOSE OF THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR TO THE EXTENT THAT OBLIGATIONS ARE CARRIED FORWARD. IN ADDITION, REIMBURSEMENTS ACTUALLY RECEIVED TO SUPPORT THE OBLIGATIONS MAY ALSO BE CARRIED FORWARD.20260HB2400PN3765 - 389 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 6104. SUBGRANTS BETWEEN FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS.SUBGRANTS MAY BE MADE BETWEEN FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS WITHOUT FURTHER APPROVAL OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY. THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET SHALL SUBMIT A LIST OF SUBGRANTS TO THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES QUARTERLY. NO SUBGRANT TO A STATE AGENCY, HOWEVER, MAY BE MADE FROM A RESTRICTED RECEIPT ACCOUNT WITHOUT A SPECIFIC APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.SECTION 6105. UTILIZATION OF EMERGENCY FEDERAL FUNDS.(A) NATURAL DISASTERS AND CIVIL DISOBEDIENCE.--FEDERAL FUNDS AVAILABLE FOR COSTS AND DAMAGES RESULTING FROM NATURAL DISASTERS OR CIVIL DISOBEDIENCE MAY BE ADDED TO AN APPROPRIATION CONTAINED IN THIS ACT OR TO FUNDS OTHERWISE APPROPRIATED OR MAY BE USED FOR THE PURPOSES PRESCRIBED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.(B) OTHER EMERGENCIES.--IN ADDITION TO THE MONEYS APPROPRIATED BY THIS ACT, MONEYS RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR THE PURPOSE OF DISASTER ASSISTANCE OR RELIEF, OR OTHER MONEYS RECEIVED AS A DIRECT RESULT OF TERRORIST ACTS, MONEYS FOR HOMELAND SECURITY AND DEFENSE AND MONEYS FOR AVIAN FLU/PANDEMIC PREPAREDNESS SHALL BE PAID INTO THE GENERAL FUND AND ARE APPROPRIATED OUT OF THE GENERAL FUND TO THE DEPARTMENTS, BOARDS, COMMISSIONS OR AGENCIES DESIGNATED BY THE GOVERNOR.(C) EXECUTIVE AUTHORIZATION.--IN THE EVENT OF AN EMERGENCY SITUATION IN WHICH THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY CANNOT ACT IN SUFFICIENT TIME, THE GOVERNOR IS AUTHORIZED THROUGH EXECUTIVE AUTHORIZATION TO PROVIDE UP TO $10,000,000 IN FEDERAL FUNDS TO ALLEVIATE THE EMERGENCY SITUATION.(D) FEDERAL FUNDING RELATED TO COVID-19 AND THE IMPACT OF COVID-19.--THE FOLLOWING APPLY TO FUNDS RECEIVED FROM THE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 390 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR ASSISTANCE WITH THE RESPONSE TO THE COVID-19 PANDEMIC AND THE ECONOMIC IMPACT OF THE COVID-19 PANDEMIC:(1) FOR FEDERAL FUNDS WHICH ARE REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW TO BE ALLOCATED TO A SPECIFIC PROGRAM WHICH IS IN EXISTENCE PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, THE FEDERAL FUNDS ARE HEREBY APPROPRIATED TO THE PROGRAM.(2) FOR FEDERAL FUNDS WHICH ARE REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW TO BE ALLOCATED BY THE COMMONWEALTH ACCORDING TO A FORMULA MANDATED BY FEDERAL LAW, THE FEDERAL FUNDS ARE HEREBY APPROPRIATED FOR ALLOCATION ACCORDING TO THE FORMULA.(3) ALL OTHER FEDERAL FUNDS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN THE COVID-19 RESPONSE RESTRICTED ACCOUNT AND SHALL ONLY BE USED UPON APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.(E) DEFINITION.--FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, "EMERGENCY" IS DEFINED AS A SITUATION IN WHICH THERE IS A CHANCE OF OR WHICH MAY RESULT IN SUBSTANTIAL HUMAN SUFFERING.SECTION 6105.1. FEDERAL FUNDING RELATING TO INFRASTRUCTURE.THE FOLLOWING APPLY TO FUNDS RECEIVED FROM THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS:(1) FOR FEDERAL FUNDS WHICH ARE REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW TO BE ALLOCATED TO A SPECIFIC PROGRAM WHICH IS IN EXISTENCE PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, THE FEDERAL FUNDS ARE APPROPRIATED TO THE PROGRAM.(2) FOR FEDERAL FUNDS WHICH ARE REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW TO BE ALLOCATED BY THE COMMONWEALTH ACCORDING TO A FORMULA MANDATED BY FEDERAL LAW, THE FEDERAL FUNDS ARE APPROPRIATED FOR ALLOCATION ACCORDING TO THE FORMULA.(3) ALL OTHER FEDERAL FUNDS UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 391 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DEPOSITED IN THE FEDERAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT ACCOUNT AND SHALL ONLY BE USED UPON APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.SECTION 6106. TRANSFER OF FUNDS FROM TANFBG TO CCDFBG AND SSBG.IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW WHICH PERMITS THE TRANSFER OF FUNDS FROM THE TANFBG TO THE CCDFBG AND SSBG, THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, UPON APPROVAL OF THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET, MAY TRANSFER FUNDS, PROVIDED THAT THE TRANSFER WILL NOT RESULT IN A DEFICIT IN AN APPROPRIATION FROM WHICH FUNDS ARE TRANSFERRED. THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET SHALL PROVIDE 10 DAYS' PRIOR NOTIFICATION OF THE TRANSFER TO THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.SECTION 6107. TRANSFERS OF FEDERAL APPROPRIATIONS FOR GRANTS MANAGEMENT.NOTWITHSTANDING THE ACT OF JUNE 29, 1976 (P.L.469, NO.117), ENTITLED "AN ACT RELATING TO THE FISCAL AFFAIRS OF THE COMMONWEALTH CONCERNING DUTIES OF THE GOVERNOR, THE SECRETARY OF REVENUE AND THE BUDGET SECRETARY, WITH RESPECT TO THE SUBMISSION OF AND SIGNING THE BUDGET FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR; AND, AFTER A BUDGET IS ENACTED, REGULATING THE ISSUANCE OF WARRANTS BY THE STATE TREASURER FOR CERTAIN REQUISITIONED FUNDS AND IMPOSING DUTIES ON PERSONS AUTHORIZED BY LAW TO ISSUE REQUISITIONS FOR THE PAYMENT OF MONEYS FROM THE STATE TREASURY; AND PRESCRIBING THAT FEDERAL FUNDS RECEIVED BY THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN THE GENERAL FUND ACCOUNT WITH CERTAIN EXCEPTIONS," THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET MAY TRANSFER FEDERAL FUNDS APPROPRIATED UNDER THIS ACT BETWEEN LINE ITEM APPROPRIATIONS, RENAME LINE ITEM APPROPRIATIONS OF FEDERAL FUNDS WHEN NECESSARY 20260HB2400PN3765 - 392 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TO REFLECT CONSOLIDATION OF APPROPRIATIONS OR CHANGES OF FEDERAL GRANT ACTIVITIES WITHIN AN APPROPRIATION OR TRANSFER FEDERAL FUNDS INTO NEW EXECUTIVE AUTHORIZATIONS. THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE AT LEAST 10 DAYS BEFORE ANY ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.PART LXXIMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSFOR CURRENT FISCAL YEARSECTION 7101. PRIOR LAWS UNAFFECTED.THIS ACT IS NOT INTENDED TO BE INCONSISTENT WITH OR TO REPEAL ANY PROVISION OF ANY ACT ENACTED AT THIS OR ANY PRIOR SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REGULATING THE PURCHASE OF SUPPLIES, THE ORDERING OF PRINTING AND BINDING, THE PURCHASE, MAINTENANCE AND USE OF MOTOR VEHICLES, THE METHOD OF MAKING PAYMENTS FROM THE STATE TREASURY FOR ANY PURPOSE OR THE FUNCTIONING OF ANY ADMINISTRATIVE DEPARTMENT, BOARD OR COMMISSION.SECTION 7102. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAW BEFORE FUNDS AVAILABLE.NO APPROPRIATION MADE BY THIS ACT TO ANY DEPARTMENT, BOARD, COMMISSION OR AGENCY OF THE EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT SHALL BE AVAILABLE UNLESS AND UNTIL THE DEPARTMENT, BOARD, COMMISSION OR AGENCY HAS COMPLIED WITH SECTIONS 615 AND 616 OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929.SECTION 7103. CONTRACTS PREREQUISITE TO ENCUMBERING OR COMMITTING FUNDS.FUNDS AVAILABLE TO AGENCIES, BOARDS, DEPARTMENTS, COMMISSIONS OR OTHER GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES UNDER THIS ACT FOR THE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 393 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROCUREMENT OF SUPPLIES, SERVICES OR CONSTRUCTION SHALL NOT BE AVAILABLE FOR PAYMENT OF OR TO BE COMMITTED TO OR ENCUMBERED FOR PAYMENT OF THE PROCUREMENT UNLESS AND UNTIL THE AGENCY, BOARD, DEPARTMENT OR OTHER GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY HAS COMPLIED WITH ALL OF THE REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE TO THE PROCUREMENT THAT ARE SPECIFIED IN 62 PA.C.S. (RELATING TO PROCUREMENT) AND IN THE POLICIES, PROCEDURES AND REGULATIONS INSTITUTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 62 PA.C.S.SECTION 7104. MINORITY BUSINESS SET-ASIDES.(A) DUTY TO REPORT.--EACH DEPARTMENT OR OTHER INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE COMMONWEALTH LISTED IN SUBPART A OF PART II AUTHORIZED TO CONTRACT FOR BUILDINGS, HIGHWAYS, COMMODITIES, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES OR SERVICES SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ALL INFORMATION PERTINENT TO ANTICIPATED PROCUREMENT NEEDS AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH QUARTER DURING A FISCAL YEAR.(B) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "MINORITY BUSINESS" MEANS A MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE AS DEFINED IN THE ACT OF JULY 22, 1974 (P.L.598, NO.206), KNOWN AS THE PENNSYLVANIA MINORITY BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ACT.SECTION 7105. APPROPRIATION OF FUNDS FROM MISCELLANEOUS SOURCES.IN ADDITION TO THE AMOUNTS APPROPRIATED BY THIS ACT:(1) MONEYS RECEIVED IN PAYMENT FOR FOOD AND HOUSEHOLD SUPPLIES FURNISHED TO EMPLOYEES AND OTHER PERSONS, EXCEPT INMATES, BY AN INSTITUTION AND MONEYS RECEIVED FROM THE PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF PRODUCTS OF THE SOIL, MEATS, LIVESTOCK, TIMBER OR OTHER MATERIALS SOLD BY A DEPARTMENT OR AGENCY OF THE COMMONWEALTH SHALL BE PAID INTO THE GENERAL FUND AND ARE APPROPRIATED OUT OF THE GENERAL FUND TO THE SEVERAL RESPECTIVE INSTITUTIONS FOR THE OPERATION AND 20260HB2400PN3765 - 394 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MAINTENANCE OF THE INSTITUTIONS.(2) MONEYS RECEIVED FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE, EXCEPT THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, AS CONTRIBUTIONS FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THE RESPECTIVE APPROPRIATIONS OR AS PAYMENT FOR SERVICES OR MATERIALS FURNISHED BY ONE INSTITUTION TO ANOTHER, EXCEPT THOSE COLLECTIONS DESIGNATED AS REVENUES, SHALL BE PAID INTO THE GENERAL FUND AND ARE APPROPRIATED OUT OF THE GENERAL FUND FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE RESPECTIVE APPROPRIATIONS.(3) MONEYS RECEIVED BY A DEPARTMENT OR AGENCY OF THE COMMONWEALTH FROM OTHER SOURCES, EXCEPT THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, AS CONTRIBUTIONS OR SUPPLEMENTS TO THE DEPARTMENT OR AGENCY FOR A PROGRAM OR ADMINISTRATION OF AN ACT INCLUDED IN THIS ACT SHALL BE PAID INTO THE GENERAL FUND AND CREDITED TO THE APPROPRIATION FOR THAT PROGRAM OR ADMINISTRATION OF THE ACT.SECTION 7106. LAPSING OF UNUSED FUNDS.(A) GENERAL RULE.--EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW OR BY THIS SECTION, THAT PART OF ALL APPROPRIATIONS IN THIS ACT UNEXPENDED, UNCOMMITTED OR UNENCUMBERED AS OF THE CLOSE OF THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR SHALL AUTOMATICALLY LAPSE AS OF THAT DAY.(B) EXCEPTIONS.--THE FOLLOWING SHALL BE CONTINUING APPROPRIATIONS:(1) THE APPROPRIATION IN SECTION 236 TO THE HEALTH CARE COST CONTAINMENT COUNCIL.(2) THE APPROPRIATION IN SECTION 241 TO THE SUPREME COURT FOR THE UNIFIED JUDICIAL SYSTEM SECURITY PROGRAM.(3) THE APPROPRIATIONS IN SUBPART C OF PART II TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.(4) THE APPROPRIATIONS IN SUBPART D OF PART II TO THE 20260HB2400PN3765 - 395 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GOVERNMENT SUPPORT AGENCIES.(5) THE APPROPRIATIONS IN SECTION 231 TO THE PENNSYLVANIA EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY FOR DISASTER RELIEF, HAZARD MITIGATION AND STATE DISASTER ASSISTANCE.(C) NONAPPLICABILITY.--THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO PART LI.SECTION 7107. APPELLATE COURTS APPROPRIATION CONTINGENCY.THE APPROPRIATIONS IN SECTIONS 241, 242 AND 243 TO THE SUPREME, SUPERIOR AND COMMONWEALTH COURTS, RESPECTIVELY, FOR JUSTICE AND JUDGE EXPENSES ARE CONTINGENT UPON A VOUCHERED EXPENSE ACCOUNT PLAN BEING CONTINUED BY THE SUPREME COURT.SECTION 7108. TRANSFER OF EXCESS FUNDS.THE GOVERNOR MAY TRANSFER MONEYS IN FUNDS RECEIVING PROCEEDS OF COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS IN EXCESS OF THE AMOUNT NECESSARY FOR THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH THE BONDS WERE ISSUED TO THE APPROPRIATE SINKING FUND FOR PAYMENT OF DEBT SERVICE DUE ON OUTSTANDING BONDS. IF THE EXCESS MONEY, TOGETHER WITH ANY AVAILABLE BALANCE, EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT OF DEBT SERVICE REMAINING TO BE PAID, THE MONEY SHALL BE TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL FUND OR TO THE APPROPRIATE SPECIAL FUND RESPONSIBLE FOR THE DEBT SERVICE.SECTION 7109. TRANSFERS FOR GOVERNMENT SUPPORT AGENCIES.DURING THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR, ANY PRIOR YEAR AMOUNT UNEXPENDED ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION MAY, UPON THE WRITTEN CONCURRENCE OF THE PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE OF THE SENATE, THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE, THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, BE TRANSFERRED BETWEEN ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACCOUNTS:(1) LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU.20260HB2400PN3765 - 396 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) LEGISLATIVE BUDGET AND FINANCE COMMITTEE.(3) LEGISLATIVE DATA PROCESSING COMMITTEE.(4) JOINT STATE GOVERNMENT COMMISSION.(5) LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMMISSION.(6) LEGISLATIVE AUDIT ADVISORY COMMISSION.(7) CENTER FOR RURAL PENNSYLVANIA.(8) COMMONWEALTH MAIL PROCESSING CENTER.(9) JOINT LEGISLATIVE AIR AND WATER POLLUTION CONTROL AND CONSERVATION COMMITTEE.(10) LEGISLATIVE REAPPORTIONMENT COMMISSION.(11) INDEPENDENT REGULATORY REVIEW COMMISSION.(12) CAPITOL PRESERVATION COMMITTEE.(13) PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING.(14) HOST STATE COMMITTEE EXPENSES - CSG.(15) RESTRICTED ACCOUNT FOR LEAVE PAYOUT EXPENSES.SECTION 7110. TRANSFERS FOR LEGISLATIVE REAPPORTIONMENT COMMISSION.THE APPROPRIATION IN THIS ACT OR IN ANY OTHER FISCAL YEAR TO THE LEGISLATIVE REAPPORTIONMENT COMMISSION REMAINING UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION MAY, UPON THE WRITTEN CONCURRENCE OF THE PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE OF THE SENATE, THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE, THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE MAJORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, BE TRANSFERRED TO ANY OTHER ACCOUNT OF THE SENATE AND THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, AS THEY DEEM NECESSARY.SECTION 7111. ADMINISTRATION OF HUMAN SERVICES BLOCK GRANT.THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL ALLOCATE AND DISBURSE APPROPRIATIONS IN THIS ACT FOR THE HUMAN SERVICES BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER ARTICLE XIV-B OF THE ACT OF JUNE 13, 1967 (P.L.31, NO.21), KNOWN AS THE HUMAN SERVICES CODE, TO 20260HB2400PN3765 - 397 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COUNTIES PARTICIPATING IN THAT PROGRAM. EACH PARTICIPATING COUNTY MAY ADJUST THE EXPENDITURE OF THE COUNTY'S HUMAN SERVICES BLOCK GRANT PROGRAM ALLOCATION BETWEEN THOSE APPROPRIATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH, AND AS AUTHORIZED BY, THE APPLICABLE PROVISION OF ARTICLE XIV-B OF THE HUMAN SERVICES CODE.PART LXXXIMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSECTION 8101. DEDUCTION OF EXPENDITURES UNDER TEMPORARY EXPENDITURE SYMBOLS.ANY MONEY THAT HAS BEEN EXPENDED UNDER TEMPORARY EXPENDITURE SYMBOLS APPROVED BY THE OFFICE OF THE BUDGET AND PAID AFTER JUNE 30, 2026, THROUGH THE DATE OF ENACTMENT OF THIS ACT, SHALL BE DEDUCTED FROM THE CORRESPONDING APPROPRIATION OF THIS ACT.SECTION 8102. RETROACTIVITY.THIS ACT SHALL APPLY RETROACTIVELY TO JULY 1, 2026.SECTION 8103. EFFECTIVE DATE.THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20260HB2400PN3765 - 398 - 1234567891011121314151617